2023-12-06 18:28:55.803141
Ripple (XRP) Beats 68% of Altcoins, But Sees December Bull Run Waver – What's the Catch?
Table of Contents
Bitcoin’s spectacular spike, marked by setting a new yearly high near $44,500, has the entire crypto community talking. With the SEC possibly green-lighting a handful of spot Bitcoin ETFs between January 5-10, BTC has all chances to skyrocket towards that dreamy $60,000 mark. While the original cryptocurrency is in the spotlight, altcoins like Ripple (XRP) aren't far behind, outperforming almost 70% of the top 100 crypto assets with a 61% jump this year and a solid $33.42 billion market cap.
In a different corner of the market, ScapesMania (MANIA) is catching eyes as a whole gaming ecosystem poised to shake up the billion-dollar crypto industry. The project is renowned for its community-focused approach, top-notch tech, and a team whose profiles are out there for everyone to see – a real nod to transparency. As the crypto industry gears up for what could be a big January, MANIA, with its bold vision and presale perks, is definitely a player worth betting on.
ScapesMania: Crafting a Transparent Crypto Wonderland
While some are facing an uncertain future, the trajectory of a presale project is far easier to predict. ScapesMania (MANIA) is a well-balanced, meticulously designed project that acts as a gaming ecosystem. Through DAO governance, backers will be able to influence and benefit from a multi-billion-dollar industry. A wide range of features paired with the best technology, a professional team, and a long-term, highly ambitious vision can make ScapesMania the next big thing in crypto. Presale discounts and stage bonuses only add to the project's appeal.
Presale is Live Now - Join Now for a Chance to Benefit with MANIA
Backed by an award-winning developer crew, ScapesMania stands for transparency: every member’s social media profile is public. The project can achieve this not just by bringing big innovation to the game, but by putting its community front and center. Driving customer engagement and making sure that everyone benefits through great tokenomics and generous rewards is what makes ScapesMania the project with a bright future ahead.
Presale is Live, Learn More About Major Benefits
Ripple (XRP) and SEC: Countdown to the Decisive Trial in 2024
The Ripple (XRP) vs. SEC saga has been relatively quiet lately, but there's still some buzz with recent developments. In late November, the US watchdog held a confidential meeting to discuss several topics, including the settlement of injunctive actions and litigation claims. This sparked some rumors among conspiracy theory enthusiasts who thought the event might signal an early resolution between Ripple (XRP) and the SEC. However, these speculations didn't materialize, and the case is now set to be resolved in spring 2024.
Rewinding to the start of this drama, the SEC sued Ripple (XRP) in December 2020, claiming the company's XRP sales were part of an unregistered security offering. The significant turn came in mid-July this year when the US Federal Judge decided that historical XRP sales didn't amount to investment contract offers. This favorable ruling boosted the Ripple (XRP) price and gave the asset’s developers a temporary advantage in the ongoing dispute.
Following this, Ripple (XRP) clinched two more wins: the SEC's appeal against the initial ruling was dismissed, and the company's top executives were cleared of all charges. With a major trial slated for April next year, the crypto community is eagerly waiting. A Ripple (XRP) victory could energize the entire cryptocurrency sector, while the win for the SEC might dampen spirits.
Ripple (XRP) Technical Analysis
Right now, Ripple (XRP) is trading between $0.5373 and $0.7121, offering a glimpse into its current market dynamics. The Relative Strength Index (RSI), sitting at 54.31, shows a market neither overextended nor lagging, suggesting a calm before a potential storm. The Stochastic indicator at 69.39 echoes this sentiment, hinting at a balance between buying and selling pressures. However, the Average Directional Index (ADX), a modest 19.2, whispers of a market lacking a strong directional trend. Adding color to this scenario, the Commodity Channel Index (CCI) at 112.15 leans slightly towards bullish territory, while the MACD at 0.00273 hovers in a positive yet cautious zone.
Source: TradingView
Should Ripple (XRP) score a victory in their high-stakes legal battle, a bullish breakout could be on the horizon. Overcoming the closest barrier at $0.7121 might catapult XRP towards the more ambitious resistance at $0.8178, and in a dream scenario, eyeing the ceiling at $0.9926. The 10-day SMA at $0.616 and the 10-day EMA at $0.62 currently sit snugly below the current price, potentially acting as a springboard for this ascent. The 200-day SMA and EMA, both around the $0.55 mark, fortify the grounds for a bullish push. However, it's crucial to remember the altcoin's significant drop from its all-time high, a towering 84% descent, which looms over this optimistic outlook.
On the flip side, a setback in the courtroom could see the Ripple (XRP) price spiraling down to its lower support levels. If it slips past $0.5373, the door to the second threshold at $0.4683 swings open, and in a more drastic downturn, the defense line at $0.2935 could come into play. The unassertive ADX indicates that the current market trend might not have the backbone to withstand such bearish pressures. In this scenario, the lower moving averages, particularly the SMA and EMA for 200 days, would be critical levels to watch for potential rebounds or further declines.
Bottomline
For Ripple (XRP), the ongoing legal dance with the SEC is more than just a courtroom drama – it's a pivotal moment that could send a wave of positivity, boosting not just XRP itself, but the whole crypto market, especially the digital assets now operating under regulatory eyes. But if the SEC wins, there will be a tighter leash for the industry and investors will be urged to rethink their strategies in a more cautious manner. As everyone holds their breath and keeps an eye out, the fate of Ripple (XRP) remains a key signpost, pointing to where the world of digital finance might head next.
Disclaimer: This is a sponsored article and is for informational purposes only. It does not reflect the views of Crypto Daily, nor is it intended to be used as legal, tax, investment, or financial advice.


2023-12-07 09:31:34.957654
Crypto Price Predictions: Projecting Bitcoin and Altcoin Prices for the Next 12-24 Months – Crypto News BTC
Famend crypto dealer Crypto Rover has unveiled his optimistic predictions for main cryptocurrencies, anticipating a bullish surge within the coming 12 to 24 months. The forecast suggests a bullish pattern that might propel these digital belongings to new all-time highs.
Bitcoin Goals for $280K
In keeping with the Crypto Rover, Bitcoin (BTC) is displaying indicators of a major shift in its value motion, indicating a breakthrough in a longstanding damaging pattern because the downturns of 2022.
With the present market situations, Rover means that Bitcoin is making notable efforts to beat a strong resistance degree, at present located at $43,670.
Rover goes on to foretell a outstanding surge for Bitcoin within the coming 12 to 24 months, projecting a value vary between $120,000 and $280,000. This optimistic outlook aligns with expectations tied to the potential approval of 12 spot Bitcoin ETF functions and the scheduled Bitcoin halving occasion slated for April 2024.
Ethereum Worth Eyes For $12k
Ethereum (ETH) can also be underneath the optimistic gaze of Crypto Rover. The cryptocurrency, at present confined inside a bullish technical formation, may witness a 5% acquire if it sustains this pattern. Success on this transfer would see ETH flipping the $2,300 resistance degree right into a help ground.
Crypto Rover initiatives a optimistic image for Ethereum, suggesting a value vary of $6,000 to $12,000. This forecast underscores the dealer’s confidence in Ethereum’s significance throughout the broader crypto market.
$6 for XRP, If Ripple Wins it’s Battle
Ripple’s XRP, topic to ongoing authorized battles, has caught Crypto Rover’s consideration. The dealer units a goal vary of $4 to $6 for XRP, contingent on a good final result within the Ripple vs. SEC case.
Success within the courtroom may set off a considerable surge in XRP’s value, probably coming into a provide zone between $0.6572 and $0.7161.
Chainlink’s Bullish Momentum: Focusing on $350
Chainlink’s LINK token has been a standout performer in current weeks. Displaying a bullish rally, LINK’s value has surpassed the $15 mark, with potential for additional positive factors. Crypto Rover’s predictions prolong to Chainlink, envisioning a goal vary of $250 to $350. As a decentralized Oracle community, Chainlink has gained traction for its position in enhancing sensible contract capabilities.
As Crypto Rover’s forecasts contribute to the continued discussions within the crypto group, merchants and lovers eagerly await developments that might probably result in substantial progress within the digital asset house.


2023-12-07 11:28:55.820489
Binance’s BNB Token Misses Out the $180 Billion Crypto Rally, Will XRP Takeover??
Over the last week, the broader cryptocurrency market witnessed a mega rally jumping 12% and adding more than $180 billion to the overall market cap. While Bitcoin and altcoins together participated in this rally, Binance’s BNB token missed the bus entirely.
This happens amid the challenging outlook that Binance is facing amid its ongoing $4.3 billion settlement with US regulators. Over the last week, while almost all of the top ten cryptocurrencies clocked double-digit gains, Binance’s BNB token barely managed 1% returns.
Binance Losing Market Share
Binance Coin (BNB) is experiencing a challenging year, reflecting the exchange’s regulatory struggles. BNB, known for providing perks like reduced trading fees on the Binance platform, is notably the sole major token showing a year-to-date loss, as reported by Bloomberg.
The regulatory woes for Binance reached a significant point in the US, after entering guilty pleas on November 21 in connection with anti-money-laundering and sanctions violations. This development underscores the growing regulatory scrutiny faced by the cryptocurrency exchange.
Despite being a dominant force in the digital asset trading landscape, Binance is witnessing a decline in its market share. The platform’s share of spot trading volumes decreased from 55% at the beginning of 2023 to 32% in November, based on data from CCData. Similarly, its share in the derivatives market dropped from over 60% to 48%.
Courtesy: Bloomberg
Matthew Sigel, the head of digital-assets research at VanEck, predicts a shift in the landscape, anticipating that Binance might lose its top position in centralized exchanges. He cites competitors like OKX, Bybit, Coinbase, and Bitget as potential contenders to take over the leading spot amid Binance’s recent plea deal with US authorities
Binance’s founder Changpeng Zhao stepped down as the CEO after pleading guilty. Richard Teng, who has succeeded Zhao as the head of Binance, is tasked with the challenging mission of restructuring the company to navigate regulatory challenges while also preventing further erosion of market share. In an interview last month, Teng aimed to convey confidence by stating that Binance’s revenues and profits continue to exhibit strength.
BNB Token Under Huge Pressure, Will XRP Take the 4th Spot?
In November, Binance witnessed the second-highest monthly outflow of funds, with customers withdrawing a net $1.6 billion, as reported by DefiLlama data. However, there has been a partial reversal, with a net inflow of $398 million onto the exchange in December thus far.
Following the guilty pleas and a hefty fine exceeding $4 billion in the U.S., BNB has experienced an 8% decline, marking one of the largest penalties in U.S. history. This performance contrasts with the 14% gain in an index tracking the top 100 digital assets during the same period.
Clara Medalie, Director of Research at Kaiko, notes that BNB’s current underperformance is attributed to it being perceived as a proxy for Binance.
Amid its recent underperformance, the BNB token holds the risk of losing the fourth spot to Ripple’s XRP. The XRP price is up by 67% year-to-date amid positive developments in the Ripple vs SEC case.
The post Binance’s BNB Token Misses Out the $180 Billion Crypto Rally, Will XRP Takeover?? appeared first on CoinGape.
Source: coingape.com


2023-12-07 08:28:55.790532
XRP Price Targets $1 Milestone in December: Bulls Gear Up for a Strong Rally
Sohrab is a passionate cryptocurrency news writer with over five years of experience covering the industry. He keeps a keen interest in blockchain technology and its potential to revolutionize finance. Whether he's trading or writing, Sohrab always keeps his finger on the pulse of the crypto world, using his expertise to deliver informative and engaging articles that educate and inspire. When he's not analyzing the markets, Sohrab indulges in his hobbies of graphic design, minimal design or listening to his favorite hip-hop tunes.
Story Highlights Growing breakout anticipations of a cup and handle pattern tease a bull run in XRP price.
The XRP price action reflects a growing bullish momentum to approach the neckline at $0.71.
If the XRP price can sustain momentum, the bullish breakout of $0.70 can reach the $1 mark.
With an early Santa Claus rally, cryptocurrencies are heating up this winter, and they are initiating a bull run to enter 2024 on a high note. As Bitcoin touches the $44K mark, the bullish momentum leaks into the altcoin market, leading to a recovery in the XRP price.
Ripple prepares a long-term bullish recovery to regain the $1 mark before the year-end with a bullish breakout rally. Further, the Ripple price prediction supports the bullish breakout possibility and teases a longer trend above $1.
Source – Tradingview
In the daily chart, the short-term pullback in XRP price from the $0.71 mark finds a bouncepad at the dynamic support of the 50D EMA. The cushion helps the pullback in Ripple take a lateral shift and avoid further correction.
Moreover, the recovery rally in Ripple teases a continuation pattern break above the neckline at $0.71. The buyers are preparing for a cup and handle reversal, a trend continuation pattern that will increase the XRP price with immense momentum.
Further, the recent recovery in the overall market due to the early Santa rally helps increase the confidence of Ripple holders.
Currently, the XRP price trades at $0.0.6498 with an intraday growth of 1.35% to continue the newfound momentum after a 3% jump last night. Moreover, the bullish engulfing candles tease a jump to $0.71 in hopes of completing the trend continuation pattern.
Technical Indicators:
MACD indicator: The MACD and signal lines give a positive crossover, indicating a bullish reversal. The positive histograms are also rising, suggesting that momentum is building in XRP price and a breakout rally will likely arrive.
EMA: The continuous dynamic support at the 50D EMA helps the Ripple comeback and revives the trend momentum.
Will The XRP Price Reach $1?
From the short-term viewpoint, the trend continuation pattern building up in the XRP daily chart bolsters the optimistic viewpoint. Further, the market-wide will increase the trend momentum in Ripple breach the $0.71 barrier.
Once the breakout rally crosses $0.71, the chances of a jump to $1 will improve significantly. Conversely, a reversal from $0.70 can result in a drop to the $0.58-$0.60 mark.


2023-12-07 05:28:55.823569
Unlock the thrill of crypto gaming at ZooBet Casino: Get your 100% match bonus!
Zobet Casino opens the door to an exciting casino experience focusing on cryptocurrency users. By depositing just 9 XRP, players can unlock a 100% match bonus and dive into a library of over 1000 high-quality casino games from leading providers in a crypto-secure environment.
Step into the world of crypto gaming at Zobet Casino: Zobet Casino is revolutionizing the online gaming experience by integrating cryptocurrency transactions and providing a seamless and secure gaming environment. The casino offers an attractive 100% match bonus for players who deposit using Ripple’s XRP, further adding to the thrill of their extensive game collection.
Easy Steps to Claim Your Bonus
Sign up: Register at ZooBet Casino, a process that only takes three minutes. Deposit: Make a lump sum deposit of 9 XRP to activate your special bonus. play and enjoy:Explore over 1000 casino games from well-known providers by activating your bonus.
Understanding Zoobet’s Bonus Policy and Terms
Registration Bonus
Eligibility : Open to players who have registered Bitcoin (BTC) as their primary currency.
: Open to players who have registered Bitcoin (BTC) as their primary currency. bonus allocation : Get a $5 bonus (about 0.00017 BTC) upon registration.
: Get a $5 bonus (about 0.00017 BTC) upon registration. bonus offset : The initial $5 bonus is deducted when your winnings/deposit balance reaches $30 (approximately 0.001 BTC).
: The initial $5 bonus is deducted when your winnings/deposit balance reaches $30 (approximately 0.001 BTC). Withdrawal Requirements : Wager at least $50 before withdrawal.
: Wager at least $50 before withdrawal. risk management: One bonus per player, enforced via IP address tracking.
first deposit bonus
bonus allocation : 10% bonus on first deposit of $10 or more.
: 10% bonus on first deposit of $10 or more. Withdrawal Requirements: Bet a withdrawal of at least 40% of your initial deposit after receiving the bonus.
Amendment and termination
Zobet reserves the right to modify or terminate these Terms at any time. Players are encouraged to review the bonus policy from time to time.
Why choose Zobet Casino?
Zobet Casino is known for its commitment to a crypto-focused gaming experience, offering secure transactions and a diverse range of games. With its straightforward bonus system and focus on player convenience, Zobet Casino is the perfect place for cryptocurrency enthusiasts and traditional gamers who want a fresh and dynamic online casino experience.
About Zobet:
Zoobet is a reliable online casino operating under the Zoobet Entertainment NV brand name. The casino has all the necessary licenses and follows established gaming rules to ensure the safety and peace of mind of players. ZooBet is registered in Curacao with a sub-license under license number 365/JAZ, GLH-OCCHKTW0712032022. Additionally, Zoobet Casino operates through a wholly owned subsidiary, Zoobet Entertainment Limited, based in Larnaca, Cyprus, which acts as the casino’s payments and operating agent.
Zoobet offers a reliable gaming platform compatible with PC, Mac and mobile devices. The casino’s desktop platforms, PC and Mac, offer clear graphics and quick load times. For mobile users, ZooBet adjusts flawlessly to Android and iPhone devices, and offers thrilling entertainment on every game.
Source


2023-12-06 17:28:55.796320
XRP suggests bullishness as Ripple CEO credits the community with lawsuit win
Share:
Ripple CEO Brad Garlinghouse stood in agreement with a report that suggested that the XRP community was the most influential entity in 2023.
XRP price moving sideways is most likely a sign of potential recovery on the horizon.
Ripple whales have been consistently accumulating for the past three weeks, adding to the probability of a rise.
XRP price greatly benefitted from the partial win it attained in the lawsuit filed by the Securities & Exchange Commission (SEC). However, Ripple’s CEO decided that the credit largely goes not to himself or the company but to its supporters.
Daily Digest Market Movers: Ripple CEO credits XRP army
Ripple CEO Brad Garlinghouse took to X, formerly Twitter, to respond to a report by CoinDesk crowning him as one of the most influential people in 2023. The executive was less in agreement with the title than the unwavering support throughout the court proceedings. Garlinghouse tweeted,
"2023 Most Influential award should be given not just to Garlinghouse, but also the entire XRP Army." I couldn't agree more!
The Ripple CEO has iterated this statement in the past as well. Along with him, CTO David Schwartz has credited the XRP Army with making the court win possible.
Technical Analysis: XRP price prepares for recovery
XRP price is trading at $0.622 and is presently moving sideways, building up toward a recovery that has been due since early November. The native Ripple token corrected by almost 20% at the beginning of last month, following a 31% rally toward the end of October, which XRP aims to recover going forward.
The Relative Strength Index (RSI) and Moving Average Convergence Divergence (MACD) indicators are exhibiting potential bullish momentum. The RSI is lurking above the neutral line marked at 50.0, and the MACD is close to executing a bullish crossover.
This would mostly set the XRP price in an uptrend, targeting the breach of the $0.644 resistance level. Flipping this price into a support floor is crucial for a further rise toward $0.700.
XRP/USD 1-day chart
Nevertheless, a failed breach would point toward a potential decline, which would send the XRP price to $0.600. Losing this support line would invalidate the bullish thesis, resulting in a crash to $0.551.
Ripple whales support a rally
Ripple whales have been adding to their wallets for the past three weeks, bringing their holding to 6.73 billion XRP. Addresses holding 100,000 XRP to 1 million XRP have noted an increase of 60 million XRP worth over $31 million since November 15.
Ripple whale accumulation
These addresses hold significant influence on the price action and have historically proven to be a catalyst as well. Their accumulation tends to push the XRP price upward, and the sell-off results in the value of the token declining. Thus, the fact that their present sentiment is adding instead of removing from their wallets is a positive sign for Ripple investors.


2023-12-07 10:28:55.785480
Ripple Price Prediction: Expert Predicts 85%-120% XRP Jump!
Elena is an expert in technical analysis and risk management in cryptocurrency market. She has 10+year experience in writing - accordingly she is avid journalists with a passion towards researching new insights coming into crypto erena.
Story Highlights Alan Santana predicts an upward trend for XRP through corrective scenarios.
Santana projects a potential surge for XRP in the next six months, ranging from 85% to 120%, depending on the path it takes.
XRP's long-term target remains uncertain due to the complexity of cryptocurrency markets.
In recent analysis, expert Alan Santana unveils XRP’s potential surge, hinting at an 85% to 120% jump. While the crypto market thrived, XRP saw a momentary slowdown, sparking community discussions. Santana stays upbeat, predicting an upward trend for XRP through various corrective scenarios.
Discover what they are below.
Dip Before the Lift?
While the broader cryptocurrency market celebrated significant gains, XRP experienced a momentary deceleration in growth, sparking discussions within the community. Santana, however, maintains an optimistic outlook, envisioning a landscape that combines a bullish trend and wave, paving the way for upward price movements.
Santana’s in-depth analysis emphasizes the likelihood of a standard retracement. Despite a decline in XRP’s trade volume since July and the emergence of a triangle-top pattern, he highlights the historical resilience of XRP, showcasing its tendency to defy traditional market patterns.
What Next for XRP: Blue and Red Outlook
Looking ahead to the next six months, Santana projects a potential challenge for XRP, targeting the high range between $0.73 and $0.94. With a bullish bias, XRP could ascend to trade in this range, potentially marking a surge ranging from 85% to 120%, contingent on the corrective path it takes.
Also Read: XRP Price Targets $1 Milestone in December: Bulls Gear Up for a Strong Rally
Santana introduces two hypothetical retracement paths. The first, depicted in blue, outlines a scenario where XRP drops to the $0.51 region before bouncing back with an 85% surge from the current price.
On the other hand, the second correction path, illustrated in red, envisions a dip for XRP to the $0.43 region, followed by a subsequent rally of 120% from the current price.
Looking Ahead
In recent short-term movements, XRP marked a 1.73% increase in the last 24 hours, currently priced at $0.6221. Notably, the asset witnessed a substantial 42% spike in 24-hour trade volume, reaching $2,001,370,458, indicating heightened market demand.
However,While Santana hints at a long-term target of around $5 based on past calculations, he emphasizes the intricate nature of predicting cryptocurrency markets. Unforeseen developments, particularly within the context of a potential super-cycle, add complexity to forecasting.
This Might Interest You: SEC-Ripple Lawsuit Was Much Bigger Than Just XRP, Argues John Deaton


2023-12-07 14:28:55.787035
XRP could target $25 as bull flag is projected to explode in 2024
With the lingering regulatory uncertainty around Ripple and the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), the value of XRP has been subject to speculation over its next course.
Notably, market participants are watching the asset, considering it has mainly been in a consolidated phase amid the ongoing market rally.
In this line, prominent crypto analyst FieryTrading, on December 2 in a TradingView post, presented a bullish outlook for XRP, suggesting that the digital asset may target an impressive $25.
FieryTrading noted that XRP has been trading within a consolidating pattern characterized by higher lows and lower highs, ultimately forming a triangle pattern. The analyst classified this pattern as a bull flag, given its emergence directly after the remarkable 7,000x surge in 2017.
In this regard, a bull flag is a continuation chart pattern characterized by two parallel trendlines that move in the opposite direction of the dominant trend observed on a longer time frame chart. In this case, the bull flag emerged directly after a significant surge in XRP’s price in 2017.
XRP price analysis chart. Source: TradingView
According to the analysis, this extensive pattern is anticipated to experience a breakout next year, with the most likely outcome being a bullish move, especially considering the halving event on the horizon.
“This huge pattern will explode at some point in 2024, with the most likely move being a bullish one with the halving in mind,” he said.
The potential of XRP hitting $25
The cryptocurrency analyst expressed confidence in the potential of XRP’s breakout, drawing parallels with the performance of other cryptocurrencies in previous cycles. He highlighted the example of Cardano (ADA), another altcoin that made a top 6x higher than its last cycle.
Drawing inspiration from such occurrences, the analyst set an ambitious target for XRP’s breakout at $25. The expert acknowledged that the $25 target might seem lofty but emphasized its rationale, comparing it to historical trends in the crypto market.
“ It might be too high, but ADA also made a top 6x higher than the previous one last cycle, so why not? With a relatively tight stop and a far target, we’re able to create a signal with a risk-reward of almost 80, a potential game changer for anyone’s portfolio,” he added.
At the same, the potential breakout of XRP is also echoed by Egrag Crypto, an analyst who, in a prior post on X (formerly Twitter), highlighted that XRP exhibits the potential for a significant rally of 2,500%, referencing past price movements.
#XRP Only 2500%:

If you can't see the incredible potential of #XRP in the chart below, especially when breaking through MYTL, then I'm afraid there's little more I can do to convince you.#XRPArmy STAY STEADY and do not forget that we have clarity for GOD's sake. pic.twitter.com/S1097h4ujS — EGRAG CRYPTO (@egragcrypto) September 12, 2023
XRP price movement concerns
It is worth noting that after XRP received regulatory clarity, being declared not a security, there was optimism that the asset would rally. However, the token has mainly traded in a consolidated phase, with some participants terming the movement strange.
Despite following the general market trajectory, there is a general consensus that the token faces an imminent breakout.
Notably, the legal matter with the SEC will likely play a role in influencing the value of XRP. Currently, the Ripple case continues to proceed through the damages phase and potential appeals.
XRP price analysis
By press time, XRP had recorded daily gains of over 2%, trading at $0.63. On the weekly chart, XRP is up over 5%.
XRP seven-day price chart. Source: Finbold
Considering all factors, the $1 mark remains XRP’s top target, as the community believes it will usher in the next record high.
Disclaimer: The content on this site should not be considered investment advice. Investing is speculative. When investing, your capital is at risk.


2023-12-07 12:28:55.810287
BNB's Struggle Amid Regulatory Woes: Will XRP Steal the Show in Crypto's Top Rankings?
In a dynamic landscape where cryptocurrencies are soaring, Binance’s BNB token appears to be facing headwinds. Over the past week, while the crypto market witnessed a significant surge, BNB lagged behind with minimal gains, raising concerns amidst the ongoing $4.3 billion settlement between Binance and US regulators. This raises questions about its future position and market dominance, with potential repercussions likely to favor Ripple’s XRP.
As the broader cryptocurrency market witnessed a remarkable rally, surging by 12% and adding a substantial $180 billion to its overall market cap, Binance’s BNB token seemed conspicuously absent from the limelight. While other major cryptocurrencies displayed double-digit gains, BNB struggled to achieve even 1% returns, casting a shadow on its performance.
The woes facing Binance Coin (BNB) are reflective of the regulatory challenges plaguing the Binance exchange. Known for offering incentives such as reduced trading fees on its platform, BNB stands as the sole major token experiencing a year-to-date loss, as highlighted by Bloomberg.
The ongoing regulatory hurdles reached a pivotal juncture for Binance in the US, culminating in guilty pleas on November 21 related to anti-money laundering and sanctions violations. This development underscores the escalating regulatory scrutiny confronting the cryptocurrency exchange.
Consequently, Binance has witnessed a decline in its market share, experiencing a notable decrease from 55% to 32% in spot trading volumes since the beginning of the year, as per CCData. Similarly, its share in the derivatives market dropped from over 60% to 48%.
Matthew Sigel, head of digital-assets research at VanEck, foresees a potential shift in the market landscape, predicting a possible loss of Binance’s top position among centralized exchanges. Competitors such as OKX, Bybit, Coinbase, and Bitget are emerging as strong contenders amid Binance’s recent plea deal with US authorities.
Following the resignation of Binance’s founder, Changpeng Zhao, after pleading guilty, Richard Teng has taken the reins as the new head of Binance. Tasked with the challenging mission of restructuring the company amidst regulatory hurdles and dwindling market share, Teng aims to steer Binance while upholding confidence by highlighting the company’s continued revenue and profit strength.
With November marking the second-highest monthly outflow of funds for Binance, customers withdrew a net $1.6 billion, as reported by DefiLlama data. However, December has seen a partial reversal, with a net inflow of $398 million onto the exchange.
In the aftermath of guilty pleas and a staggering fine exceeding $4 billion in the US, BNB has faced an 8% decline, notably one of the largest penalties in US history. This downturn stands in stark contrast to the 14% gain in an index tracking the top 100 digital assets during the same period.
A $180 billion rally painted the crypto canvas, yet BNB, a token renowned for its perks on the Binance platform, stuttered with meager returns, failing to catch the rally train that almost all other top cryptos joyously boarded. The reason behind this dissonance seems tied to the stormy weather facing Binance, embroiled in a $4.3 billion settlement saga with US regulators.
The tale of Binance Coin (BNB) tells a story of struggle and adversity in the cryptoverse. While its contemporaries soared, BNB’s performance, or rather, its lack thereof, whispers the challenges looming large over Binance, an exchange grappling with regulatory storms. Bloomberg’s reports grimly highlight BNB as the solitary major token nursing year-to-date losses, a poignant reflection of the exchange’s regulatory strife.
The regulatory labyrinth ensnaring Binance deepened with its guilty pleas in connection with anti-money laundering and sanctions violations. Such developments spotlight the mounting regulatory scrutiny that has sent ripples across the cryptocurrency exchange landscape.
Clara Medalie, Director of Research at Kaiko, attributes BNB’s underperformance to its association as a proxy for Binance, emphasizing the market’s perception.
Amid its recent struggles, the BNB token faces the risk of relinquishing its fourth spot to Ripple’s XRP. Ripple’s positive developments in its legal battle against the SEC have propelled XRP’s price upwards by 67% year-to-date, positioning it as a formidable contender in the crypto market.


2023-12-07 15:31:34.963415
Ripple’s Stablecoin Project in Palau Moves Forward With First Phase – Crypto News BTC
Ripple and the Republic of Palau collectively launched a stablecoin pilot in July of this 12 months, after each started collaborating on exploring potential use instances in 2021.
The pilot program was deliberate to roll out in phases, with the primary part involving participation from about 200 authorities staff and native retailers in Palau.
This was in line with the first aim of the Palau Stablecoin Pilot Undertaking, which was to judge varied use instances and proposed advantages delivered by the Palau Stablecoin in a managed setting and through a decided interval.
Now, 5 months after the announcement of the stablecoin pilot, Jay Hunter Anson, this system director and PSC distribution officer for the Palau stablecoin pilot, took to X to share the progress made up to now.
To this finish, Anson shared a newly launched report for the just lately accomplished part one of many Palau Stablecoin (PSC) Program.
The PSC part one scope was deliberate to permit as much as 200 worker volunteers from the manager department of the federal government to make use of the Palau stablecoin to make purchases from not less than three voluntarily taking part native retailers.
The Palau stablecoin was issued by the Ministry of Finance of the Republic of Palau on XRP Ledger (XRPL) and totally collateralized with USD money deposits.
100 sixty-eight volunteers totally participated within the pilot out of a complete of 223 Palauan residents and residents who initially volunteered to take part.
In keeping with the report, Palau Stablecoin Program part one was successful amongst each volunteers and retailers, with each responding positively to the worth proposition supplied by the Palau stablecoin (PSC) as a digital fee system.
The vast majority of survey respondents mentioned they might favor PSC use if the Palau authorities accredited nationwide deployment.
On what comes subsequent, the report states that future phases ought to concentrate on creating a strong ecosystem that mixes monetary establishments, regulatory companies, authorized frameworks, taking part companies and customers into the stablecoin community.


2023-12-07 16:01:55.806564
Pro-XRP Lawyer Expects SEC Rug Pull, What Does He Mean?
Pro-XRP lawyer John Deaton has shared his thoughts on whether or not the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) would approve a Spot Bitcoin ETF. He hinted at the regulator, most especially its Chair Gary Gensler, pulling a shocker on everyone who is anticipating an approval.
SEC And Gensler To Pull Off A Rug Pull?
In a post shared on his X (formerly Twitter) platform, Deaton quizzed about whether Gensler was about to pull off the greatest “regulatory rug pull of all time.” The lawyer put forward this question as he highlighted the amount of optimism in the market, as many expect the SEC to approve the pending Spot BTC ETF applications.
Specifically, he alluded to the prediction of a 90% chance that these funds will get approved by January 10, 2024. Bloomberg analysts James Seyffart and Eric Balchunas made this prediction as they believe there is a high likelihood of the SEC approving a Spot Bitcoin ETF. January 10 happens to be the final deadline for a decision on ARK 21Shares Spot Bitcoin.
However, Deaton seems to believe that there is also the possibility (no matter how slim) that the the regulator could deny these applications. That would explain the “regulatory rug pull” he mentioned, as it is likely in reference to the SEC and Gensler doing the unexpected, especially considering their welcoming reception so far.
In recent weeks, the SEC seems to have been more open to the idea of approving these funds as far as there is regulatory compliance on the part of these filers. The Commission has met with several of them, including BlackRock, in a bid to hash out some of their concerns. This has been touted as a positive sign, as many believe the the regulator won’t go to such lengths if approval isn’t imminent.
However, based on Deaton’s question, there is no doubt that the SEC and its Chair, Gensler, could still pull a fast one and move to deny these applications instead.
Total market cap remains high | Source: Crypto Total Market Cap on Tradingview.com
How The Regulatory Rug Pull Could Happen
It is worth mentioning that Deaton’s post had come in response to another post made by former SEC attorney John Reed Stark. In that post, Stark had hinted at two possible scenarios on how the regulator could go on to deny the pending Spot BTC ETF applications.
He suggested that the SEC’s welcoming reception could simply be a “CYA effort,” so it could state that the reason for denial was due to the filers’ failure to meet regulatory requirements. The second scenario was about the Commission denying these applications on the grounds that approval could pose a serious threat to investors.
Featured image from Thomson Reuters, chart from Tradingview.com


2023-12-07 11:28:55.808875
Top Cryptos Under $1 With 10X Potential: XRP, TRX, NUGX
Home » Journal Top Cryptos Under $1 With 10X Potential: XRP, TRX, NUGX JournalSponsored Top Cryptos Under $1 With 10X Potential: XRP, TRX, NUGX Rudolph Waltz
Hey there, crypto enthusiasts! Today, we’re diving into the world of affordable yet promising cryptos that might just be your ticket to the next big thing. Among them, XRP stands out with its rapid international transaction capabilities, while TRX impresses with its entertainment-focused blockchain.
And let’s not overlook the buzzing newcomer, NuggetRush (NUGX), a fresh entry in the meme coin arena with a twist of impactful gaming.
Each of these cryptos, with its unique flavor and robust technical backbone, holds the potential to skyrocket 10X! So, buckle up as we explore why XRP, TRX, and NUGX might just be the best cryptos to buy now for a potential windfall in the future.
NuggetRush isn’t just another coin in the crypto ocean. It’s a blend of gaming, real-world impact, and crypto, all rolled into one. Picture a game where you’re not just scoring points but also striking digital gold, and guess what, helping real-life miners in the process. Talk about gaming with a heart!
Jumping into its presale, NuggetRush is already turning heads in Round 3, with over 71.3 million NUGX tokens sold at 0.013 USDT each. That’s a cool $700,000 in the bank, people! This successful presale isn’t just numbers; it’s a loud and clear signal that NuggetRush is cruising up the list of the best altcoins to invest in now.
Diving into its tokenomics, NuggetRush boasts a total supply of 500 million NUGX with no buy or sell tax – a rare treat in the crypto world. This setup is a big thumbs-up for anyone starting with cryptocurrency trading for beginners, offering a transparent and player-friendly economic model.
At its core, NuggetRush stands tall on the Ethereum blockchain. This means top-tier security and transparency. For those new to altcoins to buy, this is a game-changer. The Ethereum foundation provides a solid, trustworthy base for NUGX, a crucial aspect for any crypto investment.
But it’s not all about the tech; NuggetRush is also about impact. By integrating real-world social contribution into its gameplay, NUGX connects virtual gaming with tangible social good. This innovative approach sets it apart, making it more than a game – it’s a movement, a standout among top altcoins.
>> Buy NuggetRush Now <<
XRP by Ripple is not just another token; it’s a revolution in international money transfers. Ripple’s underlying technology enables lightning-fast and cost-efficient transactions, a dream come true in the world of global finance. It’s this practical utility that makes XRP one of the best cryptos to buy now.
Ripple’s secret sauce is its unique consensus protocol, which significantly reduces energy use and transaction times. This innovation has positioned XRP as a leader in the crypto world, appealing to both savvy investors and those dipping their toes into cryptocurrency trading for beginners.
TRX is the native token of TRON, a blockchain-based platform aimed at revolutionizing digital entertainment. TRON’s high-throughput, high-scalability, and high-availability features make it an attractive platform for content creators and consumers alike. This positions TRX as one of the best altcoins to invest in for those seeking growth and innovation.
TRON’s standout feature is its ability to handle enormous numbers of transactions, a must-have in today’s digital entertainment world. Coupled with low transaction fees, it’s a compelling reason why TRX is among the altcoins to watch for forward-thinking investors.
Conclusion
In the dynamic and ever-evolving crypto market, affordable options like XRP, TRX, and NuggetRush (NUGX) are making waves with their unique offerings and potential for significant growth. For anyone on the hunt for opportunities in cryptocurrency trading for beginners, these cryptos under $1 with 10X potential are definitely worth a closer look. Keep an eye on these rising stars – your ticket to the next big crypto wave might just be among them!
Visit NuggetRush Presale Website
Disclaimer: This sponsored content is not endorsed by CaptainAltcoin, which takes no responsibility for its accuracy or quality. We advise readers to do their own research before interacting with any featured companies. The information provided is not financial or legal advice. Neither CaptainAltcoin nor any third party recommends buying or selling any financial products. Investing in crypto assets is high-risk; consider the potential for loss. CaptainAltcoin is not liable for any damages or losses from using or relying on this content.


2023-12-07 08:28:55.818822
Optimism Toward the SEC v Ripple Case Resurfaces – Crypto News BTC
The SEC will try and scoop up the $770 million from XRP gross sales to institutional traders. Nonetheless, case legislation suggests a considerably decrease penalty.
Morrison v NAB: The US Supreme Courtroom dominated the SEC solely has jurisdiction over US-based gross sales. Throughout remedies-related discovery, XRP will show the quantity of XRP gross sales to US institutional traders.
Liu v SEC: The courtroom dominated a disgorgement quantity should not exceed the online earnings and should go to the victims. Ripple will deduct bills related to the sale of XRP to US institutional traders to derive web earnings.
SEC v Govil: The courtroom dominated the SEC can’t demand a punitive disgorgement with out demonstrating the monetary influence of the XRP gross sales on traders. If the worth of XRP is increased than on the time of gross sales to institutional traders, there was no hurt to traders. Ripple will look to show the uptrend within the worth of XRP earlier than, throughout, and after the sale of XRP to institutional traders.
With case legislation on the facet of the Defendant, the SEC may settle earlier than the conclusion of discovery. A positive settlement can be a boon for XRP and the crypto market. Nonetheless, XRP may face one other interval of uncertainty.
The SEC will probably attraction the courtroom ruling on the Programmatic Gross sales of XRP. Considerably, the attraction course of would probably prolong into 2025, presumably leaving XRP in limbo for an additional yr.
Nonetheless, the end result of the SEC v Coinbase (COIN) case may alter the SEC’s plans to attraction in opposition to the ruling.
SEC v Coinbase: The Coinbase Movement to Dismiss Ruling
On January 17, 2024, the SEC and Coinbase will ship oral arguments concerning the Coinbase movement to dismiss (MTD). Coinbase argues the SEC lacks the statutory authority to manage crypto exchanges. If Decide Katherine Failla grants the MTD, the SEC would lose its bid to categorise cryptos traded on alternate as securities.
The end result of the SEC v Coinbase case may considerably influence the US crypto market. One other SEC loss might incentivize US lawmakers to roll out a US crypto regulatory framework favoring innovation whereas defending traders.
XRP Value Motion


2023-12-07 16:14:55.795261
There Is a Hidden Link in Ripple (XRP), Cosmos (ATOM) and Arbitrum (ARB) Futures – Should Investors Brace for Surprises?
Table of Contents
The crypto landscape is rapidly changing, with the chill of the earlier crypto winter giving way to a vibrant resurgence. This rally isn't just about Bitcoin anymore - a diverse array of altcoins are also making their mark. As concerns about inflation and macroeconomic challenges take a back seat, the crypto market is buzzing with the expected approval of cryptocurrency spot ETFs adding to the excitement. Bitcoin, ever the trendsetter, has seen a remarkable 17% increase, reaching a high of $45,000 on November 5. However, amidst this surge unfolding within just five days, there are altcoins like Ripple (XRP), Cosmos (ATOM) and Arbitrum (ARB) that show more subdued movements, with some investors wondering if these are signs of an impending December surge. XRP has seen a modest rise of 3%, whereas ATOM and ARB have experienced declines of 2% and 1%, respectively.
In this atmosphere of cautious optimism, ScapesMania (MANIA) emerges as a presale project worth watching. What makes its future shine bright is driving customer engagement and making sure that everyone benefits through great tokenomics and generous rewards. Its team's public social media profiles are also a testament to this commitment. Thus, MANIA appears to be a promising player in the crypto world which has much more to offer than just attractive presale perks.
ScapesMania: Igniting the Spark of Crypto Genius
While some are facing an uncertain future, the trajectory of a presale project is far easier to predict. ScapesMania (MANIA) is a well-balanced, meticulously designed project that acts as a gaming ecosystem. Through DAO governance, backers will be able to influence and benefit from a multi-billion-dollar industry. A wide range of features paired with the best technology, a professional team, and a long-term, highly ambitious vision can make ScapesMania the next big thing in crypto. Presale discounts and stage bonuses only add to the project's appeal.
Presale is Live Now - Join Now for a Chance to Benefit with MANIA
Backed by an award-winning developer crew, ScapesMania stands for transparency: every member’s social media profile is public. The project can achieve this not just by bringing big innovation to the game, but by putting its community front and center. Driving customer engagement and making sure that everyone benefits through great tokenomics and generous rewards is what makes ScapesMania the project with a bright future ahead.
Presale is Live, Learn More About Major Benefits
Ripple (XRP): Struggling for Momentum in Uncertain Times
On November 6, Ripple (XRP) experienced a 3% rally, an uptick following a slight decline on the previous day. This movement coincided with significant XRP transfers, including one from a Ripple-associated address involving over 60 million XRP. Despite these large transactions hinting at institutional interest, the surge in the Ripple (XRP) value seems to be losing momentum again, with the price retracting from $0.64 to $0.63. The absence of new developments in the SEC vs Ripple case left the market speculating, especially after the November meeting which stirred unfounded rumors of an early resolution. Coupled with the ongoing discovery process related to remedies, the legal entanglements with the SEC keep casting a shadow over the future prospects of XRP, regardless of recent buyer enthusiasm.
Ripple (XRP) Technical Analysis
Source: TradingView
Technically, Ripple (XRP) is trading between $0.5373 and $0.7121. The Relative Strength Index (RSI) of 54.64 indicates neither overbought, nor oversold conditions, suggesting a neutral market sentiment. The Stochastic %K at 75.13 is tilting towards overbought territory, which might signal a potential pullback. The Average Directional Index (ADI) at 18.84 shows a lack of strong trend, and the Commodity Channel Index (CCI) at 182.141 suggests that XRP could be entering a period of overvaluation. The MACD Level at 0.00426 also supports the possibility of a near-term correction. However, the Simple and Exponential Moving Averages (SMAs and EMAs), both 10-day and 200-day, are hovering close to the current price, indicating a potential consolidation phase.
Ripple (XRP) Price Prediction
In a bullish scenario, if Ripple (XRP) breaks above the $0.7121 resistance, the next targets would be $0.8178 and $0.9926, with continued accumulation by XRP whales and positive developments in the SEC case potentially driving momentum. Conversely, in a bearish outlook, failure to sustain above the $0.5373 support could see the asset testing lower defense lines at $0.4683 and $0.2935.
The ongoing SEC litigation and potential appeals extending into 2025 create a backdrop of uncertainty which hinders the growth of XRP, nonetheless, the outcome of the SEC vs Coinbase case may alter the trajectory. Next to that, strong community support for XRP is another crucial factor stimulating altcoin's resilience and potential for recovery as emphasized by its CEO Brad Garlinghouse.
Cosmos (ATOM): Bracing for Impact Amidst Circle's Big Move
Cosmos (ATOM) is currently in the spotlight with some intriguing developments: the game-changer was when Circle launched its Cross-Chain Transfer Protocol on Cosmos’ mainnet, bringing a new edge to how USDC operates within the ecosystem. This is a big deal for ATOM which can potentially ramp up the utility of USDC by making cross-chain transactions smoother. On the flip side, there's some drama brewing in the Cosmos (ATOM) community: Jae Kwon, one of the co-founders, is stirring the pot with his plan to create AtomOne, a fork of the Cosmos Hub. Coming hot on the heels of a community vote to trim down inflation, this decision has everyone talking about what it means for the future of ATOM.
Cosmos (ATOM) Technical Analysis
Source: TradingView
Technically speaking, Cosmos (ATOM) is hovering between $7.657 and $10.704. The numbers paint a curious picture – the RSI is at a pretty balanced 58.06, hinting at some cautious optimism among traders. The Stochastic %K is a tad high at 70.69, which could mean ATOM is getting a bit ahead of itself. But the ADX at 37.36 suggests the trend is getting stronger, and the MACD at 0.305 is nodding along to the bullish beat. The CCI at 94.509 also hints at a rising wave of optimism among traders, with the asset's upward trend gaining steam and edging close to the overbought zone.The moving averages, both SMAs and EMAs, are huddling around $9, suggesting this area could be a bit of a battleground for buyers and sellers.
Cosmos (ATOM) Price Prediction
So, what’s next for Cosmos (ATOM)? If the Cosmos ecosystem can leverage these new developments and if the Osmosis-Umee merger pans out well, we might see ATOM stride confidently towards its higher resistance levels. In this scenario, $12.159 and possibly even $15.206 could be within reach. However, there's always another side to the coin – if the market gets jittery about these changes or views the AtomOne fork with skepticism, Cosmos (ATOM) might find itself backpedaling to its lower support levels at $6.065 and $3.018. The key question on everyone’s mind is whether the current dip is just a small bump in the road or a sign of deeper concerns within the ATOM community.
Arbitrum (ARB): Orbit Launch Fueling Market Surge
Arbitrum (ARB) is currently a standout in the Layer 2 (L2) network arena as it leads in L2 transactions, peaking at an extraordinary 2.8 million in a single day. While its fee performance is still catching up, the Total Value Locked (TVL) impressively exceeds $2.1 billion, giving Arbitrum (ARB) a significant market presence. The journey of ARB gets even more interesting with the introduction of the Orbit Layer-3 application system on Arbitrum's mainnet. Since its launch on October 27, Orbit has been a catalyst for growth, giving developers a much-needed boost which has led to more active addresses and a bump in trade volume on the network.
Arbitrum (ARB) Technical Analysis
Source: TradingView
Currently, Arbitrum (ARB) is trading in a critical range, finding support at $0.878 and facing resistance at $1.1809. The RSI stands at 50.17, indicating a neutral market sentiment, while the Stochastic %K is at 51.44, suggesting a slight edge towards buying interest. The ADI at a low 16.68 points to a lack of strong trend direction. Additionally, the CCI at 46.02 reinforces this neutral stance. The MACD level at 0.0108 hints at a marginal bullish crossover, suggesting a potential uptick in momentum.
Arbitrum (ARB) Price Prediction
The future for ARB could swing in either direction: should it break above $1.1809, there's room for growth towards $1.3546, and potentially $1.6575, especially if the ADI starts to increase, signaling a strengthening trend. Conversely, a drop below $0.878 could see Arbitrum (ARB) sliding towards $0.7488 and possibly $0.4459, if bearish momentum builds. Traders will be closely watching the interplay between the ARB price, its moving averages – with the 10-day SMA at $1.0569 and the 200-day EMA at $1.0684 – and other technical indicators to gauge the currency's next move.
Conclusion
Looking forward, the paths for Ripple (XRP), Cosmos (ATOM) and Arbitrum (ARB) are filled with excitement and uncertainty: XRP balances legal challenges with strong market interest; ATOM teeters on the edge of technological breakthroughs; and ARB forges ahead in Layer 2 innovation. Their journeys are more than just market trends – they're about the vibrant ups and downs of the crypto world, painting a picture of an adventurous and unpredictable future.
Disclaimer: This is a sponsored article and is for informational purposes only. It does not reflect the views of Crypto Daily, nor is it intended to be used as legal, tax, investment, or financial advice.


2023-12-07 15:28:55.794797
XRP (XRP) Rises 1.39% Thursday: What's Next for This Bullish Rated Crypto?
XRP has a Bullish sentiment reading. Find out what this means for you and get the rest of the rankings on XRP!


2023-12-07 12:28:55.805162
Ripple-Backed Inheriti to Launch on XRP Ledger
Inheriti, an innovative digital inheritance platform is set to launch on the XRP Ledger.
The functionalities of Inheriti will be enhanced with planned EVM integration.
Exciting developments are underway in the crypto ecosystem, particularly on the XRP Ledger (XRPL), as Inheriti, the world’s first decentralized data backup and inheritance solution, announces its integration into the XRPL. Blockchain researcher Collin Brown shared the news on X, emphasizing the significance of this move for both the XRP Ledger and Ripple Labs Inc.
🚀 Exciting news for #XRP Ledger and #Ripple! 🌐 Inheriti, the world's first decentralized data backup and inheritance solution, is making its way to #XRPL, thanks to a strategic partnership with Safe Haven. 📦 This collaboration promises enhanced security and access management… pic.twitter.com/33lccEWf9s — Collin Brown (@CollinBrownXRP) December 7, 2023
Anodos Partnership with Safe Haven
In a strategic move, Anodos, the driving force behind Inheriti, has partnered with Safe Haven to integrate the SHA token and Inheriti into the XRP Ledger. Panos Mekras, co-founder and CFO of Anodos shared the partnership announcement in a post, highlighting the collaboration’s potential for enhanced security and access management for digital assets, including Non-Fungible Tokens (NFTs).
The partnership involves the issuance of the SHA IOU on the XRPL, enabling crypto enthusiasts to trade SHA tokens on the XRPL’s Decentralized Exchange (DEX) and the upcoming Automated Market Maker (AMM). Anodos is also developing AnodoSwap, a one-stop trading and portfolio management platform on the XRPL.
According to reports, AnodoSwap will feature SHA on its platform upon launch, and an SHA/XRP liquidity pool will be created to bolster the token’s liquidity. The partnership will unfold in two phases, with the first phase commencing in January 2024, involving the issuance of 10 million SHA tokens on the XRPL network. The second phase will follow the launch of the EVM sidechain on XRPL, integrating Inheriti into Safe Haven’s SafeSwap.
The XRPL’s progress toward welcoming the EVM sidechain received a significant boost with a successful audit by cybersecurity firm Bishop Fox. Once the EVM sidechain is live on XRPL, Inheriti plans can be conveniently created by paying with SHA tokens through the Xumm wallet.
In a fascinating development, a recent report from Crypto News Flash shared insights into the distribution of XRP transactions. Unlike the consistent frequency of remittances during weekdays and holidays, the analysis revealed a significant pattern in transaction values.
The highest value remittances in XRP were found to be prominently concentrated on weekdays. Graphs from the XRP block explorer, XRPScan, visually represent these findings, providing a detailed perspective on daily XRP-based transaction statistics. These insights are vital to showcase the deep liquidity pool Inheriti will gain access to in the long term.
Inheriti: A Digital Inheritance Solution
Inheriti, originally launched on the VeChain mainnet in September 2020, it is a digital inheritance solution designed to provide advanced security in transferring access to digital assets, social media accounts, NFTs, and digital data. The solution employs a robust 3-layer topology to encrypt and store users’ data securely, including blockchain and cold storage.
Accessible to users of all technical backgrounds, Inheriti simplifies the process by splitting data into unreadable, secret, and encrypted shares. These encrypted pieces are then distributed across various cold storage devices. The safe key holder can reconstruct the shares into Inheriti to decrypt the data.
Users can create a lifetime Inheriti plan for the price of 10,000 SHA, equivalent to $5.128 at the time of writing.
Crypto News Flash does not endorse and is not responsible for or liable for any content, accuracy, quality, advertising, products, or other materials on this page. Readers should do their own research before taking any actions related to cryptocurrencies. Crypto News Flash is not responsible, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with the use of or reliance on any content, goods, or services mentioned.


2023-12-06 23:28:55.788076
XRP December 2023 Price Prediction
Amidst the surge in the cryptocurrency market to new yearly peaks, Ripple’s XRP token faces a critical juncture. It has been striving to surpass a persistent resistance barrier set at $0.6404. Despite the positive momentum observed across the broader market, XRP has consistently encountered resistance at this crucial level, underscoring its significance as a substantial liquidation point.
Recent Price Trends
Over the recent weeks, the price of Ripple fluctuated within a narrow range, oscillating between $0.5374 and $0.5730. However, a noteworthy shift occurred as the price gained momentum, breaking free from this range with an approximately 8% surge. This upward movement was short-lived, encountering resistance at $0.6177, highlighting the ongoing challenge for XRP to breach pivotal levels.
Also Read: BRICS: Less Than 10% Of Russian Oil Sold In US Dollars
Sideways Trading and Positive Momentum
Following this, the token entered a phase of sideways trading, maintaining stability for nearly a week. Nevertheless, a renewed bullish momentum emerged, propelling the asset to successfully overcome multiple resistance levels, resulting in a substantial 17% increase in value. This resurgence suggests a potential shift in market sentiment favoring XRP, although obstacles persist with looming resistance levels.
Projections for December 2023
Looking ahead to December 2023, cryptocurrency experts, as per Changelly’s reports, offer insights into potential price movements for XRP. The projected minimum trading cost for the asset during December is anticipated to be around $0.619, establishing a foundational level for potential support. On the optimistic side, experts suggest a maximum price reaching $0.810 for the month, reflecting a positive scenario for XRP.
Also Read: Here’s When XRP Is Forecasted To Reach $3
Average XRP Value Prediction
Changelly’s experts forecast an average XRP value of approximately $0.714 for December 2023. This prediction serves as a midpoint between the envisaged minimum and maximum values, providing investors and enthusiasts with a reference point for evaluating potential price fluctuations during the month.
Influencing Factors on XRP Price
Various factors contribute to the unpredictability surrounding XRP’s price movements. Market sentiment, regulatory developments, and technological advancements within the Ripple network can significantly influence XRP’s performance. Traders and investors are advised to remain vigilant to external influences that may shape the trajectory of this digital asset.
Also Read: Ripple: Whale Moves $30M To Exchanges, Will XRP Dip To $0.50?
As Ripple’s XRP navigates the intricate landscape of resistance levels, the December 2023 price forecast presents a dynamic scenario. While the cryptocurrency has displayed resilience and bullish momentum, challenges persist in overcoming key resistance points. The projections from cryptocurrency experts offer valuable insights into potential price ranges, with the average forecast of $0.714 serving as a benchmark amid the ever-changing market dynamics. As the month unfolds, the cryptocurrency community will closely monitor XRP’s performance, taking into account broader market trends and unique factors shaping the destiny of this digital asset.


2023-12-07 15:28:55.808414
SOL & XRP brace for decline; eTukTuk ($TUK) presale buzz rises
Home » Journal SOL & XRP brace for decline; eTukTuk ($TUK) presale buzz rises Journal SOL & XRP brace for decline; eTukTuk ($TUK) presale buzz rises Torsten Hartmann
The current market situation remains bullish for major cryptos like Bitcoin and Ethereum as they witness massive highs. Investors are eyeing potential shifts in these cryptocurrencies and are anticipating the next eTukTuk ($TUK) presale to bring significant returns. eTukTuk’s ($TUK), being the new contender in the crypto landscape, is all set to revolutionize the transportation industry, fostering a greener environment by reducing carbon dioxide emissions. In this article, we will focus on leading cryptocurrencies in the market, such as Solana and XRP, and how eTukTuk is expected to outshine investors’ expectations in the cryptocurrency landscape.
Solana’s price action and potential decline
Solana is currently trading at $63.55 with a trading volume of $27,067,141,478. It ranks 6 in the list of top cryptocurrencies by CoinMarketCap, with a circulating supply of 425,925,747 SOL coins.
Solana’s price rise could be attributed to the sudden growth in the use of decentralized applications and an increase in non-fungible tokens or NFT volumes. Moreover, the network also experienced upgrades that enhanced user privacy through confidential transfers using zero-knowledge proofs. Overall, these developments have brought improvements to the Solana Network through security, privacy, and efficiency.
However, even as SOL continues to witness progress, external factors such as the bankruptcy drama surrounding the popular crypto exchange FTX have made the $23 resistance more difficult to breach than expected.
XRP’s price action and possible downturn
XRP is currently trading at $0.63 with a trading volume of $1,977,104,901. It ranks 5 in the list of top cryptocurrencies by CoinMarketCap, with a circulating supply of 53,888,571,585 XRP coins.
XRP has experienced substantial price surges due to several factors such as embracement by financial and banking entities and an increase in collaborations and partnerships with other platforms. Additionally, positive regulatory news has also caused an uptrend in XRP price.
However, the overall macroeconomic and market sentiment factors might affect XRP value, and there could be a possible downturn in the days to come.
eTukTuk’s presale surpasses expectations
While Solana and XRP are ruling in the cryptocurrency market with their price movements, profitable investments have attracted investors to the crypto market. Along with this, eTukTuk has gained traction in the same landscape by aiming to change how the transport industry works and promoting a cleaner environment for developing nations. eTukTuk is the first sustainable automotive crypto project developed on Binance that leverages AI and Blockchain technologies to create a greener environment through its state-of-the-art $TUK, eliminate reduce carbon emissions, and help drivers of eTukTuk to earn revenue.
eTukTuk ($TUK) presale has projected spectacular success, raising over $310,000 and currently trading at $0.025 per token. eTukTuk’s ecosystem is powered by $TUK, driving growth, financial, and inclusivity on the platform. It has a limited circulating supply of $2 billion in $TUK. eTukTuk provides all its stakeholders with rewarding opportunities for making payments in its native token for EVs and charging stations.
Join eTukTuk ($TUK) Presale Now
Any investor who wants to participate in the eTukTuk community and presale needs to buy and stake in $TUK, which is the foundation of the ecosystem. The token powers the AI and blockchain technology on the platform, optimizing routes for reduced traffic and minimum fuel consumption. Through this, eTukTuk promotes a more reliable and sustainable environment for everyone to live in.
Currently, the $TUK presale is going on with an ever-expanding eTukTuk’s charging stations, hitting more than 80,000 users. This is an excellent achievement for eTukTuk’s team of developers, who have bent backward, working endlessly for five years to make this project a big success.
Conclusion
In conclusion, favorable macroeconomic conditions, positive regulatory updates, policies, and increased activities in decentralized applications and non-fungible tokens have contributed to the rise of Solana, XRP, and eTukTuk in terms of popularity.
While the current bullish market has significantly coincided with the rising prices of SOL and XRP, eTukTuk ($TUK) presale has surpassed investors’ expectations as the consecutive presales have become a hit in the industry.
The crypto market is influenced by different factors like government regulations, market demand and supply, media hype, and user sentiment, which makes the market highly volatile.
Although 2022 witnessed a bearish market for major cryptocurrencies like Solana and XRP, in 2023, these tokens have experienced an uptrend, and $TUK has also joined them, projecting rising prices, attracting more investors, and encouraging them to be a part of the eTukTuk landscape.
Visit eTukTuk ($TUK) Presale Now
Website | Twitter | Youtube | Telegram | Instagram
Disclaimer: We advise readers to do their own research before interacting with any featured companies. The information provided is not financial or legal advice. Neither CaptainAltcoin nor any third party recommends buying or selling any financial products. Investing in cryptoassets is high-risk; consider the potential for loss. CaptainAltcoin is not liable for any damages or losses from using or relying on this content.
How are regular people making returns of as much as 70% in a year with no risk? By properly setting up a FREE Pionex grid bot - click the button to learn more. Crypto arbitrage still works like a charm, if you do it right! Check out Alphador, leading crypto arbitrage bot to learn the best way of doing it.


2023-12-07 15:32:55.789556
Is XRP in Danger of Collapsing Toward $0.54? (Ripple Price Analysis)
XRP’s price has been consolidating over the last few weeks on the USDT pair.
It is yet to show any significant desire to either drop or rally. However, against BTC, things are looking different.
Technical Analysis
By TradingRage
Ripple Price Analysis: The USDT Chart
Against USDT, the price has been supported by the $0.6 level. Yet, it has not rebounded with any considerable bullish momentum. In case this level holds, the price can rise toward the $0.72 resistance level in the short term.
On the other hand, a breakdown of the $0.6 level would result in a drop to the 200-day moving average, which is not far away, trending near the $0.54 mark.
Needless to say, a decline below the 200-day moving average would be very bearish, as the next significant support level lies at the $0.45 area.
The BTC Paired Chart
Against BTC, the price has been constantly making lower highs and lower lows. It has already broken both the 1800 SAT and the 1600 SAT support levels to the downside.
However, the market is likely to pull back to the broken 1600 SAT zone, which has now turned into a resistance level, as the price action suggests.
The relative strength index is also showing an oversold signal, further boosting the probability of such a pullback occurring in the coming days. A rejection from the level would then pave the way for a further drop toward the 1250 SAT support zone.


2023-12-06 19:28:55.822080
Buy XRP, not Bitcoin, analyst suggests – Crypto News BTC
The JWK Present’s crypto analyst predicts XRP’s rise and anticipates short-term Bitcoin positive factors awaiting a doable ETF approval.
The analyst revealed he invested personally in XRP, buying and selling round $0.62 on the time of his video. He mentioned he “purchased much more XRP” on Dec. third primarily based on particular technical evaluation alerts.
Primarily based on the charts proper now, we predict XRP to maneuver up. We predict XRP to clear these highs at across the $0.71 mark. We’ll see if that performs out. JWK Present
Past the analyst’s technical evaluation, he believes broader positive factors within the crypto market, catalyzed by Bitcoin’s (BTC) rally, stand to learn XRP. Moreover, the analyst sees little potential in Bitcoin investments:
Bitcoin going up is nice for all the crypto market. It’s good for XRP. It’s good for ETH. It’s good for all cash and so forth. However there’s not a lot positive factors for Bitcoin. Even when Bitcoin goes to, let’s say, $100,000 and also you invested at $20,000, which barely anybody did, that’s solely a 5x in your funding. There’s little or no cash to make in Bitcoin. JWK Present
The analyst additionally famous latest information exhibiting that the XRP-USD buying and selling pair ranks because the fifth hottest in crypto, regardless of XRP sitting eighth amongst digital belongings by market capitalization.
The analyst believes crypto adoption is accelerating shortly, particularly in buying and selling exercise. He expects “a speedy acceleration in crypto adoption” within the years forward, which may present tailwinds for XRP alongside Bitcoin and the broader crypto area.
Comply with Us on Google Information


2023-12-06 22:28:55.824528
The Case So Far as of December 6th – Crypto News BTC
TL;DR
Ripple’s authorized battle with the SEC continues, awaiting a decision in spring 2024 regardless of rumors of an early settlement.
A July ruling favored Ripple by stating previous XRP gross sales weren’t funding contract provides, resulting in a short lived benefit within the ongoing case.
Ripple received partial victories together with dismissal of SEC appeals and clearing of govt costs, with a decisive April trial anticipated to affect the crypto sector’s outlook.
What’s New Across the Ripple vs. SEC Saga?
The continued authorized battle between Ripple and the USA Securities and Change Fee (SEC) hasn’t supplied a lot motion these days and appears to be ready for the decision subsequent yr. Nonetheless, there are a number of developments which can be value observing.
For one, America’s securities regulator convened a confidential assembly on the finish of November the place it touched upon particular matters, together with Establishment and settlement of injunctive actions, Establishment and settlement of administrative proceedings, Decision of litigation claims, and others.
This gave conspiracy idea followers the chance to speculate that some form of decision between the SEC and Ripple may be introduced sooner than anticipated. Nevertheless, this wasn’t the case, and the lawsuit stays to be resolved within the spring of 2024.
A Temporary Recap of the Ripple/SEC Conflict
The entire drama between the 2 entities began in December 2020 when the SEC filed a lawsuit towards Ripple, accusing it of promoting XRP (the native token of the blockchain enterprise) in an unregistered safety providing.
The battle has gone by way of quite a few levels, with each organizations firing pictures at one another. A pivotal second occurred in mid-July this yr when a US Federal Decide ruled that Ripple’s XRP gross sales from years in the past didn’t represent a suggestion of funding contracts. This boosted the value of the asset and gave the crypto agency a short lived higher hand within the conflict.
Furthermore, Ripple secured two further partial victories within the following months. The American magistrates dismissed the SEC’s try to attraction the preliminary resolution, whereas CEO – Brad Garlinghouse – and Govt Chairman – Chris Larsen – have been cleared of all costs introduced by the watchdog.
A grand trial scheduled for April subsequent yr is meant to disclose the result of the prolonged saga. A doable decisive win for Ripple may set off additional enthusiasm in the whole cryptocurrency sector, whereas an SEC victory may have the other impact.


2023-12-06 18:28:55.800620
World Bridge Currency: Will XRP Be Used As a Bridge Currency?
XRP has been considered by some as a potential bridge currency due to its fast transaction speeds and low fees. Ripple develops global financial products like the XRP Ledger and RippleNet, which are designed to streamline intra-bank transactions, which could help XRP become a global bridge currency.
In this article, we are going to examine what a bridge currency is, whether Ripple and XRP could become the go-to bridge currency solution down the road, and what XRP’s investment prospects are.
Key takeaways: A bridge currency acts as a go-between for currencies or financial systems, smoothing transactions when direct exchanges between currencies aren't feasible.
Ripple, via its XRP cryptocurrency, is aiming to harness blockchain for financial solutions, specifically focusing on bridging financial institutions, currencies, and systems. Leveraging the ISO 20022 standard helps it provide a common language for financial data exchange.
XRP's potential as a bridge currency within RippleNet lies in its ability to facilitate faster and more efficient cross-border transactions between various fiat currencies, although not all transactions on RippleNet involve XRP.
While XRP holds promise as a crucial asset in the financial landscape, dubbing it as the next Bitcoin might be a stretch. XRP's current market cap and potential, including its partnerships and pending IPO, contribute to its appeal but likely won't be enough to surpass Bitcoin.
What is a world bridge currency?
A bridge currency is a type of intermediary currency that facilitates transactions between two different currencies or financial systems. It serves as a medium of exchange to enable smoother and more efficient transactions when direct exchange between two currencies might be difficult or impractical.
For instance, if two countries have their own currencies and want to trade but don't have a direct currency pair, a bridge currency like the US dollar or a widely accepted cryptocurrency could be used as an intermediary.
A bridge currency can help make transfers between different systems more efficient, faster, and secure. Ripple – with its suite of financial solutions powered by the XRP cryptocurrency – is aiming to leverage the power of blockchain technology to provide a bridge between various financial institutions, currencies, and systems.
One of the ways Ripple is actively pursuing the role of a world bridge currency is through the implementation of the ISO 20022 standard, which is an international standard for financial messaging that provides a common language and structure for the exchange of electronic data between financial institutions, including blockchain projects.
Will XRP be used as a bridge currency?
Whether XRP will eventually be used as a global bridge currency depends on the adoption of Ripple’s services in products, primarily the XRP Ledger (XRPL) and RippleNet, a global network for banks and payment providers.
So what are XRPL and RippleNet, and how do the two products interact? Let’s begin with a simple description of each before we proceed:
RippleNet is a network designed to facilitate seamless and quick cross-border payments for financial institutions, banks, and other payment providers. It uses a set of rules and protocols to enable these entities to conduct transactions efficiently, reducing both the time and cost involved in cross-border transfers.
is a network designed to facilitate seamless and quick cross-border payments for financial institutions, banks, and other payment providers. It uses a set of rules and protocols to enable these entities to conduct transactions efficiently, reducing both the time and cost involved in cross-border transfers. XRP Ledger is an open-source blockchain that serves as a decentralized ledger that supports the digital asset XRP. It's not limited to Ripple's use but is open for anyone to build upon and utilize for various applications beyond just payments.
The connection between RippleNet and the XRP Ledger lies in the potential use of XRP as a bridge currency for cross-border transactions within the RippleNet network. While not all transactions on RippleNet necessarily involve XRP, XRP's speed, and liquidity can be leveraged as an intermediary currency to facilitate faster and more efficient cross-border transactions between different fiat currencies.
In short, RippleNet provides the infrastructure and framework for financial institutions to connect and transact, while the XRP Ledger and its native asset, XRP, offer the potential for increased liquidity and cost savings within this network.
A graphic showing how the current intra-bank communication works (on the left), and how XRP could act as an intermediary that drastically reduces the scope of bank interactions and transactions. Image source: Ripple
Is XRP the next Bitcoin?
XRP has a lot of potential to become a very important asset in the future, not just within the cryptocurrency space but also within the broader financial landscape. However, “the next Bitcoin” is a very tall task to clear for any project, and, frankly, we can’t see XRP displacing Bitcoin as the world’s leading crypto asset in terms of market cap.
Even if XRP succeeds in becoming a bridge currency that financial institutions around the world are using for their intra-banking transactions, it’s hard to envision that XRP would surpass Bitcoin. While not a perfect analogy, we can take payment companies like Visa and Mastercard as an example. Between those two, more than 100 million merchants worldwide are using their products and networks, and they currently have about the same combined market cap as BTC (about $868 billion).
Also, XRP is already the 5th largest cryptocurrency in terms of market capitalization, controlling a nearly $35 billion market share. The currency reached its ATH of $3.92 in early 2018. At the moment, XRP is trading at about $0.62 per coin, over -84% removed from its peak value. If XRP were to revisit its previous ATH, it would have a market capitalization of $211 billion, which is (very roughly speaking) in the same ballpark as the market caps of Visa and Mastercard.
A likely catalyst that could help XRP revisit its previous ATH is the potential Ripple initial public offering (IPO), which Ripple’s CEO Brad Garlinghouse said the company would pursue once the lawsuit between the SEC and Ripple is completed.
Is XRP a good investment?
XRP is trading significantly below its ATH, has real-world utility thanks to Ripple’s partnerships with large corporations, and could benefit from a successful resolution of the SEC case; all these factors speak in favor of XRP being a good investment. Let’s explore each of these reasons in more detail:
High-profile partnerships: Companies like Santander, Imperial Bank of Canada, Central Bank of Georgia, and over 100 other firms are members of RippleNet, a global payments network that supports XRP.
Companies like Santander, Imperial Bank of Canada, Central Bank of Georgia, and over 100 other firms are members of RippleNet, a global payments network that supports XRP. The SEC lawsuit: Earlier this year, Ripple won an important victory in its case against the regulator, when the presiding judge ruled that XRP sold on exchanges to retail investors is not subject to securities laws. The ruling opened the door for a successful resolution of the whole case and the potential Ripple IPO.
Earlier this year, Ripple won an important victory in its case against the regulator, when the presiding judge ruled that XRP sold on exchanges to retail investors is not subject to securities laws. The ruling opened the door for a successful resolution of the whole case and the potential Ripple IPO. Trading far below its ATH: XRP had shown the ability to trade over +500% above its current price levels when the cryptocurrency market as a whole was smaller, constrained by worse liquidity and fewer capital inflows. If XRP were to mount a significant rally going forward, XRP could easily surpass its previous ATH and potentially even surpass $10 down the road.
XRP had shown the ability to trade over +500% above its current price levels when the cryptocurrency market as a whole was smaller, constrained by worse liquidity and fewer capital inflows. If XRP were to mount a significant rally going forward, XRP could easily surpass its previous ATH and potentially even surpass $10 down the road. High-speed, low-cost transactions: Given its focus on cross-border transactions, it’s no wonder that Ripple is one of the fastest and cheapest crypto networks in the space. An XRP transaction on the XRP Ledger takes 3-5 seconds and costs just a fraction of the cent, giving it a solid advantage over most crypto projects and virtually all traditional payment protocols.
How high can XRP realistically go?
According to our XRP price prediction, XRP could experience a strong rally to $1.65 by June 2024, about 2 months after the next Bitcoin halving. After that, the algorithm expects the price of XRP to move in a negative direction before a major spike in 2028 could see the currency reach $2.90 per coin.
For an even longer time scale and different pricing models, check out our XRP price predictions for 2040 and 2050.
The bottom line
Whether XRP can succeed in becoming the world’s leading bridge currency hinges on Ripple’s ability to attract new partnerships and position its XRP Ledger and RippleNet products as a viable alternative to traditional payment systems.
It is worth noting that XRP is one of the most popular cryptocurrencies out there, distributed among over 4.8 million addresses. To learn how XRP is disturbed and who are the biggest owners, check out our XRP rich list.


2023-12-07 01:28:55.812073
Binance Unveils Zero-Fee Trading for XRP: Details
Crypto giant Binance is spicing things up with zero-fee trading for select pairs, including the popular cryptocurrency XRP. This move comes amid a crypto breakout, as Bitcoin recently surged to trade above $44,000.
The zero-fee trading is scheduled to start on December 8 at 00:00 UTC, this bold initiative is a calculated move to capitalize on the burgeoning crypto rally. It also marks a significant deviation from the traditional fee-based structure and signals Binance’s intent to attract a wide range of traders.
Read Also: Trading Pairs Delisted By Binance That Affect SHIB, ADA, and XRP Holders: Details
Binance shared this news on X. The tokens involved in this promotion include established heavyweights like Ethereum (ETH), XRP, Binance Coin (BNB), Solana (SOL), Dogecoin (DOGE), and Chainlink (LINK).
Benefits of Binance’s Promotion
By eliminating maker and taker fees for these designated pairs, Binance effectively removes a major barrier to entry for new and cost-conscious traders. This decision enhances accessibility and fosters a more competitive trading environment, potentially leading to tighter spreads and increased liquidity.
However, it is crucial to note that this is a limited-time offer. The zero-fee window will remain open for an unspecified duration, urging potential participants to seize the opportunity. Binance has also introduced a one-hour interest fee waiver for margin trading on various crypto pairs to further incentivize participation.
This promotion extends until December 18 at 09:00 UTC. This essentially translates to a free borrowing window for leverage-seeking traders, adding another layer of intrigue to the overall proposition.
Notably, trading volume accumulated during the promotion will be excluded from VIP tier volume calculations and Liquidity Provider programs. Additionally, any existing fee discounts or adjustments will not apply to these specific pairs.
Once the promotion concludes, standard trading fees will resume. Focusing on the specifics, the designated pairs eligible for this fee-free bonanza are BNB/FDUSD, DOGE/FDUSD, ETH/FDUSD, LINK/FDUSD, SOL/FDUSD, XRP/FDUSD.
We are on twitter, follow us to connect with us :- @TimesTabloid1 — TimesTabloid (@TimesTabloid1) July 15, 2023
Read Also: XRP Price Abruptly Surged To $5,791 On Binance. Pundits Speculate On Likely Cause
XRP’s Reaction
Currently, XRP is trading at $0.621. Its trading volume has a significant 25.98% decline over the last 24 hours. However, Binance’s new initiative could give it a boost as excited traders join the market.
<
By strategically selecting popular and promising tokens, eliminating transaction fees, and adding additional incentives, Binance could attract a wider audience, enhance market liquidity, and potentially increase its dominance among crypto Exchanges.
Whether this move will yield long-term success remains to be seen, but Binance has continued making newsworthy moves in the crypto space, just like the recent listing of new trading pairs that got the Terra Classic community excited.
Follow us on Twitter, Facebook, Telegram, and Google News


2023-12-06 20:28:55.800142
Cryptocurrencies Price Prediction: XRP, Solana & Coinbase – American Wrap 6 December
On Dec. 5, ARK dumped as many as 237,572 Coinbase shares from its three funds, according to a trade notification seen by Cointelegraph. The sale came on the day the Coinbase stock closed at $140 per share, netting at least $33 million.
Bonk, a Shiba Inu-themed token first issued last December, has returned over 1,000% in the past month amid a capital inflow to the Solana blockchain and an increase in riskier bets on tokens based on the network.
XRP price has been moving sideways for the past few days after greatly benefitting from the partial win it attained in the lawsuit filed by the Securities & Exchange Commission (SEC). However, Ripple’s CEO decided that the credit largely goes not to himself or the company but to its supporters.
Information on these pages contains forward-looking statements that involve risks and uncertainties. Markets and instruments profiled on this page are for informational purposes only and should not in any way come across as a recommendation to buy or sell in these assets. You should do your own thorough research before making any investment decisions. FXStreet does not in any way guarantee that this information is free from mistakes, errors, or material misstatements. It also does not guarantee that this information is of a timely nature. Investing in Open Markets involves a great deal of risk, including the loss of all or a portion of your investment, as well as emotional distress. All risks, losses and costs associated with investing, including total loss of principal, are your responsibility. The views and opinions expressed in this article are those of the authors and do not necessarily reflect the official policy or position of FXStreet nor its advertisers. The author will not be held responsible for information that is found at the end of links posted on this page.
If not otherwise explicitly mentioned in the body of the article, at the time of writing, the author has no position in any stock mentioned in this article and no business relationship with any company mentioned. The author has not received compensation for writing this article, other than from FXStreet.
FXStreet and the author do not provide personalized recommendations. The author makes no representations as to the accuracy, completeness, or suitability of this information. FXStreet and the author will not be liable for any errors, omissions or any losses, injuries or damages arising from this information and its display or use. Errors and omissions excepted.
The author and FXStreet are not registered investment advisors and nothing in this article is intended to be investment advice.


2023-12-06 20:28:55.795735
Price analysis 12/6: BTC, ETH, BNB, XRP, SOL, ADA, DOGE, AVAX, LINK, TON
Bitcoin (BTC) has been on a tear, rising more than 10% this week. This shows that traders are urgently scrambling to buy Bitcoin as they anticipate the price to rally further. CoinShares data shows that investors have pumped in more than $1.44 billion into Bitcoin investment products in the past ten weeks.
The expectation is that the approval of a spot Bitcoin exchange-traded fund (ETF) will attract huge investments. Animoca Brands CEO Robby Yung, while speaking at the Next Block Expo conference in Berlin, said that Bitcoin ETFs could generate a potential income of “$10 to $12 billion.”
Daily cryptocurrency market performance. Source: Coin360
While long-term investors have been accumulating Bitcoin, the short-term holders (STHs) holding coins for 155 days or less have been busy booking profits in December. CryptoSlate research and data analyst James Van Straten, while sharing a Glassnode chart on X (formerly Twitter), said that STHs in profit sent roughly $5 billion worth of Bitcoin to exchanges in the first four days of December.
Could Bitcoin continue its up-move and reach $48,000, or will profit-booking set in? Let’s analyze the charts of the top 10 cryptocurrencies to find out.
Bitcoin price analysis
Bitcoin has been in a strong uptrend. The momentum picked up after the bulls catapulted the price above $40,000. The minor resistance at $41,160 has been cleared with ease.
BTC/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The rally of the past few days has sent the relative strength index (RSI) into deeply overbought territory. This usually starts a correction or consolidation, but the bulls are in no mood to slow down. Buyers will try to drive the BTC/USDT pair to the target objective at $48,000, which is likely to act as a formidable resistance.
Any dips from the current level are likely to find support at the 20-day exponential moving average ($39,0803). A break below this level will be the first sign that the traders are rushing to the exit. That may signal the start of a short-term corrective phase.
Ether price analysis
Ether’s (ETH) long tail on the Dec. 5 candlestick shows that the bulls thwarted attempts by the bears to yank the price back below the breakout level of $2,200.
ETH/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The upsloping moving averages and the RSI in the overbought zone indicate that bulls are in command. The break above $2,200 has completed an ascending triangle pattern, which may start a rally to $2,500 and then to $2,950.
On the other hand, the bears will try to pull the price below $2,200 and trap the aggressive bulls. The ETH/USDT pair could then slide to the 20-day EMA ($2,104). A break and close below this support could open the doors for a fall to the 50-day SMA ($1,940).
BNB price analysis
The bears are trying to defend the moving averages, but the bulls have not given up much ground. This suggests that BNB (BNB) could rise to $239.20.
BNB/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The flattish 20-day EMA ($232) and the RSI just below the midpoint signals a balance between buyers and sellers. If the price turns down sharply from $239.20, the range-bound action may continue for some more time.
On the other hand, a break above $239.20 will tilt the advantage in favor of the bulls. The BNB/USDT pair could then climb to the overhead resistance at $265. Sellers will seize control if they pull the price below $223. That could start a decline to $203.
XRP price analysis
The bears tried to shove XRP (XRP) back below the 20-day EMA ($0.62) on Dec. 4 and 5, but the long tail on the candlestick shows solid buying at lower levels.
XRP/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The bulls will strive to kick the price to $0.67, while the bears will try to stall the up-move at that level. On the way down, if the price rebounds off the 20-day EMA, it will improve the prospects of a rally to $0.74. Sellers will try to defend this level aggressively and keep the XRP/USDT pair stuck inside the range between $0.56 and $0.74 for some more time.
Meanwhile, the bears are likely to have other plans. They will try to drag the price back below the moving averages and challenge the support at $0.56.
Solana price analysis
Solana (SOL) is consolidating in an uptrend. The bears tried to pull the price below $59 on Dec. 5, but the bulls held their ground. This shows that the bulls are trying to flip the level into support.
SOL/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The bulls will try to strengthen their position further by pushing the price above $68.20. If they do that, it will invalidate the bearish head-and-shoulders pattern. The failure of a bearish pattern is a bullish sign as the early bears rush to cover their positions, causing a short squeeze. That could thrust the SOL/USDT pair toward $100.
Alternatively, if the price turns down sharply from $68.20, it will suggest that bears are active at higher levels. The bears will then try to sink the price below the 20-day EMA. If they succeed, the pair could dive to $51.
Cardano price analysis
Cardano (ADA) closed above the $0.40 resistance on Dec. 4, indicating that the uncertainty of the past few days resolved in favor of the bulls.
ADA/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The ADA/USDT pair is likely to climb to $0.46, where resistance may set in. If the price turns down from this level but does not fall below $0.40, it will enhance the prospects of an upside breakout. The pair may then skyrocket to $0.52.
The first sign of weakness will be a drop below $0.40. That will indicate that markets have rejected the higher levels. The bears will further gain strength if they tug the price below $0.38. The pair may subsequently tumble to $0.34.
Dogecoin price analysis
Dogecoin (DOGE) is in an uptrend. The bulls pushed the price above the minor resistance of $0.09 on Dec. 4 and followed it up with a move above the $0.10 resistance on Dec. 6.
DOGE/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The sharp rally of the past few days has pushed the RSI deep into the overbought territory, increasing the risk of a short-term pullback or consolidation. If buyers do not allow the price to slip below $0.09, the likelihood of a rally to $0.11 increases.
The bears are expected to defend the $0.11 level with all their might because if cleared, the DOGE/USDT pair could surge to $0.16. Conversely, if the price turns down and skids below $0.09, the pair may oscillate inside the large range between $0.11 and $0.06.
Related: Bitcoin is up 170% since the ECB called its ‘last gasp’ at $16.4K
Avalanche price analysis
Avalanche (AVAX) bounced off the 20-day EMA ($21.29) on Dec. 4, indicating that the sentiment remains bullish and traders are buying on dips.
AVAX/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
Buying continued on Dec. 5, and the bulls propelled the price above the overhead resistance at $24.69. This clears the path for a potential rally to $28.50 and thereafter to $31. The bears are expected to mount a strong defense at this level.
Time is running out for the bears. If they want to prevent the upside move, they will have to yank the price back below the breakout level of $22. Such a move may trap the aggressive bulls, resulting in long liquidation. The AVAX/USDT pair could then fall to $18.90.
Chainlink price analysis
Chainlink (LINK) has been trading near the overhead resistance of $16.60 for the past few days, indicating that the bulls are holding on to their positions as they expect an upside breakout.
LINK/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The 20-day EMA ($14.79) is sloping up, and the RSI is above 60, indicating a high possibility of an upside breakout. If $16.60 is scaled, the bullish momentum could pick up and the LINK/USDT pair could reach $18.30.
If bears want to prevent the upside, they will have to quickly drag the price below the 20-day EMA. That could sink the pair to the 50-day SMA ($13.05). This level is again likely to attract aggressive buying by the bulls.
Toncoin price analysis
Toncoin (TON) has been trading near the 20-day EMA ($2.39) for the past few days, indicating a lack of demand at higher levels.
TON/USDT daily chart. Source: TradingView
The 20-day EMA is flattening out, and the RSI is just below the midpoint, suggesting a balance between supply and demand. If the price slips below the 50-day SMA ($2.30), the TON/USDT pair could slump to $2.
On the upside, the bulls will have to drive the price above the $2.52 to $2.59 resistance zone to gain the upper hand. If they succeed, the pair will complete a bullish ascending triangle pattern, which has a target objective of $3.58.
This article does not contain investment advice or recommendations. Every investment and trading move involves risk, and readers should conduct their own research when making a decision.


2023-12-07 10:28:55.804206
How XRP Could Surge To $1.5: Crypto Analyst Explains Key Factor
Crypto analyst Egrag has published a new short-term price prediction for XRP, indicating a possible rise should the price overcome a critical technical hurdle. Egrag’s analysis looks at the 12-hour chart of the XRP/USD trading pair, where a trend channel breakout could trigger a short-term buy signal.
XRP Price Breakout Imminent?
According to the crypto analyst, the price has recently been moving within a descending channel (DC). Now, XRP is at an inflection point that could have a significant impact on its price. Egrag has identified the structure as “DC B”, a bearish pattern where the asset has formed lower highs and lower lows.
A key focus of Egrag’s analysis is XRP’s interaction with this pattern. Since the beginning of the chart pattern, the price has twice touched the upper trend line, which serves as resistance, and twice touched the lower trend line, which serves as support.
Currently, the XRP price is about to retest the upper line of the trend channel for a third time. Should it succeed in breaking out of the downtrend channel, this would be an extremely bullish sign. From mid-July to the end of October, the price was already in a descending channel, which Egrag refers to as “DC A” in the chart.
After XRP broke out of the downward channel A, the price rallied by over 50%. Something similar could happen now if history repeats itself. Egrag explained, “XRP seems to be mirroring its previous price action within a descending channel (DC). Check out the chart below to see how price is attempting to break out of DC B. The next challenge for XRP is to surpass descending channel B to reach Fib 0.5.”
What’s Next?
Should a breakout succeed, the 0.5 Fibonacci retracement level at $0.7529 would be the next major resistance in Egrag’s chart. An upward breakout above this level could indicate the start of a trend reversal that could drive the price towards the $1.30 to $1.50 range.
“A breakthrough past the 0.5 Fibonacci level hints at upward momentum, signaling a shift from a downtrend to a potential uptrend, instilling confidence. […] Pay close attention: Fib 0.5 at a price target of 0.7529c could be the gateway to a potential move towards 1.3-1.5$,” Egrag explains, suggesting that such a move would be an important indicator for traders.
In conclusion, Egrag advises investors to keep a close eye on trading volume and overall market sentiment, as these factors will play a crucial role in the asset’s ability to reach and exceed these crucial levels.
At press time, XRP traded at $0.63959.
Featured image from Shutterstock, chart from TradingView.com


2023-12-07 07:28:55.809334
XRP Attorney Suspects Likely SEC Rug Pull Ahead Of Spot Bitcoin ETF Approval
John Deaton, the lawyer representing over 75,000 XRP holders in the ongoing Ripple-SEC lawsuit, has revealed his perception of potential SEC rug pull ahead of spot Bitcoin ETF approval.
The cryptocurrency market is at a pivotal point, as the community waits for the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) to approve spot Bitcoin ETFs. A favorable decision could propel the crypto industry to new heights, and although many see the approval as a done deal, some are still skeptical, expecting the SEC to backtrack.
Read Also: SEC Engages Exchanges Over Bitcoin ETF, Fueling Optimism for Approval
Earlier in the year, Grayscale Investments, the company behind the Grayscale Bitcoin Trust (GBTC), sued the SEC over its denial of its spot Bitcoin ETF application.
In August, a federal appeals court ruled in Grayscale’s favor, finding that the SEC’s denial of the spot Bitcoin ETF application was “arbitrary and capricious.”
In October, the SEC did not appeal the court ruling, effectively allowing Grayscale to resubmit its spot Bitcoin ETF application.
Deaton’s Uncertainty About ETF Approval
Despite the certainty in the market, pro-XRP lawyer John E. Deaton has raised concerns about a possible rug pull by the SEC ahead of the highly anticipated spot Bitcoin ETF approval. His apprehension stems from comments made by former SEC official John Reed Stark, who suggests that the SEC may be setting up for a surprise rejection.
With people saying the market is pricing in a 90% chance for approval for a Spot #BTC ETF, is @GaryGensler about to pull off the greatest Regulatory Rug Pull of all time? https://t.co/dUMSMkw5XU — John E Deaton (@JohnEDeaton1) December 5, 2023
Stark points out that the SEC would not go through the stress of requiring a proviso for Bitcoin spot ETF approval and then deny the applications. However, he highlights that predicting the SEC’s decision behind closed doors is difficult.
SEC Chair Gary Gensler has been a vocal critic of cryptocurrencies, and it is unclear whether he would support the approval of a bitcoin spot ETF. However, the SEC has been under pressure from investors to approve such an ETF, and Gensler could be persuaded to do so.
We are on twitter, follow us to connect with us :- @TimesTabloid1 — TimesTabloid (@TimesTabloid1) July 15, 2023
Read Also: BlackRock’s iShares Spot Bitcoin ETF Relisted on DTCC, BTC Bullish Trend Returns
Deaton expresses the same concerns as Stark, warning that the SEC’s denial of Bitcoin ETF applications could trigger a backlash. He believes that the expectation of approval is driving Bitcoin’s surge, and surprise rejection could cause significant market disruption.
<
The potential for a rug pull by the SEC is particularly concerning, given Gensler’s history of taking a hard stance on Bitcoin. The market remains optimistic about a spot Bitcoin ETF approval, with a prominent member of the crypto community sharing his opinion that spot Bitcoin ETF approval will come this year.
However, Deaton’s warnings serve as a reminder of the potential for a sudden regulatory shift. Investors should exercise caution and avoid overexposure to Bitcoin in anticipation of the SEC’s decision.
Follow us on Twitter, Facebook, Telegram, and Google News


2023-12-07 02:28:55.817271
Ripple Price : When Will XRP Price Rally? – Crypto News BTC
Bitcoin is making vital strides in the direction of its all-time excessive, presently reaching $44,000, leaving many to marvel why XRP has not skilled the same surge. Cryptocurrency enthusiast Mickle has now opened up in regards to the causes behind XRP’s obvious lack of motion and explored whether or not it indicators a bearish development. He has offered historic context, detailing the everyday patterns noticed when Bitcoin undergoes exponential runs and the way XRP normally responds.
He dismisses worries about XRP’s present value, suggesting that the cryptocurrency normally follows Bitcoin’s upward trajectory after a quick delay. They categorical positivity in regards to the return of liquidity to the market, saying that historical past signifies a optimistic consequence for XRP.
A chart evaluating XRP to Bitcoin reveals their distinct actions, with inexperienced and crimson candles indicating durations when one appreciates towards the opposite. The analyst assures that this sample is just not uncommon and traditionally precedes XRP’s surge.
Why is XRP Worth Down?
All eyes are on the altcoin market as analysts and buyers eagerly await a possible breakout. Whereas Bitcoin has been flirting with the $44,000 mark, the actual query stays: when will the altcoins catch up? Out of the highest 50 cryptocurrencies, many are presently down or flat, indicating a broader development available in the market slightly than a selected difficulty with XRP. Regardless of the month-to-month fluctuations, XRP constantly ranks among the many high cryptocurrencies by market capitalization.


2023-12-07 13:28:55.784436
Where is Ripple Headed Next? Interesting Short-Term XRP Price Predictions
TL;DR
Ripple’s (XRP) Price Outlook: Some analysts predict XRP’s price could rise to $0.75 by year-end and potentially reach $0.80 soon after.
Mixed Market Signals: Despite these optimistic forecasts, concerns arise from XRP’s recent consolidation around $0.60-$0.65 and potential for a short-term correction.
Declining Activity Indicators: On-chain metrics show a decrease in XRP transactions and new account activations, suggesting possible reduced momentum.
Ripple (XRP) to Jump 30% Before the Year’s End?
The price of Ripple (XRP) has recently consolidated around the $0.60-$0.65 price range, charting less substantial gains than other cryptocurrencies such as Bitcoin (BTC). Still, some analysts remain optimistic that the asset has more fuel left in its tank to finish the ongoing year at a higher level.
The X (Twitter) user EGRAG CRYPTO presented a chart, according to which XRP is currently situated in a so-called “Sentiment Status” zone. The trend could change by mid-December when Ripple’s token is predicted to enter a “Macro Range” territory, with its valuation possibly climbing to $0.75 by New Year’s Eve.
“XRP Army, STAY STEADY, we’re on a short-term ride to much loftier price destinations,” EGRAG CRYPTO added.
Another individual supporting that thesis is Dark Defender. The analyst, who previously forecasted that XRP would hit $0.88 by the beginning of December, now thinks the asset is poised to ascend toward $0.80 in the following weeks. Moreover, they believe the $1 milestone would be achieved in January 2024.
Some Bearish XRP Scenarios
The host of YouTube’s channel CryptoTV also chipped in, maintaining that XRP has been doing “its own thing” in the past few days, defying the reigning trends in the cryptocurrency market.
He described the asset’s recent consolidation as “a bit concerning,” hinting that a price correction below $0.60 might be in the cards. Still, the analyst remains confident that the community would witness an XRP bull run in the long term:
“As I’ve said before, XRP is primed, due, and ready to break to the upside; it’s just a matter of when.”
It is worth noting that some on-chain metrics show that the token might indeed slow its pace. The number of executed XRP transactions has plunged to approximately 600,000 on December 7. In comparison, that figure reached almost 1.5 million earlier this week.
The number of newly activated XRP accounts has also been on a downfall: from over 3,200 on November 22 to less than 750 on December 7.
Those curious to find out how Ripple’s coin might perform in the remaining weeks of 2023 could take a look at our dedicated video below:


2023-12-06 20:28:55.811185
Ripple and XRP Poised to Render Traditional Bank Accounts Obsolete and Dominate Trillion-Dollar Payments Market Following Judge Torres’ Final Ruling
By dismissing the SEC’s assertions that Ripple’s sale of XRP on secondary platforms constituted security sales, Judge Analisa Torres set a possible precedent for an entire sector.
With an expected settlement that many believe will favour Ripple, XRP is poised to render traditional bank accounts obsolete and dominate a trillion-dollar payments industry.
Earlier this year, Judge Analisa Torres delivered a bombshell to the SEC’s attempt to bring down XRP, declaring that Ripple’s sale of the token on secondary trading platforms didn’t constitute securities transactions. The ruling has had a great ripple effect and many now expect the legal battle to end up in a settlement that strongly favours XRP and Ripple.
As CNF reported, New York Judge Torres ruled that mere sales of XRP on secondary platforms couldn’t be held against Ripple as violations of securities laws. It then led to the SEC withdrawing its case against CEO Brad Garlinghouse and founder Chris Larsen in which it had alleged they aided Ripple’s securities violations.
Since then, Judge Torres has held strong in her convictions and dismissed an attempt by the SEC to challenge the ruling. The agency attempted to throw in its case against Terraform Labs, the company behind LUNA and UST, but the judge was able to see through the manipulation and threw this out as well.
Aware that its case was falling apart, the agency withdrew its charges against Garlinghouse and Larsen and in this lies one of the biggest indicators that the agency is preparing for a settlement. SEC is known for pushing hard in cases where it has even a slight chance of a victory, with the $4 billion Binance settlement and CZ’s resignation the latest proof.
With its case falling apart, the SEC is believed to be working towards a settlement that would be lenient on Ripple and XRP. Experts expect that XRP will be allowed to continue trading on exchanges freely. With this kind of regulatory clarity, XRP will become the first crypto that investors and users can be certain is immune from regulatory crackdowns. The case would also set a precedent for all the other crypto projects that the SEC is going after.
XRP to Render Traditional Bank Accounts Obsolete
Armed with regulatory clarity, XRP is poised to render traditional bank accounts obsolete, one expert says. The Australian market commentator, who is a former banker, says that the banking industry suffers from some key challenges that XRP could solve. They include slow and inefficient payment processing, poor execution of payment ledgers and inefficient maintenance of accounts and balancing.
“Of course, we know that with XRP, we now have the ability to send value of any kind globally & receive it in seconds, all while costing less than a fraction of a cent in fees. This alone would clear out the need for both payment service providers (PSPs) & Nostro accounts,” he pointed out.
XRP is trading at $0.6225 at press time, gaining 1.7% in the past day. Experts have pointed out that the crypto is in a consolidation phase. The RSI has dropped below 50, which is worrying as this indicates bearish momentum.
The crypto needs to maintain its price above $0.5773 which analysts cite as critical support. Dipping below this level could end up in a testing of the $0.4595 support. However, if bulls take control and push it to close above $0.687, the next level to watch would be $0.8 and breaking past this resistance could set up the crypto for a surge.
Crypto News Flash does not endorse and is not responsible for or liable for any content, accuracy, quality, advertising, products, or other materials on this page. Readers should do their own research before taking any actions related to cryptocurrencies. Crypto News Flash is not responsible, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with the use of or reliance on any content, goods, or services mentioned.


2023-12-07 15:58:55.790042
XRP and Cardano Still Missing as Binance Web3 Wallet Now Supports Bitcoin and Dogecoin
The largest crypto trading platform, Binance, has now added support for five blockchain networks in its Binance Web3 Wallet service.
- Advertisement -
The exchange communicated this update via a recent blog post and on X. Per the notification, the new additions were in response to feedback from the crypto community.
Notably, the five networks now incorporated into the Binance Web3 Wallet include the blockchains of Bitcoin (BTC), Dogecoin (DOGE), Litecoin (LTC), Bitcoin Cash (BCH), and Sei Network.
We heard your feedback, so it's time to welcome five new networks to the #Binance Web3 Wallet! 🔸 #Bitcoin
🔸 Sei
🔸 Bitcoin Cash
🔸 Dogecoin
🔸 Litecoin Find out more ➡️ https://t.co/T5iDvC7yRC pic.twitter.com/snCoPGV2wB — Binance (@binance) December 7, 2023
- Advertisement -
XRP and Cardano Still Missing
Following the new integration, users can seamlessly transfer tokens to and from these networks using Binance Web3 Wallet. Existing supported networks include BNB Smart Chain, Ethereum, Polygon, Avalanche, and Arbitrum One.
However, notable blockchain networks still missing include the XRP Ledger and Cardano. This implies that investors cannot send and receive ADA and XRP through the tokens’ native networks on the Binance self-custody solution, only through other networks like BNB Smart Chain.
It is worth mentioning that the support for Bitcoin and Dogecoin on Binance Web3 Wallet comes precisely a month after the exchange introduced the platform. Notably, the Binance Web3 Wallet supports storing non-fungible tokens (NFTs) on specific networks.
Binance Web3 Wallet
Binance noted that its Web3 wallet service streamlines the path for users as it eliminates complex setups. Specifically, the Binance Web3 wallet eliminated the need to write down seed phrases, a process typical of standard crypto wallets.
- Advertisement -
Binance claimed users benefit from the seed-phrase-less setup while retaining the advantages of security and self-custody.
Besides, Binance users need to perform no extra actions to own and control this Web3 Wallet. Users can navigate to the wallet from the Binance app with just two clicks: [Wallets] > [Web3].
It is worth noting that, similar to other services, crypto self-custody solutions mean that users have total control over their wallets, and forgotten passwords are not retrievable.
“If you forget your password and lose access to your device (or delete the Binance app), you won’t be able to access your wallet or its contents,” Binance stated.


2023-12-07 09:28:55.791005
Bitcoin (BTC) Price Explosion, Solana (SOL) Volatility, Ripple (XRP) Targets: Bits Recap Dec 7
TL;DR
Bitcoin (BTC): Surpassed $44,000, contributing to a global crypto market cap of over $1.65 trillion, with signs of continued bullishness. Solana (SOL): Experienced price volatility, currently hovering around $64, with potential for an upcoming rally based on positive on-chain metrics. Ripple (XRP): Trading around $0.64, up 88% since January, with analysts predicting a significant rally, potentially reaching $25 in the future.
BTC’s Push Toward $44K
The cryptocurrency sector has experienced a serious revival throughout 2023, with the past few days being particularly bullish. The global crypto market capitalization has surged above $1.65 trillion, whereas Bitcoin (BTC) has been among the best-performing assets.
The primary cryptocurrency crossed the $40K level on December 4, but the uptrend did not stop there. In the following days, BTC pushed above $44,000 (per CoinGecko’s data), a peak unseen since early spring 2022.
There are numerous factors indicating that the asset’s ascent might continue in the near future. According to data presented by CryptoQuant, BTC exchange outflows have significantly surpassed inflows in the past few days. Investors’ shift toward self-custody methods is usually considered bullish as it eliminates immediate selling pressure.
Some experts argued that the current market dynamics are far more favorable than the ones during the bull run in 2021 and could trigger a further rally for Bitcoin. The X (Twitter) user Checkmate noted that the $44,000 price tag marked the “absolute zenith of on-chain mania” back in January 2021.
“Here we are at $44k and barely a squeak. Not even at 2019 levels. HODLers are not relinquishing their coins. They demand higher prices,” the analyst added.
Those willing to dive deeper into the topic and find out why BTC might be ready for an imminent bull run could take a look at our latest video below:
Is Solana (SOL) Looking for a Breakout?
Another digital asset that has captured the attention of investors lately is Solana’s native token – SOL. It was a top performer in the past few months, with its price soaring to almost $70 in mid-November.
However, SOL could not keep the momentum, dropping to as low as $54 by the end of last month. Since then, the asset has experienced enhanced volatility, and its valuation has hovered between $55 and $65.
Nonetheless, some important on-chain metrics hint that the coin could be on the verge of a new rally. As observed on DefiLlama, total value locked (TVL) on Solana has been on the rise recently. The figure stopped at almost $700 million today (December 7), a peak last reached in November 2022.
In addition, popular analysts like Crypto King and Jacob Canfield have forecasted a bright future for SOL. The former envisioned a price spike to $300 in the long run, whereas the latter thinks the valuation could explode to a whopping $1,000.
How is Ripple (XRP) Doing?
Ripple’s native token – XRP – has also recorded some gains lately, albeit not as substantial as Bitcoin and other assets. It currently trades around $0.64, an 88% increase since January 1.
According to multiple analysts, XRP is on the verge of attacking a new all-time high price. Fiery Trading believes the coin has formed a “bull-flag” and is ready to explode to $25 by the end of next year:
“This huge pattern will explode at some point in 2024, with the most likely move being a bullish one with the halving in mind. My target for the break out is placed at $25.”
The analyst behind the popular YouTube channel CryptoTV also thinks XRP is poised for a rally, outlining $0.83 as a short-term target.
Those curious to check how the asset might perform in the remaining weeks of the ongoing year could take a look at our dedicated video below:


2023-12-07 14:28:55.811626
Where is Ripple Headed Next? Interesting Short-Term XRP Price Predictions – Crypto News BTC
TL;DR
Ripple’s (XRP) Worth Outlook: Some analysts predict XRP’s value might rise to $0.75 by year-end and probably attain $0.80 quickly after.
Combined Market Indicators: Regardless of these optimistic forecasts, issues come up from XRP’s latest consolidation round $0.60-$0.65 and potential for a short-term correction.
Declining Exercise Indicators: On-chain metrics present a lower in XRP transactions and new account activations, suggesting doable decreased momentum.
Ripple (XRP) to Leap 30% Earlier than the Yr’s Finish?
The worth of Ripple (XRP) has lately consolidated across the $0.60-$0.65 value vary, charting much less substantial features than different cryptocurrencies comparable to Bitcoin (BTC). Nonetheless, some analysts stay optimistic that the asset has extra gas left in its tank to complete the continued yr at the next stage.
The X (Twitter) person EGRAG CRYPTO presented a chart, based on which XRP is presently located in a so-called “Sentiment Standing” zone. The pattern might change by mid-December when Ripple’s token is predicted to enter a “Macro Vary” territory, with its valuation presumably climbing to $0.75 by New Yr’s Eve.
“XRP Military, STAY STEADY, we’re on a short-term experience to a lot loftier value locations,” EGRAG CRYPTO added.
One other particular person supporting that thesis is Darkish Defender. The analyst, who beforehand forecasted that XRP would hit $0.88 by the start of December, now thinks the asset is poised to ascend towards $0.80 within the following weeks. Furthermore, they imagine the $1 milestone can be achieved in January 2024.
Some Bearish XRP Situations
The host of YouTube’s channel CryptoTV additionally chipped in, sustaining that XRP has been doing “its personal factor” prior to now few days, defying the reigning traits within the cryptocurrency market.
He described the asset’s latest consolidation as “a bit regarding,” hinting {that a} value correction under $0.60 is likely to be within the playing cards. Nonetheless, the analyst stays assured that the group would witness an XRP bull run in the long run:
“As I’ve mentioned earlier than, XRP is primed, due, and able to break to the upside; it’s only a matter of when.”
It’s value noting that some on-chain metrics present that the token may certainly gradual its tempo. The variety of executed XRP transactions has plunged to roughly 600,000 on December 7. As compared, that determine reached virtually 1.5 million earlier this week.
The variety of newly activated XRP accounts has additionally been on a downfall: from over 3,200 on November 22 to lower than 750 on December 7.
These curious to learn how Ripple’s coin may carry out within the remaining weeks of 2023 might check out our devoted video under:


2023-12-07 10:28:55.818301
Crypto analysts point out key factors
Crypto analyst Aggregate has published A new short-term price prediction for XRP, indicating potential upside if the price overcomes a key technical barrier. Aggregate’s analysis looks at the 12-hour chart of the XRP/USD trading pair, where a trend channel breakout could trigger a short-term buy signal.
XRP Price Breakout Imminent?
According to the crypto analyst, the price has been moving within a descending channel (DC) recently. Now, XRP is at a turning point that could have a significant impact on its price. Aggregate has identified the formation as “DC B”, a bearish pattern where the asset has formed lower highs and lower lows.
The main focus of Aggregate’s analysis is XRP’s interaction with this pattern. Since the beginning of the chart pattern, the price has twice touched the upper trend line, which acts as resistance, and twice touched the lower trend line, which acts as support.
Currently, the XRP price is about to retest the upper line of the trend channel for the third time. Should it succeed in breaking out of the downtrend channel, it would be an extremely bullish signal. From mid-July to late October, the price was already in a descending channel, which Aggregate refers to as “DC A” in charts.
After XRP broke out of the downward channel A, the price increased by more than 50%. If history repeats itself, something similar could happen again. Aggregate explained, “XRP seems to be mirroring its previous price action within a descending channel (DC). Look at the chart below to see how price is attempting to break out of DC B. The next challenge for XRP is to overcome the descending channel B to reach Fibonacci 0.5.
XRP price, 12-hour chart | Source:
What will happen next?
If the breakout is successful, the 0.5 Fibonacci retracement level at $0.7529 will be the next major resistance in Aggregate’s charts. A breakout above this level could signal the beginning of a trend reversal that could take the price to the $1.30 to $1.50 range.
“Crossing the 0.5 Fibonacci level indicates upward momentum, indicating a change from a downtrend to a potential uptrend, which instills confidence. […] Pay close attention: Fibonacci 0.5 at the price target of 0.7529c could be the gateway to a potential move towards 1.3-1.5$,” Aggreg explains, suggesting that such a move would be an important indicator for traders.
Finally, Aggregate advises investors to keep a close eye on trading volume and overall market sentiment, as these factors will play a key role in the asset’s ability to reach and exceed these critical levels.
At press time, XRP was trading at $0.63959.
XRP price, 1-day chart | Source: XRPUSD on Tradingview.com
Featured image from Shutterstock, chart from tradingview.com
source: www.newsbtc.com


2023-12-06 17:28:55.799658
Buy XRP, not Bitcoin, analyst suggests
The JWK Show’s crypto analyst predicts XRP’s rise and anticipates short-term Bitcoin gains awaiting a possible ETF approval.
The analyst revealed he invested personally in XRP, trading around $0.62 at the time of his video. He said he “bought even more XRP” on Dec. 3rd based on specific technical analysis signals.
Based on the charts right now, we are expecting XRP to move up. We are expecting XRP to clear these highs at around the $0.71 mark. We’ll see if that plays out. JWK Show
You might also like: Crypto analyst sees continued upside to Dogecoin gains
Beyond the analyst’s technical analysis, he believes broader gains in the crypto market, catalyzed by Bitcoin’s (BTC) rally, stand to benefit XRP. Furthermore, the analyst sees little potential in Bitcoin investments:
Bitcoin going up is great for the entire crypto market. It’s good for XRP. It’s good for ETH. It’s good for all coins and so on. But there’s not much gains for Bitcoin. Even if Bitcoin goes to, let’s say, $100,000 and you invested at $20,000, which barely anyone did, that is only a 5x in your investment. There is very little money to make in Bitcoin. JWK Show
The analyst also noted recent data showing that the XRP-USD trading pair ranks as the 5th most popular in crypto, despite XRP sitting 8th among digital assets by market capitalization.
The analyst believes crypto adoption is accelerating quickly, especially in trading activity. He expects “a rapid acceleration in crypto adoption” in the years ahead, which could provide tailwinds for XRP alongside Bitcoin and the broader crypto space.
Follow Us on Google News


2023-12-07 05:28:55.798516
XRP Slowly Creeping Back Up Its Yearly High at $0.60 Price Level
Analyzing XRP’s Performance, Yearly High, and Role in the Ongoing Crypto Surge
XRP’s 2023 journey unfolds, currently valued at $0.629 amid a broader crypto market rally.
Detailed exploration of XRP’s yearly high at $0.816, dissecting contributing factors.
Examining XRP’s pivotal role in the ongoing market rally, backed by Coinmarketcap insights.
Claim up to $30,030 in Bonus 100x Leverage Start Trading
In 2023, XRP demonstrated a dynamic performance within the cryptocurrency market. Currently valued at $0.629, its journey is intricately tied to the broader crypto market rally. XRP has navigated through varied price movements and trends over the course of the year. The cryptocurrency’s performance has been influenced by a multitude of factors, shaping its trajectory.
Examining significant events provides insights into the forces impacting XRP’s valuation. Identifying catalysts for price fluctuations allows a deeper understanding of its performance dynamics.
Also Read: Solana Price Breakthrough Sees Total of Over 600% Increase Since Start of 2023
XRP’s Price Peaks and Valleys
A quick recap brings attention to XRP’s notable yearly high, soaring to $0.816. Coinmarketcap serves as a reliable source for this evaluation. XRP’s ascent to $0.816 is analyzed in detail, shedding light on the factors instrumental in achieving this peak. Understanding the dynamics behind such highs is crucial for investors.
Insights into investor sentiment during XRP’s yearly high reveal behavioral trends that accompanied the peak, contributing to a comprehensive understanding of market dynamics. Presently valued at $0.629, XRP’s current price is examined in relation to its earlier yearly high. This comparison provides valuable context for assessing its current standing in the market.
Claim up to $30,030 in Bonus 100x Leverage Start Trading
XRP and the Broader Crypto Market Rally
XRP has played a significant role in the ongoing crypto market rally. This section acknowledges Coinmarketcap as a credible source for market insights. Analyzing the current market surge reveals XRP’s specific role and influence in this broader rally. Understanding its contribution adds a layer of comprehension to the overall market dynamics.
Coinmarketcap contributes vital insights to the analysis, serving as a reliable platform for market data. Additional data or insights from Coinmarketcap enrich the overall understanding of XRP’s position. Speculating on XRP’s potential movements, this section considers factors that might influence its price in the coming months. Anticipating future developments aids investors in making informed decisions.
Enhance Your Crypto Trading Skills With Our Legends’ Trading Masterclass
Empower your crypto trading skills with our Legends Masterclass. Sign up now and take advantage of our limited-time discount offer! Join the class today.


2023-12-07 09:28:55.807032
XRP Wealth Blueprint: Returns Analysis for 1K, 5K, or 10K Tokens in Diverse Price Landscapes
The world of cryptocurrency is known for its unpredictable nature, offering both prospects and challenges to investors. Notably, XRP, a well-established digital asset, experienced a decrease below the $0.600 mark, sparking inquiries about its prospective trajectory. Within this piece, we explore the potential returns for investors possessing 1,000, 5,000, or 10,000 tokens in different situations where the coin attains values of $1, $5, or $10.
XRP in Retreat
Despite Bitcoin surpassing the $42,000 threshold, XRP experienced an unexpected decline in its value. While the usual positive correlation between Bitcoin and XRP often influences the altcoin, one plausible reason for this downturn may be the growing preference of institutional investors for alternative cryptocurrencies such as Solana over XRP.
Currently valued at $0.61, acquiring 1,000 tokens necessitates a conservative investment of $610. If the asset reaches the $1 mark, this investment could transform into a $1,000 digital asset portfolio, generating a profit of $390. A $5 valuation would raise the 1,000 tokens to $5,000, resulting in a more substantial profit of $4,390. For those envisioning a $10 future for XRP, the 1,000 tokens might be valued at $10,000, showcasing a noteworthy return on investment (ROI) of $9,390.
With an investment of $3,050 for 5,000 XRP, the potential returns become more significant. At $1, the portfolio’s value would hit $5,000, yielding a profit of $1,950. If the asset surges to $5, the value of the 5,000 XRP tokens could escalate to $25,000, displaying a more substantial ROI of $21,950. In the optimistic scenario of $10, the 5,000 tokens might be valued at $50,000, demonstrating an impressive ROI of $46,950.
For the more daring investor committing to 10,000 tokens, the initial investment at $0.61 would be $6,100. If the asset reaches $1, the portfolio’s value would be $10,000, resulting in a profit of $3,900. If XRP climbs to $5, the 10,000 tokens could potentially be valued at $50,000, offering a substantial ROI of $43,900. In the ambitious scenario of $10, the tokens might be valued at $100,000, providing returns of $93,900.
While these projections offer insights into potential earnings, it’s crucial to recognize the unpredictable nature of the crypto market. Investors are advised to approach these scenarios with caution, conducting thorough research before making any investment decisions. Furthermore, the dynamic nature of the crypto market means external factors can significantly impact price movements.


2023-12-07 11:28:55.810741
XRP Soars as Whales Stir Excitement: Expert Predictions Point to a Potential Bull Run
In the whirlwind of cryptocurrency markets, XRP has experienced a significant surge in value, sparked by a flurry of whale activity. Recent transactions involving substantial amounts of XRP have captured the attention of both seasoned traders and enthusiasts alike, signaling promising developments for the Ripple-backed digital currency.
According to reports from Whale Alert, a platform that tracks blockchain transactions, three notable transfers have fueled speculations and discussions within the crypto community. The movement of 132.61 million XRP across wallets has coincided with a notable uptick in the token’s price, igniting a wave of excitement among investors.
In a series of intriguing transactions, a wallet address, identified as r4wf7enWPx…5XgwHh4Rzn, initiated transfers totaling 42.6 million XRP to two distinct cryptocurrency exchanges: Bitstamp and Bitso. The movements, totaling millions of dollars in value, have contributed to the speculation surrounding the motives behind these significant transfers.
Simultaneously, another substantial transfer involving 90.01 million XRP between unknown wallets has further intensified curiosity within the community. The wallet address, rLRiiaAHTg….MXEJywMtfA, orchestrated this transaction, shifting a considerable amount of XRP to a different address, rGBd4yrHiD…FXmXXMeZqy, adding to the intrigue surrounding these movements.
Amidst this flurry of activity, the price of XRP has experienced a notable surge, reflecting a 4.55% increase in the past 24 hours, reaching $0.6495. Notably, this surge has contributed to a weekly uptrend of 7.34%, with XRP briefly touching a weekly high of $0.6525 on December 7.
Industry-leading analysts have weighed in on the potential trajectory of XRP, offering insights and predictions. Dark Defender anticipates the possibility of XRP achieving a new all-time high (ATH). On the other hand, Egrag Crypto provides a short-term analysis, highlighting XRP’s current pattern within a Descending Channel (DC) and projecting a potential move towards the $1.3-1.5 range if it manages to surpass certain key resistance levels.
Joining the chorus of optimism, analysts Dark Defender and Muro Crypto express bullish sentiments, emphasizing XRP’s potential for upward movement. Despite its historical reputation as a slower performer, the XRP token is positioned to surge higher, according to these experts, potentially reaching unprecedented highs.
The surge in whale activity has coincided with a notable uptick in XRP’s value. Within the past 24 hours, XRP experienced a 4.55% increase, reaching $0.6495, with a weekly surge of 7.34%. Furthermore, the token briefly reached a weekly high of $0.6525 on December 7, showcasing its upward momentum. Trading volume also saw a substantial rise of 37.60%, hitting $2.13 billion within the same period.
Renowned crypto analysts have shared their insights, adding to the fervor surrounding XRP’s potential. Dark Defender has suggested that XRP might be eyeing a new all-time high, while Egrag Crypto highlighted the token’s current trajectory within a Descending Channel (DC), aiming to break out and potentially surge toward the $1.3-$1.5 range.
Notably, analysts Dark Defender and Muro Crypto share bullish sentiments, emphasizing XRP’s potential for substantial upward movement, potentially leading to a new ATH.
This surge in XRP’s market dynamics signifies an opportunity for investors and enthusiasts to witness the potential transformation of a downtrend into a powerful uptrend. The implications of these whale movements, coupled with expert analyses, underscore the potential for XRP to break barriers and elevate its market standing significantly.
As the cryptocurrency landscape evolves, XRP’s recent surge exemplifies the excitement and potential hidden within this digital asset. The community eagerly awaits further developments, anticipating whether XRP will indeed fulfill the prophecies of a bullish run.


2023-12-07 10:28:55.793432
Crypto Price Prediction: Where Will Bitcoin, Ethereum, XRP & Chainlink Be in 24 Months?
Elena is an expert in technical analysis and risk management in cryptocurrency market. She has 10+year experience in writing - accordingly she is avid journalists with a passion towards researching new insights coming into crypto erena.
Story Highlights Crypto Rover predicts Bitcoin to surge between $120,000 and $280,000 in the next 12-24 months.
Ethereum is also predicted to experience a 5% gain and potentially reach $6,000 to $12,000.
XRP's price is expected to remain between $4 and $6 but will surge if Ripple wins the case against SEC.
Renowned crypto trader Crypto Rover has recently shared his bullish forecasts for leading cryptocurrencies, anticipating an upward surge over the next 12 to 24 months. The predictions paint a promising picture, hinting at the possibility of these digital assets reaching unprecedented all-time highs.
Curious what he has to say? Read on – we’ve revealed it all!
Rejoice! Bitcoin Breaks Through!
According to the Crypto Rover, Bitcoin (BTC) is displaying signs of a significant shift in its price action. This marks a potential breakthrough from the lingering negative trend that has haunted the cryptocurrency since the downturns of 2022.
In the current market scenario, Rover highlights Bitcoin’s commendable efforts to overcome a robust resistance level, presently anchored at $43,670.
With the current market conditions, Rover suggests that Bitcoin is making notable efforts to overcome a robust resistance level, currently situated at $43,670.
Bitcoin Continues Its Ascent
Crypto Rover boldly projects a remarkable surge for Bitcoin in the next 12 to 24 months, envisioning a price range soaring between $120,000 and $280,000. This optimistic outlook aligns with the anticipation surrounding the potential approval of 12 spot Bitcoin ETF applications and the scheduled Bitcoin halving event slated for April 2024.
Also Read: Bitcoin Golden Cross in Sight: $50K by 2023 End?
And it’s not only Bitcoin!
Crypto Rover’s optimism extends to Ethereum (ETH), which currently finds itself within a bullish technical formation. A sustained trend could potentially result in a 5% gain, flipping the $2,300 resistance level into a sturdy support floor.
The forecast for Ethereum is equally buoyant, with Crypto Rover suggesting a price range stretching from $6,000 to $12,000. This projection underscores the trader’s unwavering confidence in Ethereum’s pivotal role within the broader crypto market.
Waiting for XRP to Emerge Victorious
Even amidst ongoing legal battles, Ripple’s XRP has captured Crypto Rover’s attention. Setting a target range of $4 to $6 for XRP, the trader remains cautiously optimistic, contingent on a favorable outcome in the Ripple vs. SEC case.
Success in the courtroom could trigger a substantial surge in XRP’s price, potentially entering a supply zone between $0.6572 and $0.7161.
Read More: Ripple Price Prediction: Expert Predicts 85%-120% XRP Jump!
Chainlink – Our Rising Star!?
Chainlink’s LINK token steals the spotlight as a standout performer in recent weeks, showcasing a bullish rally that has propelled its price beyond the $15 mark, with potential for further gains.
Crypto Rover’s predictions extend to Chainlink, foreseeing a target range of $250 to $350. As a decentralized Oracle network, Chainlink continues to garner attention for its pivotal role in enhancing smart contract capabilities.
As Crypto Rover’s forecasts contribute to the ongoing discussions in the crypto community, traders and enthusiasts eagerly await developments that could potentially lead to substantial growth in the digital asset space.


2023-12-07 10:28:55.816079
Bitcoin (BTC) Price Explosion, Solana (SOL) Volatility, Ripple (XRP) Targets: Bits Recap Dec 7 – Crypto News BTC
TL;DR
Bitcoin (BTC): Surpassed $44,000, contributing to a worldwide crypto market cap of over $1.65 trillion, with indicators of continued bullishness. Solana (SOL): Skilled value volatility, at present hovering round $64, with potential for an upcoming rally primarily based on optimistic on-chain metrics. Ripple (XRP): Buying and selling round $0.64, up 88% since January, with analysts predicting a major rally, doubtlessly reaching $25 sooner or later.
BTC’s Push Towards $44K
The cryptocurrency sector has skilled a severe revival all through 2023, with the previous few days being notably bullish. The worldwide crypto market capitalization has surged above $1.65 trillion, whereas Bitcoin (BTC) has been among the many best-performing property.
The first cryptocurrency crossed the $40K stage on December 4, however the uptrend didn’t cease there. Within the following days, BTC pushed above $44,000 (per CoinGecko’s knowledge), a peak unseen since early spring 2022.
There are quite a few components indicating that the asset’s ascent would possibly proceed within the close to future. In accordance with knowledge introduced by CryptoQuant, BTC alternate outflows have considerably surpassed inflows prior to now few days. Traders’ shift towards self-custody strategies is normally thought-about bullish because it eliminates rapid promoting strain.
Some consultants argued that the present market dynamics are much more favorable than those through the bull run in 2021 and will set off an additional rally for Bitcoin. The X (Twitter) consumer Checkmate noted that the $44,000 price ticket marked the “absolute zenith of on-chain mania” again in January 2021.
“Right here we’re at $44k and barely a squeak. Not even at 2019 ranges. HODLers are usually not relinquishing their cash. They demand larger costs,” the analyst added.
These keen to dive deeper into the subject and discover out why BTC is likely to be prepared for an imminent bull run may check out our newest video beneath:
Is Solana (SOL) On the lookout for a Breakout?
One other digital asset that has captured the eye of buyers currently is Solana’s native token – SOL. It was a prime performer prior to now few months, with its value hovering to nearly $70 in mid-November.
Nevertheless, SOL couldn’t hold the momentum, dropping to as little as $54 by the top of final month. Since then, the asset has skilled enhanced volatility, and its valuation has hovered between $55 and $65.
Nonetheless, some vital on-chain metrics trace that the coin could possibly be on the verge of a brand new rally. As observed on DefiLlama, complete worth locked (TVL) on Solana has been on the rise not too long ago. The determine stopped at nearly $700 million at present (December 7), a peak final reached in November 2022.
As well as, common analysts like Crypto King and Jacob Canfield have forecasted a shiny future for SOL. The previous envisioned a value spike to $300 in the long term, whereas the latter thinks the valuation may explode to a whopping $1,000.
How is Ripple (XRP) Doing?
Ripple’s native token – XRP – has additionally recorded some features currently, albeit not as substantial as Bitcoin and different property. It at present trades round $0.64, an 88% improve since January 1.
In accordance with a number of analysts, XRP is on the verge of attacking a brand new all-time excessive value. Fiery Buying and selling believes the coin has shaped a “bull-flag” and is able to explode to $25 by the top of subsequent 12 months:
“This enormous sample will explode sooner or later in 2024, with the probably transfer being a bullish one with the halving in thoughts. My goal for the escape is positioned at $25.”
The analyst behind the favored YouTube channel CryptoTV additionally thinks XRP is poised for a rally, outlining $0.83 as a short-term goal.
These curious to test how the asset would possibly carry out within the remaining weeks of the continued 12 months may check out our devoted video beneath:


2023-12-06 17:28:55.802111
LTC Now Accepted for Microsoft Payments; Binance Launches Zero Fees on XRP, DOGE Trading Pairs; Samson Mow Makes Crucial BTC Prediction: Crypto News Digest by U.Today
Here are the top three news stories over the past day presented to you by U.Today.
Advertisement
Litecoin (LTC) now accepted for Microsoft payments
Cryptocurrency payments continue growing in popularity, with more businesses accepting a variety of digital assets, including Litecoin (LTC), an asset sometimes referred to as "digital silver." In a recent X post, BitPay crypto payment processor made an exciting announcement for those who are holding Litecoin. According to the announcement, from now on, LTC holders can now top up their Microsoft accounts using their LTC coins. Last month, BitPay notified its users that Litecoin is now accepted at Mecum Auctions, which has been selling collectible cars, vintage/antique motorcycles and road art since 1988.
XRP, Dogecoin: Binance launches zero fees on trading pairs
Yesterday, Dec. 5, Binance crypto exchange announced on its official blog and X handle that it is launching zero-fee trading for six FDUSD spot and margin trading pairs . As a reminder, FDUSD is a fiat-backed stablecoin introduced in June by First Digital. The pairs include XRP/FDUSD, DOGE/FDUSD, BNB/FDUSD, ETH/FDUSD, LINK/FDUSD and SOL/FDUSD. According to the information stated in the blog post, trading will begin on Dec. 8 at 12:00 a.m. (UTC) and continue until further notice. This benefit will be available to all users, who will pay zero maker or taker fees for the selected spot and margin trading pairings.
Crucial Bitcoin (BTC) prediction made by Samson Mow


2023-12-07 07:28:55.792948
Expert Explains What Must Happen Before XRP Runs Up
In a recent statement on X, prominent crypto lawyer John Deaton, renowned for his pro-XRP stance, explained what he believes must happen before XRP can take off significantly from its current position of around $0.65.
- Advertisement -
Deaton argued that holders of altcoins like XRP must constantly wish for the value of Bitcoin to appreciate. According to the crypto lawyer, Bitcoin’s rise remains the prerequisite for any altcoin, including XRP, to experience an uptrend.
Deaton expanded on his viewpoint, emphasizing the strong correlation between XRP and Bitcoin. He pointed out that this reality persists, irrespective of whether the XRP Army opts to acknowledge it or not.
“XRP has not decoupled from Bitcoin. That’s a fact no matter how much you or anyone hates it,” Deaton remarked.
Lack of respect? 🤦‍♂️ Every XRP holder should hope Bitcoin runs up. Why? Because that’s what must happen before any alt, including XRP, runs up. XRP has not decoupled from Bitcoin. That’s a fact no matter how much you or anyone hate it. I have a significant stake in XRP, but being… — John E Deaton (@JohnEDeaton1) December 6, 2023
- Advertisement -
Notably, Bitcoin broke into $44k this week, while XRP has remained around $0.6 despite Bitcoin’s sudden rise. Nonetheless, XRP has started picking up in the last 24 hours, recording a 5% gain, putting its price at $0.65.
Call to Eschew XRP and Bitcoin Maximalism
Notably, the foundation of Deaton’s comment was his encounter with some die-hard members of the XRP community. Specifically, the lawyer highlighted that a staunch XRP enthusiast expressed frustration with him upon discovering his ownership of Bitcoin.
Based on that, the XRP enthusiast insisted on eliminating Deaton’s name from the list of 75,000 XRP holders who participated in the regulatory suit against XRP. Per the lawyer’s disclosure, the XRP enthusiast feels offended to be represented by an attorney deemed “foolish” enough to possess BTC.
- Advertisement -
Responding to the lawyer’s revelation, X user Peter Shelton argued that Deaton’s recent focus on promoting BTC instead of XRP is understandable why members of the XRP Army might feel disappointed. According to Shelton, Deaton’s move is deemed a “lack of respect” for the XRP Army.
However, the lawyer countered this view by noting that XRP enthusiasts must come to terms with the fact that XRP’s upward trajectory remains closely tied to Bitcoin’s uptrend.
Besides, he mentioned that as someone heavily invested in XRP, acknowledging the importance of Bitcoin’s rise is not a form of disrespect. “I reject Bitcoin maximalism, and I reject XRP maximalism,” the lawyer submitted.


2023-12-07 06:28:55.824047
Today Ripple (XRP) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 7, 2023
On December 7, 2023 the exchange rates of Ripple (XRP) in Pakistani Rupee (PKR) and US Dollar (USD) have been reported as:
One Ripple (XRP) in Pakistani Rupee (PKR) is Rs 180.15 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST), in the open exchange market. The rate of Ripple has been calculated and compared with the rate Rs 181.05 at closing on December 6, 2023.
The rate of Ripple in US Dollar (USD) is $0.63 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST), in the open exchange market. The rate of Ripple has been calculated and compared with the rate of $0.64 at closing on December 6, 2023.
Today Ripple (XRP) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 6, 2023
———————————————————————
Today Bitcoin (BTC) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 7, 2023
On December 7, 2023 the exchange rates of Bitcoin (BTC) in Pakistani Rupee (PKR) and US Dollar (USD) have been reported as:
One Bitcoin (BTC) in Pakistani Rupee (PKR) is Rs 12,503,973.97 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST), in the open exchange market. The rate of Bitcoin has been calculated and compared with the rate Rs 12,467,966.39 at closing on December 6, 2023.
The rate of Bitcoin in US Dollar (USD) is $43,935.32 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST) in the open exchange market. The rate of Bitcoin has been calculated and compared with the rate $43,793.93 at closing on December 6, 2023.
Today Bitcoin (BTC) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 6, 2023
———————————————————————
Today Dogecoin (DOGE) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 7, 2023
On December 7, 2023, the exchange rates of Dogecoin (DOGE) in Pakistani Rupee (PKR) and US Dollar (USD) have been reported as:
One Dogecoin to PKR is Rs 27.65 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST), in the open exchange market. The rate of Dogecoin has been calculated and compared with the rate Rs 27.40 at closing on December 6, 2023.
The rate of Dogecoin in US Dollar (USD) is $0.10 on December 7, 2023 at 09:50 AM Pakistan Standard Time (PST), in the open exchange market. The rate of Dogecoin has been calculated and compared with the rate $0.10 at closing on December 6, 2023.
Today Dogecoin (DOGE) Rates in USD and PKR as of December 6, 2023
—————————————————————————–
Disclaimer: All data and information are provided for informational purposes only. The data has not been provided for trading purposes or financial, investment, tax, legal, accounting, or other advice. In the case of trading, it is advised to consult your broker or financial representative to verify pricing before executing any trade. The exchange rate does not constitute investment advice. Further, it is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold any security or financial product.


2023-12-07 08:28:55.793894
XRP Ledger Set to Welcome World’s First Digital Inheritance Solution
Inheriti, the world’s first decentralized patented data backup and inheritance solution, is set to launch on XRP Ledger (XRPL).
- Advertisement -
In a strategic move, Anodos has partnered with Safe Haven to integrate the SHA token and Inheriti, the world’s first decentralized data backup and inheritance solution, into the XRP Ledger (XRPL).
The development was recently shared in a tweet by Panos Mekras, co-founder and CFO of Anodos.
Inheriti®, world's first decentralized and patented data backup and inheritance solution, is coming to #XRPL. Inheriti® offers unrivaled security in the management and transfer of the access to digital assets, NFTs, social media accounts, and digital data. https://t.co/4Dj74YgwdN — Panos 🔼{X} (@panosmek) December 4, 2023
- Advertisement -
Anodos Partner With Safe Haven
The partnership was also announced in a recent press release. According to the announcement, Anodos will issue the SHA IOU on the XRPL, thus allowing crypto enthusiasts to trade SHA tokens on the XRP Ledger’s native decentralized exchange (DEX) and the upcoming automated market maker (AMM).
In addition, Anodos disclosed that it is already developing a one-stop trading and portfolio management platform on the XRPL, dubbed AnodoSwap.
Upon its launch, the Anodos team will list SHA on the platform, while an SHA/XRP liquidity pool will be created to enhance the token’s liquidity.
Notably, the partnership will be in two phases. The first phase will commence in January 2024, when Anodos will issue 10 million SHA tokens on the XRPL network.
- Advertisement -
Additionally, the second phase of the partnership will commence once the EVM sidechain launches on XRPL. Once EVM sidechain launches on XRPL, the solution will be integrated into Safe Haven’s SafeSwap.
For context, XRPL took a major step towards welcoming EVM sidechain after leading cybersecurity firm Bishop Fox completed an audit of the protocol last month.
World’s First Inheritance Platform Launches on XRPL
Users can conveniently create Inheriti plans on the XRP Ledger upon successful integration by paying with SHA tokens via their Xumm wallet.
Inheriti is a digital inheritance solution that provides advanced security in transferring access to digital assets, social media accounts, non-fungible tokens (NFTs), and digital data.
The solution, which launched on the VeChain mainnet in September 2020, encrypts and stores users’ data in a 3-layer topology, including blockchain and cold storage. Inheriti serves as a bridge between the traditional and digital data inheritance markets.
Inheriti can be used by anyone, irrespective of their technical knowledge. Once users enter their secret data, Inheriti swings into action, splitting it into unreadable, secret, and encrypted shares.
It then distributes the encrypted pieces of inheritance data to different cold storage devices. The safe key holder will be required to put together the various shares into Inheriti to decrypt the data. Users can create a lifetime Inheriti plan for the price of 10,000 SHA worth $5.12 at press time.


2023-12-07 15:34:55.796823
Discovering Undervalued Cryptocurrencies: Focus on Sub-$1 Coins Like Dogecoin, Rebel Satoshi, XRP
TLDR
Dogecoin surges 7% in a week, with experts predicting marginal gains in December.
XRP flatlines around $0.62, but analysts believe bulls are coming soon.
Rebel Satoshi gains promises investors in Rebels Round 1 a 92.30% ROI.
With bulls taking over the broader crypto market, investors have begun searching for top altcoins under $1 that promise massive gains soon. Luckily, financial experts have pinpointed Dogecoin (DOGE), XRP (XRP), and Rebel Satoshi ($RBLZ) as the best cryptos to invest in now!
Why do financial experts recommend investing in Dogecoin, XRP, and Rebel Satoshi? Let’s find out!
Dogecoin Spikes 7% In a Week: Further Gains in Store!
Dogecoin has performed well over the past seven days, starting November 26. On November 26, DOGE was hovering around $0.078. The November 29 news of the National Telecommunications and Information Administration (NTIA) and the Department of Commerce approving the DOGE-1 moon mission saw DOGE start gaining.
By December 3, DOGE had stabilized around $0.084. This price means DOGE has gained 7.69% in a week. This decent performance has seen Dogecoin pick up investor interest. However, is DOGE a top crypto to buy for short-term investors searching for massive profits before the year ends?
According to analysts, DOGE will continue climbing to close the year at $0.086. Analysts attribute this prediction to DOGE getting more adoption due to the December 1 news that revealed Tesla plans to accept Dogecoin payments for its new-model Cybertrucks.
XRP Stagnates Around $0.62. Is an Uptrend Coming?
XRP has performed dismally over the past seven days. On November 26, XRP was hovering around $0.6243. However, XRP started shedding value due to the December 1 news of Ripple Labs unlocking 1 billion XRP tokens. Fortunately, the December 2 news of HSBC partnering with Metaco, a Ripple Labs-owned custody firm, helped XRP recover.
As of December 3, XRP had leveled off around $0.6233. This price denotes a 0.16% drop in a week. This weak performance has left potential investors asking, is XRP a good crypto to buy?
According to experts, XRP will continue recording marginal gains as more investors trickle into the market, anticipating Ripple Labs’ victory against the SEC. As such, experts set the end-of-December XRP prediction at $0.68654.
Rebel Satoshi Offers a Low Entry Point and Promises Massive Gains!
Rebel Satoshi, an upcoming meme coin that seeks to secure a $100 million market cap, has quickly become an investor favorite despite being in its public presale. This new project’s success comes from its mission to create a robust community that comprises the silent majority. Rebel Satoshi aims to take on centralized crypto entities by uniting the little guys.
Fueling this audacious mission is $RBLZ, Rebel Satoshi’s governance and membership token. $RBLZ is a deflationary ERC-20 token with a maximum supply of 250 million coins. This tokenomics structure explains why investors consider $RBLZ the best crypto to invest in now!
By December, Rebel Satoshi was underway with Rebels Round 1 of its ongoing presale, with $RBLZ available for purchase at $0.013. Interestingly, investors can use Bitcoin (BTC) and 50 other cryptos to buy $RBLZ. Investors that purchase $RBLZ at $0.013 will realize a 92.30% ROI when $RBLZ attains its listing price of $0.025.
It is worth noting that investors during the Early Bird Round will realize a whopping 150% ROI when $RBLZ climbs to $0.025.
For the latest updates and more information, be sure to visit the official Rebel Satoshi Presale Website or contact Rebel Red via Telegram


2023-12-06 19:28:55.819992
Which is the Smartest Bet: Bitcoin, XRP, or BorroeFinance?
It’s December 2023, and investors are looking for crypto tokens with reliable ROI projections. Naturally, Bitcoin (BTC) tops this list thanks to positive metrics and an upcoming halving. On the other hand, investors avoided Ripple (XRP) due to challenges with the SEC. Experts say BorroeFinance ($ROE) is another viable option after the platform raised $1.7 million in 2023. Let’s delve in to see what experts think about these tokens.
>>BUY $ROE TOKENS NOW<<
BTC Surges Following Fed Reserve Chair Statement
On December 1, Jerome Powell, the Chairman of the US Federal Reserve, announced that the country’s core inflation rate stood at 2.5%. According to experts, this metric indicates the Federal Reserve might suspend the ongoing interest rate hike, thereby leading institutional investors to invest in Bitcoin and other top altcoins to secure higher ROI.
Bitcoin’s social dominance increased on the market front, and BTC gained 4.42% in the first days of December. On November 26, BTC traded for $37,790; a week later, BTC sold for $39,482. According to analysts, Bitcoin is set for a bull run thanks to an upcoming halving and the Federal Reserve. As a result, analysts say BTC may trade for $100,000 by December 2024.
Investors Accumulate $ROE Tokens as Second Presale Stage Closes
BorroeFinance is the world’s first web3 blockchain invoice discounting NFT marketplace that allows content creators to raise instant cash by selling future digital earnings. According to experts, BorroeFinance promises to bridge the short-term liquidity gap in the web3 industry, and savvy investors have raised $1.7 million towards the actualization of this project.
Currently, $ROE is selling for $0.0150 in its second presale stage, which is 98.14% complete. According to analyst predictions, $ROE should enter its third presale stage, gain 16.7%, and sell for $0.0175 before the end of December. When $ROE finally lists on major crypto exchanges, the token will gain 167% and sell for $0.0400.
>>BUY $ROE TOKENS NOW<<
Ripple Lawyer Lashes Out at SEC
Recently, Judge Robert Shelby accused the SEC of lying to get a restraining order against Debt Box and other DeFi companies. Subsequently, John Deaton, a legal representative to over 75,000 Ripple investors, said the SEC had a pattern of misleading the courts. In addition, Deaton noted that almost every Judge has called out the SEC for lying since 2020.
Ripple has seen a steady exit of investors in Q4 2023, and XRP ranged in early December. On November 26, XRP sold for $0.6216. Seven days later, XRP lost 0.32% and traded for $0.6201.
Ripple’s next court meeting with the SEC is scheduled for April 2024, and experts believe XRP will keep ranging. Analysts say XRP will likely trade between $0.5700 and $0.6700 in Q1 2024, meaning it is not one of the best crypto investments this period.
Learn more about BorroeFinance here:
Visit BorroeFinance Presale | Join The Telegram Group | Follow BorroeFinance on Twitter


2023-12-07 10:28:55.791982
Top Analyst Weighs in on XRP Hitting $50,000 when Bitcoin Touches $500k
In a recent live-stream session, renowned crypto analyst Zach Rector sparked a conversation on the possibility of XRP hitting $50,000 compared to Bitcoin’s potential ascent to $500,000.
Massive update tonight which includes my response to crazy price predictions! #XRP $500,000 Bitcoin vs $50,000 XRPhttps://t.co/PoNUVtHheg — Zach Rector (@ZachRector7) December 6, 2023
- Advertisement -
Rector began by acknowledging Bitcoin’s recent into the $40k region. He highlighted Bitcoin’s impressive chart climb, referencing the origin of the rally that commenced on October 16 amid a fake ETF report.
- Advertisement -
With Bitcoin breaching the $44,000 mark and XRP around $0.64, Rector highlighted the challenges and opportunities for XRP and Bitcoin to hit the ambitious targets.
Bitcoin $500k vs XRP $50k
On the prospect of Bitcoin becoming an asset worth $500,000 per unit, Zach Rector expressed skepticism about the reality.
In particular, he raised questions about Bitcoin’s potential to surpass gold’s market cap. The foundation of this view is that Bitcoin at $500k would amount to a market valuation exceeding $10 trillion, a market cap close to gold.
The analyst claims Bitcoin lacks the utility to attain a multi-trillion cap like gold. Meanwhile, he raised doubts about Bitcoin gaining additional utility without significant changes to its network.
- Advertisement -
In parallel, Rector cited multiple Bitcoin forks that supposedly diluted its core value, such as Bitcoin Cash, Litecoin (LTC), and Dogecoin (DOGE). He asserted that these attempts diminished the authenticity of the original Bitcoin.
In contrast, he hinted at a more optimistic outlook for XRP. Specifically, Rector acknowledged the possibility of Bitcoin reaching $500,000 but questioned its likelihood compared to XRP’s potential to hit $50,000.
XRP at $50k
Backing his claim, Rector presented a compelling case for XRP’s growth trajectory. He first contended that many underestimate the scarcity factor of XRP. He pointed out that the utility-driven burning mechanism, combined with the diverse functionalities added to the XRP Ledger (XRPL), could result in a shortage of available XRP for liquidity.
Specifically, Rector underscored the significant developments within the XRP ecosystem, such as introducing an EVM side chain, NFTs, and automated market makers. He also cited the XS 55, which seeks to allow diverse payment capabilities.
Furthermore, the analyst argued for XRP’s liquidity function in the payment landscape. In this context, he drew a contrast to traditional assets like gold, asserting that gold lacks the inherent functionality to serve as liquidity. Rector believes XRP’s role in enhancing liquidity through DLT technology is pivotal in enhancing its value.
Despite acknowledging the lengthy journey ahead for XRP to reach $50,000, he believes that the combination of liquidity function, utility enhancements, and problem-solving capabilities positions XRP as a key player in the digital asset landscape.
It is worth mentioning that XRP growing from $0.65 to $50k necessitates a formidable percentage growth exceeding 7,692,300%. On the other hand, Bitcoin accent from $44k to $500k would be merely a 1,136%.


2023-12-07 13:28:55.806100
ChatGPT and Google Bard Paint a Bullish Picture for XRP in 2024; $ROE Eyes a 50% Surge Next Year
With the crypto market experiencing a bullish run that has seen Bitcoin (BTC) hit a 19-month high above the $41,000 zone, XRP is not being left out since its trading above the significant support area of $0.60 amid Google Bard and ChatGPT predicting an uptrend for XRP in 2024.
On the other hand, buying pressure is engulfing the BorroeFinance ($ROE) ecosystem, given that more than $1.8 million has been raised at the presale stage.
>>BUY $ROE TOKENS NOW<<
BorroeFinance is Emerging as a Matchmaker in the Web3 Space
As artificial intelligence (AI) continues to make waves thanks to innovations like ChatGPT, this cutting-edge technology is being used for different use cases, with the financial sector being one of the beneficiaries.
As a result, BorroeFinance is streamlining revenue financing in Web3 through AI since it prompts intense risk assessments, making it a good crypto to buy.
BorroeFinance serves as an AI-Powered marketplace that links revenue buyers and sellers, whereby it enables Web3 businesses to raise immediate cash to fund their projects.
Specifically, Web3 participants mint their future incomes in the form of non-fungible tokens (NFTs), which are then sold off on BorroeFinance’s marketplace for instant cash, enabling the network to be among the top in the decentralized cryptocurrency list.
As one of the top DeFi coins, BorroeFinance is pioneering the Web3 revolution by eliminating the liquidity challenge that artists, content creators, and NFT artists face.
Based on the network’s quest to revamp the borrowing landscape, more investors are jumping on the BorroeFinance bandwagon, given that at least 170 million $ROE tokens have been bought at presale, which is currently at Stage 3.
As the best new crypto to invest in, $ROE is BorroeFinance’s governance token that enables users to enjoy premium features, such as rewards & incentives and advanced analytics.
BorroeFinance is depicting itself as a game-changer that seeks to create a highly secure and decentralized funding platform for Web3 businesses, making it a top crypto to invest in now.
>>BUY $ROE TOKENS NOW<<
XRP is Eyeing a Bright 2024
Since artificial intelligence is being favored when it comes to crypto predictions, prominent tools like ChatGPT and Google Bard are filling this void as they are powered by large language models (LLMs).
As a result, ChatGPT expects XRP to range between $2.50 and $5.00 at the end of next year after factoring in various conditions, such as the continuation of the legal battle between the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and Ripple.
On the other hand, Google Bard gives a more conservative prediction because it expects XRP to trade between $0.50 and $1.80 by the close of next year based on factors like market sentiments, regulatory concerns, performance, and institutional adoption.
As one of the top 5 cryptocurrencies, XRP is expected to experience an upward trajectory on the foundation of these predictions, given that it was trading at $0.617 at the time of writing, according to CoinGecko data.
Learn more about BorroeFinance ($ROE) here:
Visit BorroeFinance Presale | Join The Telegram Group | Follow BorroeFinance on Twitter


2023-12-07 07:28:55.816631
Ripple Price Prediction: XRP Price Poised For 120% Surge If This Happens – Crypto News BTC
In a current market analysis, analyst AlanSantana make clear the potential way forward for XRP, foreseeing a notable surge that might attain between 85% to 120%, counting on numerous corrective paths.
Dip & Raise for XRP
Whereas the broader crypto market witnessed appreciable upswings, XRP skilled a short deceleration in its progress over the previous week, prompting discussions inside the group. Santana, nonetheless, maintains an optimistic outlook, envisioning a panorama that mixes a bullish pattern and wave, setting the stage for upward worth actions.
In Santana’s evaluation, he pointed out the probability of a typical retracement however argued that the present market circumstances hinted at a sample of non permanent worth decreases previous eventual larger highs.
Observing a decline in XRP’s commerce quantity since July, coupled with the emergence of a triangle-top sample, Santana emphasised the historic resilience of XRP, showcasing an inclination to defy conventional market patterns.
XRP Poised For 85% or 120%
Waiting for the following six months, Santana projected a possible problem for XRP, focusing on the excessive vary between $0.73 and $0.94. With a bullish bias, XRP might ascend to commerce on this vary, doubtlessly marking a surge starting from 85% to 120%, relying on the corrective path it takes.
Santana launched two hypothetical retracement paths. The primary, depicted in blue, outlines a state of affairs the place XRP drops to the $0.51 area earlier than bouncing again with an 85% surge from the present worth.
However, the second correction path, illustrated in pink, envisions a dip for XRP to the $0.43 area, adopted by a subsequent rally of 120% from the present worth.
XRP’s Lengthy-Time period Outlook
Whereas Santana hinted at a long-term goal of round $5 primarily based on previous calculations, he emphasised the intricate nature of predicting cryptocurrency markets. Unexpected developments, notably inside the context of a possible super-cycle, add complexity to forecasting.
In current short-term actions, XRP marked a 1.73% enhance within the final 24 hours, presently priced at $0.6221. Notably, the asset witnessed a considerable 42% spike in 24-hour commerce quantity, reaching $2,001,370,458, indicating heightened market demand.


2023-12-06 19:28:55.821517
Ripple (XRP) Market Cap Eyes $50 Billion; Quant (QNT) Joins Rebel Satoshi (RBLZ) on Whales’ Crypto Watchlist – Crypto News BTC
Within the ever-surprising world of cryptocurrencies, there’s all the time one thing stirring, one thing thrilling simply across the nook. Currently, the excitement is all about Ripple (XRP) and its spectacular journey in direction of a $50 billion market cap. However that’s not the entire story. There’s extra – Quant (QNT) and Insurgent Satoshi (RBLZ) are additionally making waves, becoming a member of the ranks of prime altcoins and turning into a few of the greatest crypto investments to contemplate. Let’s dive into why these digital property are presently on each crypto whale’s watchlist and why they may simply be the prime crypto cash to purchase.
Ripple’s (XRP) Ascent: A Story of Resilience and Development
First up, let’s speak Ripple. It’s like watching a seasoned athlete make a comeback. Regardless of its authorized tussles with the SEC, Ripple has been gaining floor, eyeing an formidable $50 billion market cap. This surge in Ripple’s fortunes isn’t simply by probability. It’s the results of constant development, a rise in transactions, and vital whale exercise. Furthermore, the developments in the previous few months have aligned completely to assist this upward trajectory.
The latest breakthrough in Ripple’s authorized battle, the place it emerged with a beneficial non-security distinction for XRP, has been a game-changer. To not point out, the bulletins on the Swell Convention 2023 have set the stage for additional development. Think about a snowball rolling down a hill, getting greater and greater – that’s Ripple proper now.
Quant (QNT): The Darkish Horse within the Crypto Race
Now, let’s shine a lightweight on Quant (QNT). This crypto asset may not be as well-known as Ripple, nevertheless it’s positively one to observe. Quant is like that indie band that out of the blue pops up on each playlist – surprising however pleasant. Its distinctive providing, which facilitates the interconnectivity of blockchains, has positioned it as a beneficial asset within the crypto area. It’s not nearly what Quant is now; it’s about its potential. As increasingly buyers notice the significance of blockchain interoperability, Quant’s worth is poised to skyrocket.
Insurgent Satoshi (RBLZ): Extra Than Only a Meme Coin
After which there’s Rebel Satoshi (RBLZ). On the earth of meme cash, it’s simple to get misplaced within the crowd, however RBLZ is totally different. Taking inspiration from the legendary Satoshi Nakamoto, it’s greater than only a digital asset; it’s a motion. With a hard and fast provide and a give attention to community-driven improvement, Insurgent Satoshi is popping heads. It’s not nearly being one other digital asset; it’s about making a motion. For these on the lookout for a prime altcoin that mixes tradition with crypto, Insurgent Satoshi is the place it’s at.
Conclusion: The Future is Now
For these seeking to dive into the crypto market or broaden their portfolios, now’s the time to control these three. Whether or not you’re in it for the lengthy haul or on the lookout for short-term good points, Ripple, Quant, and Insurgent Satoshi supply intriguing prospects. They embody the essence of what makes the crypto world thrilling: innovation, group, and a contact of unpredictability.
As we glance in direction of the top of 2023 and past, the potential of Ripple, Quant, and Rebel Satoshi is evident. They aren’t simply cryptocurrencies; they’re harbingers of change in a digital panorama that’s always evolving. So, seize your digital wallets, and let’s experience this thrilling wave into the longer term. The top-of-year growth is only the start, and Ripple, Quant, and Insurgent Satoshi are main the way in which.
For the newest updates and extra info, be sure you go to the official Rebel Satoshi Presale Website or contact Insurgent Purple by way of Telegram


2023-12-06 18:28:55.822609
XRP Stash sold at loss on Bitstamp crypto exchange: details
via cover image www.freepik.com
Disclaimer: The opinions expressed by our writers are their own and do not represent the views of U.Today. The financial and market related information provided on U.Today is for informational purposes only. U.Today is not liable for any financial losses incurred while trading cryptocurrencies. Do your research by contacting financial experts before making any investment decisions. We believe all content to be accurate as of the date of publication, but some offers mentioned may no longer be available.
crypto data tracker whale alert Report of XRP reserves transferred to Bitstamp crypto exchange by an unknown whale.
According to Whale Alert, 24 million XRP worth $14,799,010 was transferred to the Bitstamp crypto exchange within the last 24 hours.
Although there are many reasons why tokens are transferred to crypto exchanges, one of the most likely reasons is to sell them.
With this in mind, it seems quite clear that crypto tokens were sold at losses given the price action of XRP over the last 24 hours. At the time of writing, XRP was reporting losses in line with the rest of the crypto market, falling 1.09% to $0.611 over the past 24 hours.
The price of As seen on TradingView, XRP touched a low of $0.584 while hitting a high of $0.643 on Binance.
As a result, a long outside day candlestick pattern was formed, indicating a fierce battle between the bulls and bears. Currently, bears are in control, with XRP trading lower on the daily basis.
That said, the $0.64 and $0.57 levels remain important levels to monitor for XRP price, as they constitute immediate resistance and support levels.
If buyers push the price above $0.64, XRP could rise to $0.67 and eventually $0.74. Instead, if the price drops below $0.57, the pair could fall to $0.46.
CoinShares, the asset manager, reported $176 million in digital asset inflows in the past week. This brings the total to a 10-week high of $1.76 billion, the largest since the launch of the futures-based ETF in the United States in October 2021.
XRP saw inflows of $0.5 million, indicating that investors remain bullish on the coin.

source: u.today


2023-12-07 00:28:55.801098
Top Influencer Bullish on XRP Despite Slow Performance Amid the Broader Market Rally
The XRP community members have expressed disappointment over XRP’s slow-paced rally amid the ongoing bullish uptick in the broader crypto market.
However, despite the slower-than-expected outcome, a prominent crypto influencer and XRP proponent remains optimistic about XRP’s potential. The influencer, Moon Lambo, provided a strong defense for the performance of XRP.
Influencer Defends XRP’s Slow Price Reclaim
XRP has failed to rally at the same pace as the broader crypto market. Notably, Bitcoin witnessed a dramatic surge today, December 6, reaching the $44,000 mark as it targets $50,000. Many altcoins followed suit, posting notable gains, while XRP appears left behind.
As of 07:05 AM EST on December 6, XRP trades at $0.6221, reflecting a 24-hour price increase of 1.77% with a 1.73% seven-day gain. Compared to Bitcoin’s recent price performance, XRP has shown a paler trend even as an altcoin with more volatility.
Impressively, Bitcoin increased over 5% in the past 24 hours, with a weekly gain exceeding 14%. This slow-paced XRP movement has enraged its holders. Moon Lambo came to the defense of XRP amid the outrage in the crypto community, noting that XRP wasn’t the only token without any significant price rally.
According to Lambo, several crypto tokens traded at a loss during the early hours of Wednesday. These include the likes of Solana (SOL), Binance Coin (BNB), Chainlink (LINK), Immutable (IMX), and others.
Further, the crypto analyst stated that up to 17 out of 50 tokens, excluding the stablecoins, are trading at a loss.
Additionally, Lambo cited more crypto assets that were trading flat with just a 1% price increase during his post. These include Polygon (MATIC), Tron (TRX), Monero (XMR), Arbitron (ARB), Stacks (STX), and Ethereum Classic (ETC).
Lambo explained that considering shorter timeframes does not provide significant insight when profiling the price performance of crypto assets, including XRP. Notably, one has to consider more variables in a more extended timeframe for a more insightful outcome.
The analyst stated that XRP has maintained its position as the fifth-largest crypto asset despite its lag behind some altcoins. He noted that XRP remains among the top ten cryptocurrencies by market capitalization.
Lambo said:
XRP has a history of lagging behind most other coins, shaking out weak hands before going parabolic. I personally think $XRP is excellently positioned, and I’m looking forward to seeing altcoins run; I believe $XRP will be part of the party!
XRP’s Upcoming Price Rally
One primary factor limiting XRP’s price growth in the past was Ripple’s legal battle with the US SEC. However, the July 13 court decision by Judge Analisa Torres of Ripple as a non-security brought partial liberation to the token.
Subsequently, experts believe Ripple still has a chance for an explosive price rally through increased exchange listings and offerings, institutional adoption, and utility on the Ripple Ledger.
With the anticipated bull run of 2024, many believed that Ripple would be in the lead. Some predicted an imminent rally to $50 for the token.


2023-12-07 15:43:55.813470
Is XRP in Danger of Collapsing Toward $0.54? (Ripple Price Analysis) – Crypto News BTC
XRP’s worth has been consolidating over the previous few weeks on the USDT pair.
It’s but to indicate any important need to both drop or rally. Nonetheless, towards BTC, issues are trying totally different.
Technical Evaluation
By TradingRage
Ripple Value Evaluation: The USDT Chart
Towards USDT, the worth has been supported by the $0.6 stage. But, it has not rebounded with any appreciable bullish momentum. In case this stage holds, the worth can rise towards the $0.72 resistance stage within the quick time period.
Then again, a breakdown of the $0.6 stage would end in a drop to the 200-day transferring common, which isn’t far-off, trending close to the $0.54 mark.
Evidently, a decline under the 200-day transferring common can be very bearish, as the following important assist stage lies on the $0.45 space.
The BTC Paired Chart
Towards BTC, the worth has been continually making decrease highs and decrease lows. It has already damaged each the 1800 SAT and the 1600 SAT assist ranges to the draw back.
Nonetheless, the market is more likely to pull again to the damaged 1600 SAT zone, which has now changed into a resistance stage, as the worth motion suggests.
The relative energy index can also be exhibiting an oversold sign, additional boosting the chance of such a pullback occurring within the coming days. A rejection from the extent would then pave the best way for an additional drop towards the 1250 SAT assist zone.


2023-12-07 12:28:55.814930
Liquidation threatens XRP price recovery momentum
via cover image www.freepik.com
Disclaimer: The opinions expressed by our writers are their own and do not represent the views of U.Today. The financial and market related information provided on U.Today is for informational purposes only. U.Today is not liable for any financial losses incurred while trading cryptocurrencies. Do your research by contacting financial experts before making any investment decisions. We believe all content to be accurate as of the date of publication, but some offers mentioned may no longer be available.
XRP enthusiasts have seen a bumpy ride this week as the digital asset has surged more than 12% from its recent low.
Although the recovery showed resilience, it appears that challenges remain for XRP bulls, who find themselves in a precarious position amid a market that remains both dynamic and unpredictable.
According to coinglassOver the past 24 hours, XRP long positions took a hit, with a total of $1.4 million liquidated, which was double the amount of short positions, which stood at just over $700,000.
This unexpected turn of events catapulted XRP to eighth place among the largest crypto assets by cumulative liquidations, reaching $2.12 million.
Source: coinglass
Despite yesterday’s commendable performance, XRP has experienced negative dynamics in today’s trading session, seeing a correction of more than 5% from the day’s peak.
Can XRP Bulls Ride This Wave?
In a particularly sudden reversal within the last hour, the price of This interesting sequence of events signals a tug of war between sellers and buyers, with buyers displaying a willingness to deploy capital at specific price levels.
XRP to USD coinmarketcap
The challenges facing XRP bulls are further highlighted by the current state of the token in the market. Trading around $0.64 per token, the XRP token finds itself lagging behind its crypto peers despite notable improvements.
The question on everyone’s mind is whether the bullish momentum can be sustained or the volatile nature of the crypto market will derail the bullish trend once again.
source: u.today


2023-12-07 06:31:34.962500
Will Jasmy hit $10, $100?
Will Jasmy hit $10, $100?
Latest Jasmy Price
Jasmy Coin Price Performance so far
Last 7 days +29.5% Last 1 Month +49.7% Last 12 Months +62.1% Since Launch (2021) -99.4%
HARA, Jasmy CFO, announces the commencement of a comprehensive stablecoin business in collaboration with Aplix, leveraging blockchain technology as a third-party prepaid payment method. This strategic move aims to significantly reduce costs while ensuring security and explores new marketing opportunities through data utilization.
Crypto Analyst, Team Lambo noted that Jasmy currently holds a market dominance of 0.02%. To enter the top 20 cryptocurrencies, it would need to achieve a market dominance of at least 0.50%. For this to occur, considering a peak market cap of 10 trillion dollars for all cryptocurrencies in the next bull run, Jasmycoin would need a market cap of 50 billion dollars. As a result, Team Lambo suggests that a $1 target for JASMY is deemed possible.
Jasmy Coin, Buy or Sell, Crowd Poll
Net Buy = Buy%-Sell%
July 31st : +49.3%
: +49.3% Sept 1st : +54.4%
: +54.4% Nov 28th: +50.9%
+50.9% Dec 5th: +51.6%
+51.6% Dec 7th:+51.9%
Will Shiba Inu reach 1 Cent?
Will Jasmy coin reach $10?
In order for Jasmy to reach $10, it would need to increase by a factor of 1,960. At $10, Jasmy’s Market Cap will be $496 billion. If Jasmy were to grow at a rate of 25% each year, it would take about 33 years to reach $10. Let us evaluate this data
Quality of Investment- Moderate
Growth required to reach $10- Feasible
Market Cap at $10- Not Feasible
Time required to reach $10 if Jasmy were to rise at 25% per annum- Not Feasible
Considering the criteria Quality of Investment, growth required, and time required, Jasmy has a low chances of reaching $10.
Jasmy Price Prediction: Can Jasmy Hit $100?
In order for Jasmy to reach $100, it would need to increase by a factor of 19,607. At $100, Jasmy’s Market Cap will be $4.9 trillion. If Jasmy were to grow at a rate of 25% each year, it would take about 44 years to reach $100. Let us evaluate this data
Quality of Investment- Moderate
Growth required to reach $100- Not Feasible
Market Cap at $100- Not Feasible
Time required to reach $100 if Jasmy were to rise at 25% per annum- Not Feasible
Considering the criteria Quality of Investment, growth required, and time required, Jasmy has a no chances of reaching $100.
Read: XRP Price Prediction and Forecast
Will Jasmy Hit $10 in 2025?
To reach $10, Jasmy needs to grow by a factor of 1,960. Taking its use cases and past performance into account, it seems highly unlikely that Jasmy will grow by 1,960 by 2025 .
Will Jasmy Hit $10 in 2030?
To reach $10, Jasmy needs to grow by 1,960 times in the next six years. Even with considering its 3.3 times growth in one month [when it achieved its all-time high], we can say that the Jasmy coin still cannot reqch $10 by 2030.
Will Jasmy hit $10, $100? What is Jasmy?
Jasmy, a blockchain platform specializing in the IoT era, offers decentralized storage networks ensuring robust data security and sharing. This blockchain infrastructure empowers data owners to store, access, and exchange their data confidently. Metaverse applications running on the Jasmy network utilize this technology for seamless data exchanges. In collaboration, Jasmy has formed alliances with giants like Toyota, aiming to pioneer Japan’s autonomous vehicle tourist data solutions. Another potential partnership on the horizon is with Sony, a leading entertainment entity.
With performance metrics showing a Year-to-date increase of +20.7%, a decline of -58.1% over the past year, and a steep fall of -99.7% since its inception, Jasmy seeks to differentiate itself in the blooming metaverse sector. Its focus lies in offering decentralized data storage solutions, a critical requirement in the growing metaverse and blockchain arenas. Jasmy’s process is structured into four steps: metadata storage, ID creation, immersive gaming worlds, and integrating IoT devices and equipment. Competing with platforms like MXC, VeChain, and Helium, Jasmy has also launched the Jasmy Chain on the Ethereum blockchain, aiming to streamline and secure data transactions efficiently.
Jasmy Coin, built on the ERC-20 protocol, is pivotal to the Jasmy ecosystem, serving multiple roles: from purchasing in-game assets, staking, and rewards, to accessing secure data and voting. Despite its unique offerings, market speculations highlight concerns regarding the token’s demand given the abundant alternatives available. For Jasmy to see a resurgence, it would require expanded use cases and a broader base market, making its future in the cryptocurrency world uncertain.
Shiba Inu Price Prediction
Cronos CRO Price Prediction
Phoenix Price Prediction
Note: Crowdwisdom360 collates Predictions and data from all over the net and has no in-house view on the likely trends in the Stocks or Crypto Coins. Please consult a registered investment advisor to guide you on your financial decisions.


2023-12-07 15:28:55.807493
Citing XRP Victory, U.S. Congressman Takes Action To Curb the SEC Regulatory Overreach
In a new development revolving around the Ripple V.S. SEC lawsuit, United States Rep member Tom Emmer cited Ripple’s landmark court victory in mid-July to file an amendment to the federal budget.
Tom Emma is a U.S. Congressman representing Minnesota’s sixth congressional district. He filed the federal budget during the United States congressional hearing on November 8.
Read Also: Ripple and SEC Could Reach Settlement Agreement On XRP Lawsuit Today. Here’s why
Notably, the amendment to the budget aims to restrict the SEC’s liberty of having to use taxpayer funds for its regulatory actions against crypto-related enterprises. Rep Emmer is convinced that adopting this measure will be crucial in curbing SEC’s excesses.
Here is the US House Congressional Record from November 8, 2023 in which Emmer mentions that #XRP was found not to be a security by the courts.

(NB, image edited to one column)https://t.co/BndxRvZSoH pic.twitter.com/M07fp0g1N6 — WrathofKahneman (@WKahneman) December 5, 2023
Rep Emmer: SEC Lacks Congressional Right To Regulate Crypto
Describing possible reasons for his actions, Rep Emmer noted that despite the SEC’s plans to adopt a regulation-by-enforcement approach in the crypto space, no single rule was drafted as a blueprint for the crypto industry.
In addition, Rep Emmer asserted that the SEC does not have the congressional right for some of its actions. He corroborated his claims by citing comments from the SEC’s enforcement division in which one of the regulatory body’s officials admitted that the SEC is stretching its tentacles outside its jurisdiction.
Still driving his unyielding stance, the U.S. Congressman highlighted the outcome of the SEC V.S. Ripple legal battle. He said the lawsuit was considered a significant one by the SEC. However, going on to almost losing the legal battle it seemed to have orchestrated has a lot to say about its abuse of regulatory power.
Meanwhile, Rep Emmer’s amendment bill is still awaiting approval from the final reconciliation committee. For now, it has been included in the House’s budget bill. It is left to see how events unfold.
We are on twitter, follow us to connect with us :- @TimesTabloid1 — TimesTabloid (@TimesTabloid1) July 15, 2023
Read Also: XRP Lawsuit Enters Game-Changing Settlement Discussions
Progress Made So Far In The SEC V.S. Ripple Lawsuit
It is no longer news that Ripple has been scoring significant wins in its lawsuit with the United States securities watchdog, SEC. It all started in mid-July after Judge Torres ruled to declare XRP sales on secondary markets as non-security.
<
As if that was not enough, the SEC’s motion to file an interlocutory appeal was denied too. Finally, to cap off Ripple’s remarkable outings in the court, Ripple officials were cleared of the charges against them by the SEC.
Ripple impressive court wins seemed to renew hope for several other crypto outlets that are currently on the SEC’s radar. Notably, two of the leading crypto exchanges, Binance and Coinbase, have been implicated to have defaulted SEC’s regulatory guidelines. It is left to see how they can turn events in their favor.
Follow us on Twitter, Facebook, Telegram, and Google News.


2023-12-07 02:28:55.792468
Ripple Price : When Will XRP Price Rally?
Zameer is a financial analyst and writer with a particular interest in cryptocurrency markets. He has been studying cryptocurrencies and their market behavior for several years and deeply understands the factors that affect the price of cryptocurrencies. His expertise lies in his ability to use both technical and fundamental analysis to make informed predictions about the future direction of cryptocurrency prices. He has a strong understanding of market sentiment and uses this to inform his trading decisions and price predictions.
Bitcoin is making significant strides towards its all-time high, currently reaching $44,000, leaving many to wonder why XRP has not experienced a similar surge. Cryptocurrency enthusiast Mickle has now opened up about the reasons behind XRP’s apparent lack of movement and explored whether it signals a bearish trend. He has provided historical context, detailing the typical patterns observed when Bitcoin undergoes exponential runs and how XRP usually responds.
He dismisses worries about XRP’s current price, suggesting that the cryptocurrency usually follows Bitcoin’s upward trajectory after a brief delay. They express positivity about the return of liquidity to the market, saying that history indicates a positive outcome for XRP.
A chart comparing XRP to Bitcoin shows their distinct movements, with green and red candles indicating periods when one appreciates against the other. The analyst assures that this pattern is not unusual and historically precedes XRP’s surge.
Why is XRP Price Down?
All eyes are on the altcoin market as analysts and investors eagerly await a potential breakout. While Bitcoin has been flirting with the $44,000 mark, the real question remains: when will the altcoins catch up? Out of the top 50 cryptocurrencies, many are currently down or flat, indicating a broader trend in the market rather than a specific issue with XRP. Despite the monthly fluctuations, XRP consistently ranks among the top cryptocurrencies by market capitalization.


2023-12-07 12:28:55.786529
XRP Bulls on High Alert: Liquidations Threaten XRP Price Recovery Momentum
Disclaimer: The opinions expressed by our writers are their own and do not represent the views of U.Today. The financial and market information provided on U.Today is intended for informational purposes only. U.Today is not liable for any financial losses incurred while trading cryptocurrencies. Conduct your own research by contacting financial experts before making any investment decisions. We believe that all content is accurate as of the date of publication, but certain offers mentioned may no longer be available.
XRP enthusiasts have witnessed a roller coaster ride this week as the digital asset surged over 12% from its recent lows.
Advertisement
Although the recovery showcased resilience, it appears that challenges persist for XRP bulls, who find themselves in a precarious position amid a market that continues to be both dynamic and unpredictable.
According to CoinGlass, in the last 24 hours, XRP long positions faced a setback, with liquidations totaling a staggering $1.4 million, twice the amount of short positions which stood at just over $700,000.
This unexpected turn of events catapulted XRP to the eighth position among the largest crypto assets by cumulative liquidation, hitting $2.12 million.
Despite yesterday's commendable performance, today's trading session has seen XRP experiencing negative dynamics, witnessing a correction of over 5% from the day's peak.
Can XRP bulls ride this wave?
In a particularly abrupt movement within the last hour, the XRP price plummeted by more than 2%, only to experience a rapid buyback shortly afterward. This intriguing sequence of events indicates a tug of war between sellers and buyers, with the latter demonstrating a willingness to deploy capital at specific price levels.
XRP to USD by CoinMarketCap
The challenges facing XRP bulls are further underscored by the token's current position in the market. Trading near $0.64 per token, the XRP token finds itself trailing behind its crypto peers despite the notable recovery.
The question on everyone's mind is whether the bullish momentum can be sustained or if the volatile nature of the crypto market will once again throw the bulls off track.


2023-12-06 17:28:55.814434
XRP poised for impact as crypto industry set to become 100x bigger
Cryptocurrencies have become one of the most important financial innovations in the modern world. These digital assets built on blockchain technology facilitate easy and trustworthy transactions with reduced risk, which makes people and institutions go for them.
In the wide variety of cryptocurrencies, XRP is one of the key ones in the universal picture. Ripple Labs created XRP as a bridge currency providing quicker and cheaper cross-border payment transactions. It is more than a currency, though; it is a remedy to the age-old challenges inherent in the traditional financial sector, and thus, it is a big competitor in the evolution of the 21st-century global economy.
The Promise of Crypto Industry Growth
The crypto industry is projected to undergo much growth in the coming years, supported by an optimistic outlook that has mesmerized investors and enthusiasts. From the AIM Summit in Dubai, Navin Gupta, Managing Director for the Middle East & South Asia at Ripple, said capitalizing on infrastructure. For instance, he imagined a future situation where stablecoins such as USDT and USDC would mix conventional and digital currencies, just like the messages that transformed from letters to emails. Citing an example of cross-border transactions, Gupta underscored the transformational potential of decreasing transactional costs.
Furthermore, he cited that Ripple is now moving toward being a full-fledged cryptocurrency platform for institutional utility. Gupta advised investors to invest in infrastructure, considering that the crypto sector was growing like the gold rush era, indicating that XRP is poised for future success.
The following are the key reasons behind the anticipated increase:
First, increased adoption is a key framework. The user base rises as more people or organizations embrace cryptocurrencies due to their low transaction charges, secure and faster cross-border transfers, and ability to increase financial inclusivity. The mainstream acceptance of cryptocurrencies is now reinforced with major companies accepting them as payment. Institutional involvement also plays a role in boosting confidence and capital in the crypto space. Prominent financial institutions and companies are investing in cryptocurrency, building blockchain applications, and providing crypto-related services in a sign of increasing institutional interest in digital assets.
Similarly, the regulatory landscape is becoming clear and accepted in many jurisdictions, making it a stable and secure environment for crypto business to grow. Growing adoption, institutional involvement, and focused regulatory guidelines position the crypto industry for a groundbreaking finance era with profound prospects of further expansion.
XRP’s Positioning Impact in the Crypto Ecosystem
Unlike most other digital assets in the crypto ecosystem, XRP has some unique strengths. In particular, its technology is appropriate for cross-border payments and international transactions, positioning it best for several sectors. Speed is one of the key strengths of XRP. XRP transactions take a few seconds to settle and allow faster movement of funds globally, which is essential in the current world economy. The low transaction fees associated with it make it economically viable, especially for low-value high-frequency transactions.
The future use of XRP for users and businesses is increasing. Banks and other financial institutions have realized this and decided to expand their international remittances. For example, big financial institutions such as Santander and American Express have integrated XRP into their cross-border payment systems, making the process easier and reducing costs.
In addition, XRP makes headway in the gaming sector. XRP has turned out to be efficient in Ripple casinos when it comes to cross-border payments for players and operators. The gaming experience is enhanced as gamers can deposit and withdraw funds quickly and at a low cost.
This is a good sign for XRP’s capacity for growth in the crypto ecosystem. It might also increase the penetration of the remittance market, where traditional banking systems still introduce significant delays and fees. Finally, there is the space for XRP to be used in the new Decentralised Finance sector as a lender, borrower, and liquidity provider. Ripple’s strategic partnerships and collaborations worldwide contributed heavily to XRP’s growth. Ripple has even linked up with financial institutions, payment processors, and central banks, creating a rapport to use XRP as the currency to connect different global transactions. This signifies the increased credibility of XRP as an essential element within global finance.
In summary, XRP’s strengths of speed, efficiency, and cost-effectiveness place it strategically in the crypto ecosystem, particularly for cross-border payments. The fact that it is used by banks, gaming platforms, and other industries shows its application in the real world. With further opportunities for expansion and partnerships, XRP is bound to succeed in the future of crypto.
Final Thoughts
XRP is an emerging and influential player in the cryptocurrency dynamic world. On top of being an invaluable asset for cross-border payments, XRP’s uniqueness of swift transaction settlements and affordability makes it well-positioned as the crypto industry prepares for exponential growth. This makes it worthwhile in the real-world context, as shown by its adoption in reputable financial institutions and game sectors. XRP is astonishingly ready for the 100-fold expansion of the cryptos ecosystem with a visionary perspective and strategic partnerships. While this dynamic sector keeps advancing, the role of XRP in determining the fate of finance and money transfer is phenomenal.


2023-12-07 10:28:55.817800
XRP Price Soars As Top Analysts Foresee Bull Run & Whales Shift 133 Mln XRP
The XRP cryptocurrency, a digital currency mapped out to enable cost-effective cross-border payments on the Ripple network, continues to amass bullish market sentiments within the cryptocurrency universe.
In addition, the token appears to be extensively eyed by crypto market enthusiasts as it noted an enormous increase in whale activity.
Meanwhile, whale transactions orbiting around the Ripple-backed cryptocurrency showcased the reallocation of 132.61 million XRP, as per market charts.
Simultaneously, the XRP price also pumped marginally amid the colossal surge in whale activity.
XRP Whale Activity: A Detailed Study
According to the data unveiled by Whale Alert, a platform facilitating blockchain tracking, the Ripple-backed cryptocurrency noted three massive transfers recently.
Interestingly, the first two transactions that fueled speculations among crypto market traders dumped 42.6 million XRP to two different CEXs, Bitstamp and Bitso. As per the data, the unknown wallet address, r4wf7enWPx…5XgwHh4Rzn, transferred 24.80 million XRP to Bitstamp, a Luxembourg City-based crypto exchange. Moreover, the amount of tokens transferred was evaluated to $15.45 million while writing.
Additionally, the same wallet address recorded another transfer of 17.80 million XRP worth $11.09 million to Bitso, a Mexico City-based crypto exchange.
Intriguingly, as reported by CoinGape media earlier, the same wallet recorded transferring hundreds of millions of XRP to CEXs over the past few days.
On the other hand, another whale transaction that nabbed significant attention transferred a whopping 90.01 million XRP between unknown wallets. According to the insights by Whale Alert, the wallet address, rLRiiaAHTg….MXEJywMtfA, transferred the prior mentioned amount to another address, rGBd4yrHiD…FXmXXMeZqy.
The recent upsurge in the XRP whale chronicle appears to have piqued quite the interest of crypto market enthusiasts. Furthermore, the Ripple-backed cryptocurrency also witnessed a price surge amid the rush in whale activity.
Also read: Binance CEO Richard Teng Slams Bankers on Traditional Monetary System Frauds
XRP Continues To Pump
While writing, the XRP price jotted down an upswing of 4.55% in the past 24 hours, evaluating $0.6495. In addition to this, the token also witnessed a weekly surge of 7.34%. What’s even more fascinating is that the token briefly touched a weekly high of $0.6525 today, December 7.
Besides, the twenty-four-hour trading volume also experienced a substantial upswing of 37.60%, reaching $2.13 billion.
Furthermore, one of the leading crypto analysts, Dark Defender, recently proclaimed that the Ripple-backed cryptocurrency is now eyeing a new ATH.
However, another crypto analyst, Egrag Crypto, offered a short term analysis for the XRP cryptocurrency. According to Egrag, XRP is currently reflecting past price patterns within a Descending Channel (DC), aiming to break out of DC B and confront the challenge of surpassing it to reach Fib 0.5. Achieving Fib 0.5 at 0.7529c could pave the way for a potential move toward the 1.3-1.5$ range, indicating a possible shift from a downtrend to an uptrend.
Moreover, crypto analysts Dark Defender and Muro Crypto, appear to be taking a stand with XRP portraying bullish market sentiments. According to these analysts, although a slow mover, the XRP token carries the potential to pump higher, along with a potential to reach a new ATH.
Also read: Binance CEO Thrashes Jamie Dimon’s Anti-Crypto Narrative During Senate Hearing
The post XRP Price Soars As Top Analysts Foresee Bull Run & Whales Shift 133 Mln XRP appeared first on CoinGape.
Source: coingape.com


2023-12-07 10:28:55.791494
Is XRP’s Growth Fueled by Bitcoin? John Deaton’s Insights Spark Debate
Mustafa has been writing about Blockchain and crypto since many years. He has previous trading experience and has been working in the Fintech industry since 2017.
Story Highlights John Deaton emphasizes that XRP's success is intricately linked to Bitcoin's movements.
Deaton injects humor into the ongoing Bitcoin vs. XRP debate, rejecting extreme views on either cryptocurrency.
Recent market dynamics show a 5% rise in XRP to $0.65, hinting at potential gains for XRP holders
Crypto lawyer John Deaton, a known XRP advocate, recently shared some key insights about what’s driving the price of XRP, which is currently around $0.65. Are there important messages here for XRP holders? Let’s break it down.
Figuring Out the Basics
According to Deaton, the rise of Bitcoin acts as a catalyst for altcoins like XRP. He explains, “XRP hasn’t broken free from Bitcoin. It’s just a fact, no matter how much you or anyone else wants to deny it.” This statement came after a staunch XRP supporter expressed disappointment upon learning Deaton also owns Bitcoin.
Here’s my answer:

An #XRPHolder got mad at me because he learned I owned #Bitcoin and demanded that I remove his name from the list of 75K #XRPHolders because he refused to be represented by an attorney dumb enough to own #BTC 😂 https://t.co/VZPhkwVo3k — John E Deaton (@JohnEDeaton1) December 6, 2023
Deaton’s lighthearted response, while failing to placate all XRP holders, offered a much-needed dose of humor amidst the rising tension. The exchange between Deaton and Shelton highlights the ongoing debate within the cryptocurrency community regarding the relative importance of different digital assets.
Also Read: John Deaton’s Top 10 Altcoin Picks for the Bull Market
The Debate Continues
Peter Shelton expressed his disappointment in Deaton talking more about Bitcoin than XRP lately. He feels it’s like a “lack of respect” for the XRP community. But Deaton disagrees, saying that recognizing Bitcoin’s importance doesn’t mean XRP isn’t important. He goes a step further by rejecting extreme views favoring either Bitcoin or XRP exclusively.
Don't care what you owned but since the case you seem to be plugging btc and not xrp, surely you can see why army members are disappointed with your lack of respect for them — peter shelton (@Astroboy61Peter) December 6, 2023
Even though Deaton emphasizes the link between XRP and Bitcoin, recent movements in the market show a bit of hope for XRP fans. In the last 24 hours, XRP went up by 5%, reaching $0.65. But, keep in mind, this gain is still closely tied to Bitcoin’s recent jump above $44k.
Let’s Focus on the Bigger Picture
Deaton’s message is a reminder that, despite some positive moves, XRP’s destiny is closely connected to how well Bitcoin does overall. So, if you’re an XRP holder hoping for bigger profits, rooting for Bitcoin might just be the smart move. As Deaton puts it, Bitcoin’s success lifts all crypto boats, including the often-debated XRP.
This Might Interest You: Crypto Price Prediction: Where Will Bitcoin, Ethereum, XRP & Chainlink Be in 24 Months?


2023-12-07 10:28:55.807955
Insights from Crypto Gurus: Why SHIB, SPCT, and XRP are the Go-To Investments Now
PRESS RELEASE Published December 7, 2023 PRWireCenter
In recent developments, Shiba Inu (SHIB), VC Spectra (SPCT), and XRP (XRP) have gained attention as go-to investments in the crypto market. While Shiba Inu experiences a surge in value following a successful coin burn, VC Spectra impresses investors with its innovative features and presale performance. Additionally, XRP sees a rise in value backed by strong community support for the Evernode project.
Why are crypto gurus backing these top altcoins? Let’s find out!
>>BUY SPCT TOKENS NOW<<
Summary
The price of Shiba Inu (SHIB) is expected to soar to $0.00001919 next year.
VC Spectra (SPCT) keeps surging during its ongoing presale.
XRP’s (XRP) price is predicted to reach $1.71 in 2024.
SHIB Surges Amid Shiba Inu Coin Burn Report
On November 23, 2023, Shibburn.com released a monthly burn report for Shiba Inu (SHIB). The Shiba Inu coin burn report claimed the successful elimination of 1.36 billion Shiba Inu (SHIB) tokens from circulation in the last thirty days.
Following the Shiba Inu coin burn, there was a gradual surge in Shiba Inu’s (SHIB) price from $0.000008025 to $0.000008628 between November 23 and 27, marking a 6% increase in value.
Shiba Inu’s (SHIB) bullish momentum continued, as the SHIB token’s scarcity increased. Consequently, Shiba Inu (SHIB) peaked at $0.000009415 on December 4, before retracing slightly to $0.000008992 on December 5.
With the recent token burn, experts anticipate a further increase in the value of Shiba Inu (SHIB). As a result, their Shiba Inu price prediction for 2024 stands at $0.00001919.
VC Spectra’s (SPCT) Public Presale Shatters Expectations
VC Spectra (SPCT) has emerged as the go-to investment for crypto enthusiasts seeking significant returns, according to insights from crypto gurus. This decentralized hedge fund project has garnered attention due to its innovative features and successful public presale.
One of the key factors that make VC Spectra (SPCT) an attractive investment option is its range of cutting-edge products designed to enhance user experience and maximize the potential of decentralized finance. By offering innovative solutions, VC Spectra sets itself apart in the market and provides investors with the opportunity to capitalize on the growing interest in DeFi.
Moreover, the formidable network effect created by VC Spectra (SPCT) adds to its appeal. The project has established valuable connections with strategic partners, industry experts, and advisors, creating a robust support system for its portfolio projects. This network effect not only fosters collaboration but also facilitates mentorship and guidance.
The recent surge in value experienced by VC Spectra (SPCT) further solidifies its status as one of the best altcoins available. During the public presale, the SPCT token skyrocketed from $0.008 to $0.077, marking an impressive 862.5% increase. Such exponential growth has caught the attention of investors, and projections indicate that SPCT has the potential to exceed its initial valuation of $0.080 at the presale’s end, making it the best cryptocurrency to buy today!
>>BUY SPCT TOKENS NOW<<
XRP’s (XRP) Value Rises With Evernode Airdrop Announcement
On December 3, 2023, the XRP community demonstrated its enthusiasm and backing for the Evernode project by registering over 2.12 billion XRP tokens for the airdrop. This impressive response came from 23,858 XRP addresses, underscoring the community’s rigid support for Evernode.
This latest Ripple XRP news led to a 3% surge in its value. Within 24 hours, the XRP crypto price rose from $0.62 to $0.64.
However, due to prevailing market conditions, XRP encountered a minor retracement. Between December 4 and 5, the XRP crypto price declined by 4.69%, reaching $0.61.
Despite the temporary setback, experts remain optimistic about the XRP’s future. They predict the XRP crypto price could surge as high as $1.71 next year.
Learn more about VC Spectra (SPCT) and its presale:
Buy Presale: https://invest.vcspectra.io/login
Website: https://vcspectra.io
Telegram: https://t.me/VCSpectra
Twitter: https://twitter.com/spectravcfund


2023-12-07 14:28:55.784960
JPMorgan Cites XRP and Ripple as Players in Unlocking $120B Value Trapped in Cross-Border Payments
JPMorgan, a prominent global financial services firm, released a report concerning unlocking $120 billion value in cross-border payments, citing XRP and Ripple.
- Advertisement -
Notably, the report sought to elaborate on how banks could leverage central bank digital currencies for corporate purposes.
JPMorgan highlighted that multinational corporations transfer approximately $23.5 trillion internationally each year. The firm noted that this value constituted around 25% of the global GDP.
However, to facilitate these massive transactions, the multinationals depend on cross-border payment systems that fall short in cost-efficiency, speed, and transparency.
- Advertisement -
Furthermore, JPMorgan mentioned that these sub-optimal processes generate substantial annual transaction costs of $120 billion. Also, it noted that the system triggers additional expenses related to foreign exchange conversion, trapped liquidity, and delayed settlements.
Ripple and XRP Among Efforts to Solve Cross-border Payment
Meanwhile, JP Morgan noted several private sector entities like Ripple, SWIFT, and the CLS Group have undertaken efforts to address the challenges of cross-border settlement and delays.
As for the CLS Group, the report noted that it features a multi-currency FX net intended to eliminate settlement risks. However, the solution only supports 18 currencies, with significant challenges to adding more.
Furthermore, the report highlighted that SWIFT established a system to enhance transparency in cross-border payments and reduce processing time.
- Advertisement -
However, it pointed out that SWIFT still depends on the antiquated correspondent banking system involving multiple intermediaries. Consequently, the challenges of trapped liquidity and settlement risk persist.
On the other hand, JPMorgan acknowledged the real-time nature of Ripple’s cross-border payment infrastructure that uses XRP as a settlement instrument. The issue it cited with Ripple’s system is cryptocurrency’s inherent volatility.
“High volatility of XRP leading to limited willingness from banks in using it to facilitate payments,” the statement read.
As a result, JPMorgan concluded that the efforts of various private sector entities to solve the challenges in cross-border payments have been merely a partial success.
“We are yet to see a scalable and seamless solution that can work across countries, currencies, and payment systems,” the report claimed.
In response, JPMorgan proposed that a multi-currency central bank digital currency (mCBDC) network could serve as a viable blueprint to address multiple issues concurrently.
It claimed the approach has the potential to make 24/7, real-time cross-border, cross-currency payments a tangible and achievable reality.


2023-12-07 03:28:55.786012
XRP News: Optimism Toward the SEC v Ripple Case Resurfaces
The SEC will attempt to scoop up the $770 million from XRP sales to institutional investors. However, case law suggests a significantly lower penalty.
Morrison v NAB: The US Supreme Court ruled the SEC only has jurisdiction over US-based sales. During remedies-related discovery, XRP will demonstrate the amount of XRP sales to US institutional investors.
Liu v SEC: The court ruled a disgorgement amount must not exceed the net profits and must go to the victims. Ripple will deduct expenses associated with the sale of XRP to US institutional investors to derive net profits.
SEC v Govil: The court ruled the SEC cannot demand a punitive disgorgement without demonstrating the financial impact of the XRP sales on investors. If the price of XRP is higher than at the time of sales to institutional investors, there was no harm to investors. Ripple will look to demonstrate the uptrend in the price of XRP before, during, and after the sale of XRP to institutional investors.
With case law on the side of the Defendant, the SEC could settle before the conclusion of discovery. A favorable settlement would be a boon for XRP and the crypto market. However, XRP could face another period of uncertainty.
The SEC will likely appeal the court ruling on the Programmatic Sales of XRP. Significantly, the appeal process would likely extend into 2025, possibly leaving XRP in limbo for another year.
However, the outcome of the SEC v Coinbase (COIN) case could alter the SEC’s plans to appeal against the ruling.
SEC v Coinbase: The Coinbase Motion to Dismiss Ruling
On January 17, 2024, the SEC and Coinbase will deliver oral arguments regarding the Coinbase motion to dismiss (MTD). Coinbase argues the SEC lacks the statutory authority to regulate crypto exchanges. If Judge Katherine Failla grants the MTD, the SEC would lose its bid to classify cryptos traded on exchange as securities.
The outcome of the SEC v Coinbase case could significantly impact the US crypto market. Another SEC loss may incentivize US lawmakers to roll out a US crypto regulatory framework favoring innovation while protecting investors.
XRP Price Action


2023-12-07 10:28:55.812522
Spotlight on High-Return Cryptos: XRP, THORChain, and VC Spectra in Depth Analysis
XRP news indicates that significant delays in on-chain withdrawals, especially affecting XRP (XRP) transactions, emerged on Uphold’s digital currency platform. On the other hand, Florence Finance suffered a phishing attack, with THORChain (RUNE) used as a transfer bridge for the stolen assets. Meanwhile, VC Spectra (SPCT) caught the crypto market off-guard, skyrocketing by 862.5% to $0.077 due to its massive utility.
Let’s embark on the best crypto to buy: VC Spectra (SPCT), XRP (XRP), or THORChain (RUNE).
>>BUY SPCT TOKENS NOW<<
Summary
Analysts indicate that VC Spectra (SPCT) will exceed its $0.080 target price.
Experts predict that the XRP crypto price will jump to $0.75 by the end of 2023.
THORChain (RUNE) is expected to soar to $7.75 by December 31, 2023.
Uphold Platform Faces XRP Holder Backlash Amidst Withdrawal Delays
On December 5, 2023, XRP news revealed that Uphold’s digital currency platform experienced notable delays in processing on-chain withdrawals for XRP transactions. Users expressed concerns about this situation, prompting the Uphold team to issue a response.
Uphold highlighted that the delay was a temporary technical setback. Customers were reassured that normal withdrawal timeframes would be restored shortly, even though the precise cause of the technical issue remained unspecified.
The timing of this disruption is crucial as it aligns with the current registration phase for the Evernode airdrop, eagerly awaited by XRP holders. While there are speculations connecting the withdrawal delays to the airdrop, no definitive evidence supports this theory. Instead, the delay might be rooted in scalability challenges, a common concern within the digital currency landscape.
Meanwhile, XRP news reveals that the XRP crypto price oscillated between $0.61 and $0.64 over the past week. Although Bitcoin’s (BTC) recent price jump initiated a massive upward trend in the crypto space, the XRP crypto price has continuously grappled with increased market volatility.
However, the XRP price prediction indicates that the XRP crypto price will soar to $0.75 by the end of 2023. The bullish forecast is rooted in XRP’s recent partnerships and upgrades.
Florence Finance Hit By Phishing Attack: What’s Next For THORChain (RUNE)?
On November 30, a sophisticated phishing attack targeted Florence Finance, a real-world assets (RWA) project primarily focused on lending. The attack resulted in a substantial loss of approximately 1.45 million USDC.
The incident was executed through address poisoning. Analysts believe the attack highlights the security challenges confronting crypto projects, underscoring the imperative for heightened security measures in digital finance.
For context, address poisoning is a malicious tactic used by threat actors to manipulate network behavior. Once executed, it may potentially redirect traffic, initiate service disruptions, or enable unauthorized access to sensitive data.
After the phishing event, the hackers tactically moved the funds through various wallets, eventually converting them to Ethereum (ETH) and bridging them to THORChain (RUNE). Although suspicious transactions unfolded on November 28, Florence Finance refrained from issuing a statement to their X community about the incident.
It’s important to outline that THORChain’s (RUNE) price dynamics were unaffected by the attack. On-chain data reveals that THORChain (RUNE) soared from $6.10 to $6.67 in the past week. THORChain (RUNE) also peaked at $7.27 on December 4, although increased price correction caused a slight decline in RUNE’s price.
Experts attribute THORChain’s (RUNE) price rally to increased trading activity and strategic partnerships. With investors flocking to THORChain (RUNE), analysts predict THORChain (RUNE) will surge to $7.75 by the end of 2023, cementing it as one of the best DeFi coins.
VC Spectra’s (SPCT) Meteoric Ascent Stuns Investors
While THORChain (RUNE) has demonstrated its prowess in the decentralized exchange landscape, analysts believe VC Spectra (SPCT) is giving it a run for its money! The new market entrant sets itself apart with a keen focus on user satisfaction, enticing investors with quarterly dividends and buybacks. Furthermore, the inclusion of voting rights for token holders reinforces VC Spectra’s (SPCT) pledge to uphold a democratic governance model.
With phishing attacks and security breaches a real possibility in the crypto space, VC Spectra (SPCT) is considered the most secure decentralized hedge fund. The platform boasts cutting-edge encryption protocols and rigorous security audits to identify potential vulnerabilities. Moreover, VC Spectra’s (SPCT) dedicated team of cybersecurity experts constantly monitors for any suspicious activities, adding a vital layer of security.
Although increased price correction is a possibility in the crypto scene, VC Spectra (SPCT) has consistently assured its investors of maximum returns and minimized risks. The integration of AI exemplifies VC Spectra’s (SPCT) commitment to robust risk management, establishing it as the best cryptocurrency for massive financial growth.
VC Spectra (SPCT) experienced a remarkable ascent in Stage 5 of its public presale, skyrocketing by an impressive 862.5% to reach $0.077 ahead of schedule. As investors cash in on VC Spectra’s (SPCT) utility, experts indicate that SPCT will exceed its $0.080 milestone price once it is listed on major crypto exchanges.
Learn more about the VC Spectra presale here:
Presale: https://invest.vcspectra.io/login
Website: https://vcspectra.io
Telegram: https://t.me/VCSpectra
Twitter: https://twitter.com/spectravcfund


2023-12-07 11:28:55.788596
Ripple Rises Again: How XRP Price is Heading Towards $1 ?
Elena is an expert in technical analysis and risk management in cryptocurrency market. She has 10+year experience in writing - accordingly she is avid journalists with a passion towards researching new insights coming into crypto erena.
The XRP ecosystem has been a buzzing hive of activity, marked by Ripple CEO Brad Garlinghouse’s nod to the influential XRP community in 2023. Despite his recognition, Garlinghouse in his X post has humbly diverted praise to the loyal XRP supporters, attributing much of Ripple’s success and recent legal wins to their steadfast backing. In the midst of this the crypto market’s festive rally, led by Bitcoin’s climb to $44K, fuels optimism as we approach 2024. This bullish wave extends to altcoins, triggering XRP’s recovery.
Here’s Why: The Credit Goes To XRP Community
With Communiting backing, the price of XRP doubled, leaving many crypto enthusiasts jumping for joy. Brad Garlinghouse, the CEO of Ripple, is being hailed as the “Comeback King” for leading the company to this triumph, dispelling claims that Ripple tokens were sold illegally as unregistered securities. The dismissal of the lawsuit and the SEC’s futile attempt to appeal carries significant weight, impacting how regulators approach cryptocurrencies and igniting discussions about the dire need for transparent and equitable regulatory frameworks. This win underscores the crucial significance of regulatory clarity and the powerful influence of community support within the crypto realm.
XRP Recovery Possible? If this happens…
XRP’s price is stable at $0.622, suggesting a rebound. The Relative Strength Index (RSI) and Moving Average Convergence Divergence (MACD) indicate a bullish turn. A predicted break of $0.644 might launch XRP toward $0.700, a critical milestone.
In the meanwhile, bullish expectations and a cup-and-handle reversal in XRP’s daily chart support Ripple’s $1 recovery by year’s end. XRP is currently trading at $0.6498 and could go toward $0.71 as Ripple holders gain confidence in the market rally. While indicators predict a positive reversal, breaching $0.71 could lead to a large XRP increase, but a reversal at $0.70 might cause a fall to $0.58-$0.60.
At the same time, we can’t overlook the tumultuous Ripple whales, who have been adding to their holdings and now have 6.73 billion XRP. This is in addition to the XRP community. Since mid-November, these addresses—which contain 100,000 to 1 million XRP—have added 60 million tokens, worth more than $31 million. A large number of whales buying XRP at once have a track record of driving up the price of the cryptocurrency.
The collective strength of supporters, coupled with technical signals, paints a hopeful picture for XRP’s recovery. Amid legal victories and price projections, XRP’s trajectory is steered by the loyal community’s backing and influential whale activity. Can XRP mark $1? Let’s wait and watch.


2023-12-07 11:28:55.797378
Coinbase’s Latest Moves with XRP and AVAX Futures; The Rising Tide of $RBLZ in its Advanced Presale Stage
TLDR
XRP delivers a lackluster weekly performance, but gains are coming soon.
Avalanche gains 3% in a week, but more gains are coming in December.
Rebel Satoshi continues attracting investors after climbing 30% in three weeks.
Top altcoins like XRP (XRP) and Avalanche (AVAX) have performed differently after the crypto market started December with bulls charging. Meanwhile, Rebel Satoshi ($RBLZ) continues seeing more investor interest after completing its Early Bird Round in a record-breaking three weeks.
Between XRP, Avalanche, and Rebel Satoshi , which token promises massive gains in 2023? Continue reading to discover!
XRP Sheds 1% In a Week: Is an Uptrend Coming?
XRP has had performed deplorably over the past seven days, starting November 24 when the crypto traded around $0.6184. XRP started climbing on November 26 after Mastercard partnered with XRPL Labs to create a debit card that integrates XRP. This bullish news saw XRP surge as high as $0.6347 on November 26.
However, as the buzz around this news diminished, XRP began correcting downward. By December 1, XRP had stabilized around $0.6115. This price means XRP has shed $1.12% in a week. This performance has left investors asking, is XRP a good crypto to buy for massive profits in 2023?
Per analysts, XRP will record marginal gains to close December at $0.6386. Experts peg this forecast on XRP gaining more adoption on the November 30 news of XRP introducing single-sided XRP staking on the Futureverse after MoaiFinance launches its DEX.
Avalanche Jumps 3% In a Week: More Gains Coming?
Avalanche has performed decently over the past seven days. On November 24, AVAX was trading around $21.06. However, AVAX started climbing on November 30 after data from IntoTheBlock revealed Avalanche has the lowest concentration of whale investors within the Avalanche ecosystem, indicating a stable investor base.
This bullish news saw Avalanche jump as high as $22.49 on December 1 before stabilizing around $21.87. This price means AVAX has gained $3.85% in a week. This performance has left investors asking, will Avalanche continue trending upward, and is it a good a top crypto to buy now?
According to analysts, AVAX will continue surging to close the year at $24.07. Experts peg this prediction on AVAX getting more adoption after eCash launched Avalanche staking rewards in November. This forecast adds AVAX to the list of altcoins to watch!
Rebel Satoshi Enters Rebels Round 1 With a Bang: More Gains In Store!
Rebel Satoshi, an emerging meme coin that aims to challenge centralized organizations in the crypto space, has drawn hordes of investors into its ongoing public presale. Investors are finding Rebel Satoshi one of the best cryptos to invest in because of its native $RBLZ token, which offers investors access to the entire Rebel Satoshi ecosystem.
Specifically, $RBLZ grants investors access to Rebel Satoshi’s features like an NFT marketplace, a staking program, and a P2E game. Moreover, $RBLZ investors will access a vibrant community that celebrates the defiant and rebellious spirit of disrupters like Rebel Satoshi and Guy Fawkes.
As of December, Rebel Satoshi had entered Rebels Round 1 of its ongoing presale. During this round, investors can purchase $RBLZ at $0.013 using Bitcoin (BTC) and 50 other cryptos. The next $RBLZ is $0.018. If it surges $0.018, $RBLZ could offer investors up to 38.46% ROI, explaining why the market is buzzing about Rebel Satoshi.


2023-12-07 08:28:55.794351
Top Bitcoin Analyst Says It’s Now or Never for XRP
XRP has captured the attention of several notable market watchers, with prominent Bitcoin (BTC) analyst Muro being the latest to express sustained interest in the asset.
- Advertisement -
After months of ignoring XRP, Muro’s renewed fascination with the asset came to limelight late last month following its impressive 5.55% intraday surge on Nov. 22. Muro confirmed that XRP had broken out of a downward trendline and was on the verge of an uptrend.
Renewed Interest in XRP
He projected a looming rally that could see XRP rise to the $0.80 price target. The analyst remained firmly optimistic of XRP’s potential to eventually surge to the target, emphasizing that this scenario would materialize whether or not the asset retested the consolidation low.
However, while his analysis pointed to an imminent price upswing, Muro provided no timeline for this rally. XRP has since continued to consolidate, with a discouraging performance contributing to waning investor optimism. Nonetheless, Muro remains unfazed, evidenced by his latest reports on XRP.
- Advertisement -
In a Dec. 5 post, the analyst reiterated his bullish stance on XRP, stressing that the cryptocurrency is poised for a “pump.” He mentioned initiating a buying position in XRP with a close stop-loss order set just below its recent low values. This strategy aims to minimize potential losses if the market moves against the position.
Muro provided an update to this trade, disclosing his 37% profit as XRP rose beyond the $0.6270 price threshold. The analyst then highlighted the price movements XRP exhibited following the rise to $0.6270. He said the coin was testing traders’ patience with this consolidation.
“Now or Never”
Muro emphasized that he typically does not show interest in XRP. However, the current price position of the asset has shown him that the time to capitalize on the asset’s potential rally is “now or never.”
$XRP typically testing patience again since last night’s entry, I usually don’t trade this coin but TA wise it said to me that now or never, let’s see https://t.co/VQbrZtmQ0B pic.twitter.com/uPAk9Q03xd — Muro (@MuroCrypto) December 6, 2023
- Advertisement -
The last time XRP recorded such consolidation on the 1-hour chart was in October. XRP broke above the $0.50 resistance in mid-October. However, the coin traded sideways between $0.5090 and $0.5355 for three days, testing the patience of market participants.
XRP eventually broke out of this consolidation, first soaring to $0.5780 on Oct. 24 and then rallying to $0.7277 on Nov. 6. Interestingly, XRP has increased 2.4% since Muro’s latest disclosure, currently trading for $0.6450 to reclaim the $0.65 territory.


2023-12-07 14:28:55.805630
Can XRP reach the $1? Exploring the potential and challenges
XRP is currently exchanging hands at $0.6267, an increase of 0.81% in the last 24 hours. There is a slight chance that it may surpass the $1 mark. However, that is bound to happen eventually, with no definite timeline in any form. That does not undermine the way it has performed in the market. The token has jumped by 65.91% in the last 12 months and stands at a market cap of more than $33 billion.
Two aspects will determine how and when XRP breaks the milestone. The first instance is the Ripple Payment Network. The Ripple Payment network facilitates instant and cost-effective cross-border payments. The model has been able to secure significant partnerships. XRP tokens back to the Ripple Payment network. It was a huge concept three years ago, and expectations were that it would touch the sky in the days to come.
A reason why that did not happen or has not happened is what forms the second aspect—a legal battle with the US Securities & Exchange Commission.
The Commission is attempting to classify XRP as an unregistered token. Assuming the case goes through, XRP will lose a lot of investors, and the price of XRP will be severely affected. There is a minor chance that Ripple may win the court case. If that happens, the investors holding onto their XRP tokens in portfolios will fetch better profits.
That would result in XRP reaching the $1 threshold and easily transcending it. Once more, XRP has approached that milestone. During that period in July, the market value of an individual token was $0.95. Bear in mind that during the winter season, most crypto market participants were pessimistic about their portfolios.
Ripple is closer to winning the case. That being said, the SEC is less likely to drop the egg from the terrace without any protection. Meaning, this is a high-profile case, and a lot is at stake. The Commission will be extra careful in letting the case go into their hands. Reports that are surfacing claim that a settlement between the Commission and Ripple could be $770 million.
Whether Ripple agrees to it is yet to be seen. The crypto venture has contemplated that fighting the SEC in court will cost them ~$200 million above the settlement price. This will take the total cost to ~$1 billion, which could otherwise be invested in innovation. The XRP coin price prediction estimates that the token can end this year at $0.98. That is still closer to the $1 mark under current conditions. Needless to say, volatility can spoil the token without any prior notice.
Even so, Ripple might wish to reassess its strategy for advancing the legal dispute with the SEC. Although the achievement of the milestone is appealing, they would prefer not to do so in a manner that would damage their reputation or alienate their community from the ecosystem.


2023-12-07 06:28:55.789083
Here’s How Much XRP You Need to Make $1M, $5M, or $10M If XRP Hits only $2
To become an XRP millionaire, this article calculates how many units to hold when the coin’s price hits $2.
- Advertisement -
Becoming an XRP millionaire takes a well-calculated strategy and planning that must start now. With volatility the defining order in the crypto ecosystem, acquiring XRP today gives investors a fair chance of hitting $1 million or more in earnings, but how many must one buy now?
Investment Plan to Become an XRP Millionaire
At the time of writing, XRP is worth $0.6148 after it saw a total of $738,283,501 traded on exchanges in the past 24 hours. Determining the quantity to buy now to rake in $1 million at $2 entails dividing the potential $1,000,000 target by $2. This ultimately gives 500,000 XRP.
To factor in what this projected unit will cost now, we can multiply 500,000 XRP by the current price of the asset which comes in at $307,400.
- Advertisement -
This same calculation holds for an investor aiming to make $5 million and $10 million when XRP eventually climbs back to the $2 price level. To hit the $5 million mark, the investor must buy a total of 2,500,000 XRP now, a quantity valued at $1,537,000 at current price levels.
As discovered thus far, making a millionaire in long term XRP trading is possible, however, it requires an enormous capital base. To hit $10 million, an investor has to hold 5,000,000, XRP by setting aside $3,074,000 at current price level.
While the seed capital appears huge, the potential returns if XRP eventually touches $2 notably makes the bet worth it.
Why $2 Price is Pivotal
XRP is arguably one of the most sensitive digital currencies in the market, but since the Ripple vs SEC lawsuit broke out, it has maintained a conservative growth trend. Despite the positive ruling pronounced by Judge Analisa Torres in July, XRP failed to reach the $1 resistance point.
- Advertisement -
Experts have weighed in on its growth trend with XRP holders’ lawyer John Deaton projecting that the real FOMO – Fear of Missing Out on XRP will set in when the cryptocurrency touches the $2 price target.
With XRP’s All-Time High (ATH) pegged at $3.84, the $2 level remains a pivotal point to watch in breaching its historic high.


2023-12-07 00:28:55.813941
XRP’s Victory Takes Ripple to the Flight of Disrupting Banking System
The recent ruling in SEC v. Ripple has sent shockwaves through the crypto community and beyond, sparking both excitement and apprehension.
This pivotal moment, characterized by a nuanced distinction between Ripple’s institutional and secondary platform sales, has ignited a crucial debate about the application of securities laws to digital assets. As the dust settles, it is evident that the Ripple effect has irrevocably altered the digital asset landscape, bringing Ripple closer to the mission of disrupting the banking system.

🚀 #Ripple's #Metaco joins forces with #IBM to revolutionize crypto security! 💼💎 Introducing the Offline Signing Orchestrator, a game-changer in cold storage tech for digital assets. 🛡️🔒 Stay ahead of the crypto curve with this groundbreaking collaboration! 🌐🔗 pic.twitter.com/Jtxqq6cesz — Collin Brown (@CollinBrownXRP) December 6, 2023
Judge Torres’s Ruling and Its Implications
Judge Torres’ July 13th summary judgment stands as a testament to the evolving nature of digital assets. Her meticulous differentiation between Ripple’s direct institutional sales, deemed securities transactions, and those conducted on secondary platforms, deemed security, has challenged the SEC’s broad interpretation of the Howey test.
This legal earthquake has opened a fissure in the traditional framework, forcing a reevaluation of how existing regulations apply to the burgeoning world of digital assets.
Read Also: Ripple and SEC Could Reach Settlement Agreement On XRP Lawsuit Today. Here’s why
Ripple’s Strategic Maneuvers
Emboldened by Judge Torres’ decision, Ripple has further solidified its position through two strategic maneuvers:
Denial of Interlocutory Appeal: The SEC’s attempt to overturn the ruling regarding secondary platform sales was met with a resounding denial, paving the way for innovation and growth within the secondary market. This decision has instilled a sense of confidence in the crypto community, encouraging further development and adoption.
Dismissal of Charges Against Individuals: Recognizing the potential for protracted legal battles, the SEC strategically dismissed charges against Ripple executives. This calculated move has accelerated the legal process, potentially influencing future regulations and expediting Ripple’s journey toward a definitive resolution.
We are on twitter, follow us to connect with us :- @TimesTabloid1 — TimesTabloid (@TimesTabloid1) July 15, 2023
Nuanced Perspective and Legal Precedent
The Ripple case has exposed the complexities of applying the Howey test to the dynamic environment of secondary markets, where buyer-seller relationships are less direct and investment contracts may be less evident. Judge Torres’s keen distinction underscores the importance of considering the specific facts and context of each case, rather than resorting to a rigid and inflexible approach.
This nuanced perspective aligns with the recent ruling in SEC v. Terraform Labs, where Judge Rakoff similarly acknowledged the varying nature of secondary market transactions. These seemingly contradictory yet complementary decisions highlight the need for a more flexible and dynamic regulatory framework that can adapt to the ever-evolving digital asset ecosystem.
Future Implications and Ripple’s Influence
As Ripple marches onward through the damages phase and potential appeals, its impact will reverberate throughout the crypto landscape. Cases like SEC v. Coinbase and SEC v. Binance, currently navigating the legal system, may yield diverse outcomes, further shaping the regulatory terrain.
Read Also: Judge Torres Sets Briefing Schedule For XRP Lawsuit. Here’s the Case Could End
Conclusion and Market Impact
While Bitcoin and Ethereum exhibit promising bullish signals, Ripple navigates a critical juncture. Facing a potential 5% drop, its immediate future remains less certain.
<
However, the Ripple case serves as a powerful reminder of the dynamic nature of the digital asset ecosystem and the potential for disruptive change.
As the market continues to evolve, Ripple’s victory stands as a catalyst for further innovation and a more inclusive regulatory framework for the digital asset space.
The Ripple case stands as a pivotal moment in the digital asset revolution. It has opened crucial discussions about the future of cryptocurrencies and their interactions with traditional securities laws. While the path forward remains uncertain, one thing is clear: the landscape is shifting, and Ripple’s victory stands as a testament to the growing recognition of digital assets as a distinct and legitimate investment class.
Follow us on Twitter, Facebook, Telegram, and Google News


2023-12-07 08:28:55.804692
Ripple’s XRP Prepares for a Potential 500% Price Surge to $3 Following a Turning Point in SEC Case
Ripple’s XRP shows signs of a significant rebound in light of recent legal developments and strong technical indicators.
The ongoing SEC cases and their outcomes are critical factors influencing XRP’s future market performance.
In the dynamic world of cryptocurrency, Ripple’s native token, XRP, stands at the cusp of an extraordinary surge, potentially climbing by 500% to a $3 valuation, spurred by recent favorable turns in its SEC lawsuit. This promising outlook is bolstered by legal victories and solid market indicators, a sentiment echoed in Reuters’ latest coverage on Ripple’s evolving story.
The recent surge in XRP’s price was anticipated in a previous CNF post, which underscored XRP’s robust capabilities. Notably, XRP’s potential to process up to 3,400 transactions per second showcases its formidable strength as a global financial tool. However, it’s important to note that in real-world applications, the practical transaction speeds typically range between 500 and 700 TPS, reflecting a more realistic usage scenario.
Understanding Ripple’s Legal Landscape
The legal landscape for Ripple has been significantly influenced by rulings in Morrison v NAB and Liu v SEC, which limited the SEC’s jurisdiction and set precedents on disgorgement, aligning with Ripple’s defense strategy. This could lead to a favorable settlement between Ripple and the SEC, positively affecting XRP’s market position. However, uncertainty persists with the potential SEC appeal on XRP’s programmatic sales, which might prolong legal ambiguity until 2025.
Moreover, the outcome of the SEC v Coinbase case is crucial, as a ruling in Coinbase’s favor could reshape Ripple’s legal journey and have a wider impact on the U.S. crypto market. This case is pivotal not only for Ripple but for the broader regulatory framework of cryptocurrencies in the U.S.
XRP Price Movement Analysis
Current charts exhibit bullish trends for XRP. The token has consistently held above vital EMAs on weekly, daily, and 4-hourly charts.
“The resilience of XRP in maintaining key levels against market volatility is a testament to its underlying strength,” notes a leading blockchain analyst.
This trend indicates potential upward movement, though breaking through certain resistance levels remains key.
Technical Indicators’ Perspectives
The RSI and MACD indicators point to bullish momentum for XRP. A successful breach of resistance could pave the way for a surge, yet failing to do so might trigger a downturn.
Ripple’s CEO praises the XRP community’s unwavering support as instrumental in the company’s legal successes, underscoring the collective effort driving Ripple’s progress.
As a blockchain expert, I view Ripple’s situation as a defining moment in its journey. “Ripple’s blend of legal strategy, market dynamics, and community engagement positions it for a potentially historic value increase,” I opine. This mix of factors makes XRP a focal point for investors and enthusiasts, as it navigates through a critical phase in its narrative.
Crypto News Flash does not endorse and is not responsible for or liable for any content, accuracy, quality, advertising, products, or other materials on this page. Readers should do their own research before taking any actions related to cryptocurrencies. Crypto News Flash is not responsible, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with the use of or reliance on any content, goods, or services mentioned.


2023-12-07 16:03:55.812964
Focus on Sub-$1 Coins Like Dogecoin, Rebel Satoshi, XRP – Crypto News BTC
TLDR
Dogecoin surges 7% in every week, with specialists predicting marginal good points in December.
XRP flatlines round $0.62, however analysts imagine bulls are coming quickly.
Insurgent Satoshi good points guarantees buyers in Rebels Spherical 1 a 92.30% ROI.
With bulls taking on the broader crypto market, buyers have begun looking for high altcoins beneath $1 that promise large good points quickly. Fortunately, monetary specialists have pinpointed Dogecoin (DOGE), XRP (XRP), and Insurgent Satoshi ($RBLZ) because the finest cryptos to spend money on now!
Why do monetary specialists advocate investing in Dogecoin, XRP, and Rebel Satoshi? Let’s discover out!
Dogecoin Spikes 7% In a Week: Additional Features in Retailer!
Dogecoin has carried out effectively over the previous seven days, beginning November 26. On November 26, DOGE was hovering round $0.078. The November 29 information of the Nationwide Telecommunications and Info Administration (NTIA) and the Division of Commerce approving the DOGE-1 moon mission noticed DOGE begin gaining.
By December 3, DOGE had stabilized round $0.084. This worth means DOGE has gained 7.69% in every week. This first rate efficiency has seen Dogecoin choose up investor curiosity. Nevertheless, is DOGE a high crypto to purchase for short-term buyers looking for large income earlier than the 12 months ends?
In line with analysts, DOGE will proceed climbing to shut the 12 months at $0.086. Analysts attribute this prediction to DOGE getting extra adoption as a result of December 1 information that exposed Tesla plans to simply accept Dogecoin funds for its new-model Cybertrucks.
XRP Stagnates Round $0.62. Is an Uptrend Coming?
XRP has carried out dismally over the previous seven days. On November 26, XRP was hovering round $0.6243. Nevertheless, XRP began shedding worth as a result of December 1 information of Ripple Labs unlocking 1 billion XRP tokens. Happily, the December 2 information of HSBC partnering with Metaco, a Ripple Labs-owned custody agency, helped XRP get well.
As of December 3, XRP had leveled off round $0.6233. This worth denotes a 0.16% drop in every week. This weak efficiency has left potential buyers asking, is XRP a good crypto to purchase?
In line with specialists, XRP will proceed recording marginal good points as extra buyers trickle into the market, anticipating Ripple Labs’ victory towards the SEC. As such, specialists set the end-of-December XRP prediction at $0.68654.
Insurgent Satoshi Provides a Low Entry Level and Guarantees Huge Features!
Insurgent Satoshi, an upcoming meme coin that seeks to safe a $100 million market cap, has shortly turn out to be an investor favourite regardless of being in its public presale. This new mission’s success comes from its mission to create a sturdy neighborhood that contains the silent majority. Insurgent Satoshi goals to tackle centralized crypto entities by uniting the little guys.
Fueling this audacious mission is $RBLZ, Rebel Satoshi’s governance and membership token. $RBLZ is a deflationary ERC-20 token with a most provide of 250 million cash. This tokenomics construction explains why buyers take into account $RBLZ the finest crypto to spend money on now!
By December, Insurgent Satoshi was underway with Rebels Spherical 1 of its ongoing presale, with $RBLZ accessible for buy at $0.013. Apparently, buyers can use Bitcoin (BTC) and 50 different cryptos to purchase $RBLZ. Buyers that buy $RBLZ at $0.013 will notice a 92.30% ROI when $RBLZ attains its itemizing worth of $0.025.
It’s value noting that buyers in the course of the Early Fowl Spherical will notice a whopping 150% ROI when $RBLZ climbs to $0.025.
For the newest updates and extra info, make sure you go to the official Rebel Satoshi Presale Website or contact Insurgent Purple by way of Telegram


2023-12-06 22:28:55.787544
Ripple Price Prediction 2024: What is XRP?
What's next for Ripple (XRP)?
Key Takeaways
XRP’s future looks better than it was after a judge found that the crypto was not a security if it was sold on exchanges.
XRP is one of the oldest cryptos around, having come onto the open market in 2014.
Price forecasts for the ripple coin vary.
One Ripple price prediction says it can reach $2.14 in two years.
Ripple’s XRP cryptocurrency has been in the news after New York judge Analisa Torres ruled that the crypto was not a security, so long as it was being sold on a crypto exchange.
The judge’s ruling, which was made on July 13, 2023, put an end to nearly three years of legal wrangling as the United States Securities and Exchange Commission only partially succeeded in having it dubbed a security.
Judge Torres did find that XRP was a security if its parent company, Ripple Labs, was selling it. That, however, did not stop it from getting relisted by exchanges.
The SEC appealed the judge’s ruling, but this was thrown out in October.
The case could, potentially, affect the SEC’s proceedings against the Binance and Coinbase exchanges.
Ripple has been able to capitalize on a buoyant market since October.
November’s news that the network had upgraded its Ripple Payments platform, together the previous week’s announcements that Georgia’s central bank was to partner with Ripple in its bid to create its digital currency and its acceptance by the Dubai International Finance centre helped spark interest.
SEC tries to get cryptos judged securities again
On December 4, the SEC asked a judge to rule whether some crypto assets were securities. The agency’s request came as part of its ongoing legal case against Terraform Labs and its founder, Do Kwon. This could see the judge, Jed S Rakoff, contradict Judge Torres’ July ruling.
On December 6, it was trading at around $0.6335.
Ripple did not immediately respond to a request for comment.
But what is Ripple (XRP)? How does Ripple work? What is XRP used for? Let’s see what we can find out and also take a look at some of the Ripple price predictions that were being made as of December 6, 2023.
Ripple Coin Price Prediction
Let’s examine some of the Ripple price predictions made on December 6, 2023. It is crucial to bear in mind that price forecasts, particularly for a potentially volatile asset like cryptocurrency, often turn out to be inaccurate. Additionally, please remember that many long-term crypto price predictions are generated using algorithms, meaning they can change over time.
2024 2025 2030 Prediction #1 $0.7556 $1.89 $4.72 Prediction #2 $0.9184 $1.39 $8.98 Prediction #3 $1.58 $2.14 $6.45
Firstly, CoinCodex made a short-term Ripple price prediction for 2023 that suggested XRP would reach $0.8185 by December 11 before falling to $0.6539 by January 5 2024. The site’s technical analysis was bullish, with 28 indicators sending positive signals compared to just two making bearish ones.
Ripple Price Prediction for 2024
CaptainAltCoin said XRP would climb to $0.7556 by December 2024. PricePrediction.net said Ripple would be worth $0.9184 then. DigitalCoinPrice said the coin would stand at $1.58 next year.
Ripple Price Prediction for 2025
Moving on, DigitalCoinPrice said Ripple would reach $2.14 in 2025, while CaptainAltCoin thought it would be worth $1.89 then. PricePrediction.net had XRP stand at $1.39 in two years.
Ripple Price Prediction for 2030
Looking at a more long-term Ripple price prediction, PricePrediction.net said it would be worth $8.98 in 2030. DigitalCoinPrice said it would trade at $6.45 then. Meanwhile, CaptainAltCoin’s XRP price prediction said it would stand at $4.72 by the start of the next decade.
Advantages and Disadvantages of Ripple
Blockchain analytics company Messari recently released its quarterly report on Ripple . In it, they highlighted that it had responded well to the legal rulings and outlined some key advantages and disadvantages of the platform.
They found that in the third quarter of 2023, XRP had
44,013 average daily active addresses, down from 74,063 year-on-year and down from 53,990 quarter-on-quarter.
1.1 million daily transactions, down from 1.2 million on both a year-on-year and quarter-on-quarter basis.
An average market cap of $27.8 billion, up from $24.8 billion both year-on-year and quarter-on-quarter
Quarterly revenue of $144,774, up from $55,008 year-on-year but down from $188,376 quarter-on-quarter.
Advantages of Ripple
In its report, Messari said Ripple
Works well with NFTs, with the ability to create the tokens built into the core protocol.
Is a key player in the drive for governments to create their own Central Bank Digital Currencies (CBDCs).
Has been able to develop its ecosystem.
Disadvantages of Ripple
Messari’s quarterly report also said Ripple
Did not support smart contracts, computer programs that automatically execute once certain conditions are met. Smart contracts are a mainstay of such blockchains as Ethereum (ETH).
Had fewer active addresses.
Had seen a decline in average daily payment values.
Ripple price history
Now, let’s examine some of the highlights and lowlights of the Ripple price history . While we should never take past performance as an indicator of future results, knowing what the coin has achieved can provide us with some very useful context if we want to make or interpret a Ripple price prediction.
In terms of the Ripple price history, the coin started trading at around $0.005 in 2014, before it reached an all-time high of $3.84 on 4 January 2018, as the world of cryptocurrency was caught up in a significant bubble.
The coin dropped to below $1 in March of that year but was able to break above the dollar during the bull run of early 2021. By early 2022, though, it was back below the dollar and even spent a large chunk of the year below $0.50 as the crypto market suffered a series of crashes.
Ripple in 2023
There have been some encouraging signs in 2023, though. On 1 June, XRP was worth about $0.504. Over the following six weeks or so, following the news that the SEC was suing Binance and Coinbase, Ripple struggled. It fell to $0.4593 on 16 June. The court’s ruling saw it recover to $0.8875 on July 13. After that, it back down, and, on September 11 it was worth $0.4671. The coin recovered somewhat and, following the rejection of the SEC’s appeal, it cashed in on a blossoming market. By November 6, it was worth $0.7299. It dropped slightly over the following days to trade at $0.59 on November 17. By December 6, it was worth about $0.6335.
Ripple Price Analysis
XRP has been in an uptrend since October 10. It bounced from the ascending support level at $0.46 and reached its highest point of $0.7299 on November 6. A minor fall followed to $0.57 on November 21, but it recovered to its current level.
It is likely headed to around $0.80. It could drop after that but could recover, potentially reaching as high as $1.
Is Ripple a good investment?
It is hard to say with any certainty right now.
With a market cap of more than $33 billion at the time of writing, it is the fifth largest crypto by that metric. Unless it suffers the sort of crash that affected the LUNA cryptocurrency last year, it looks like it will be at the higher end of the crypto charts for some time.
As ever, though, the crucial thing before investing in any crypto is to do your research and never invest more money than you can afford to lose.
Will Ripple go up or down?
No one can say with any certainty. Remember that price predictions are very often wrong and that prices can, and do, go down as well as up.
Should I invest in Ripple?
Before you decide whether or not to invest in XRP, you will need to do your research, not only on Ripple but on other coins and tokens related to international money payments, such as Stellar Lumens (XLM). You should also remember that prices can go down as well as up, and never invest more money than you can afford to lose.
Who are the Founders of Ripple?
Ripple was founded by Jed McCaleb and Chris Larsen. McCaleb is a software developer and former student at the University of California. Before founding Ripple in 2012, he helped set up the now-defunct Mt Gox exchange and has gone on to found the Stellar (XLM) cryptocurrency. Larsen, meanwhile, has an MBA from Stanford and has been a prominent investor and privacy advocate. Larsen is currently chairman at Ripple, whose CEO is Brad Garlinghouse.
Who owns the most Ripple (XRP)?
The wallet with the most XRP is linked to Ripple itself.
The richest XRP Wallet Addresses
As of December 6, 2023, the addresses with the most XRP were
rMQ98K56yXJbDGv49ZSmW51sLn94Xe1mu1. Listed as Ripple 29, this wallet had 1,960,027,032 XRP or 1.96% of the supply.
rKveEyR1SrkWbJX214xcfH43ZsoGMb3PEv. Listed as Ripple 39, this wallet had 1,541,294,080 XRP, or 1.54% of the supply.
rEy8TFcrAPvhpKrwyrscNYyqBGUkE9hKaJ. Listed as Binance 4, this wallet had 1,477,168,712 XRP, or 1.48% of the supply.
rBEc94rUFfLfTDwwGN7rQGBHc883c2QHhx. Listed as Uphold 4, this wallet had 1,372,766,274 XRP, or 1.37% of the supply.
rs8ZPbYqgecRcDzQpJYAMhSxSi5htsjnza. Listed as Binance 5, this wallet had 931,894,888 XRP or 0.93% of the supply.
Fact Box
Supply and distribution Figures Maximum supply 100,000,000,000 Circulating supply (on December 6, 2023) 53,888,571,585 (53.89% of maximum supply) Holder distribution Top 10 holders own 11.07% of maximum supply, as of December 6, 2023
From the Whitepaper
Ripple’s whitepaper is a technical document that aims to explain what the platform is and what XRP does.
It says that many crypto platforms suffer from being slow because every computer, or node, on the network, has to work at the same time as all the others.
It says: “We present a novel consensus algorithm that circumvents this requirement by utilizing collectively trusted subnetworks within the larger network.
We show that the “trust” required of these subnetworks is minimal and can be further reduced with principled choice of the member nodes.
In addition, we show that minimal connectivity is required to maintain agreement throughout the whole network. The result is a
low-latency consensus algorithm that still maintains robustness in the face of Byzantine failures. We present this algorithm in its embodiment in the Ripple Protocol.”
Ripple (XRP) explained
In 2012 , Ripple Labs, then called NewCoin, created the Ripple payment protocol. The Ripple, or XRP, cryptocurrency powers it.
The idea was to set up a system that allows people to transfer money internationally quickly and simply. While it has not, as some crypto enthusiasts predicted, replaced the Swift/BIC international money transfer system, it has proven to be popular, and it is one of the largest cryptos by market cap.
XRP pays for transactions on the Ripple platform. People can also buy, sell, and trade it on crypto exchanges.
How Ripple Works
XRP is something a little different from a lot of other cryptos. With most crypto coins, such as, for instance, Bitcoin (BTC), people can validate transactions and secure the network regardless of whether or not they have the approval of the people behind the blockchain. Ripple only allows people who have been approved to do this.
Compared to other blockchain networks, XRP is a lot more centralized. On the other hand, it is, at least in theory, more secure than other platforms.
Something else that makes Ripple – the organization, rather than the crypto – stand out from its competitors is that it is a registered, for-profit company. This contrasts it with a lot of other blockchain organizations, which operate on a not-for-profit basis.
XRP is not mineable. Instead, every single one of the 100 billion XRPs that will ever exist already does exist. They are released onto the open market every month. As of December 6, 2023, there were a little under 53.9 billion XRP in circulation.
There was a total supply of 99,988,188,647 XRP on December 6, 2023. This implied that just over 11 million XRP had been burned, or removed from the market. Since Ripple does not burn XRP, it is pretty safe to assume that the coin holders had, at some point, burned their crypto.
FAQs
How many Ripple are there? On December 6 2023, there were a little under 53.9 million XRP out of a total supply of 99,988,188,647. Will Ripple reach $10? It might do, but not for some time. PricePrediction.net thinks XRP can get there in 2031 and DigitalCoinPrice thinks the coin can reach double figures in 2032. Remember that Ripple’s highest ever price is $3.84, which it reached in January 2018. What is Ripple used for? The XRP cryptocurrency helps power the Ripple network. People can also buy, sell, and trade XRP on exchanges.
Further reading
Render Token Price Prediction 2023: What is Render Token (RNDR)?
MXC Price Prediction 2023: What is MXC?
Astar Price Prediction 2023: What is Astar (ASTR)?
Disclaimer
Please note that the contents of this article are not financial or investing advice. The information provided in this article is the author’s opinion only and should not be considered as offering trading or investing recommendations. We do not make any warranties about this information’s completeness, reliability, and accuracy. The cryptocurrency market suffers from high volatility and occasional arbitrary movements. Any investor, trader, or regular crypto user should research multiple viewpoints and be familiar with all local regulations before committing to an investment.